c 



G 



r 1 &T. 
n 



^" >! 



Edward Bright 




Mathematics Dept, 



AN ENQUIRY CONCERNING 

THE PRINCIPLES OF 
NATURAL KNOWLEDGE 



\i a 



CAMBRIDGE UNIVERSITY PRESS 

\ . C. F. CLAY, MANAGER 
LONDON : FETTER LANE, E.G. 4 

NEW YORK : G.P.PUTNAM'S SONS 

BOMBAY ) 

CALCUTTA V MACMILLAN AND CO., LTD. 

MADRAS J 

TORONTO : J. M. DENT AND SONS, LTD. 

TOKYO : MARUZEN-KABUSHIKI-KAISHA 

ALL RIGHTS RESERVED 



* 



AN ENQUIRY CONCERNING 

THE PRINCIPLES OF 
NATURAL KNOWLEDGE 

, } 
BY . . . ... 

A. N. WHITEHEAD, Sc.D., F.R.S. 

Fellow of Trinity College, Cambridge, and Professor of 

Applied Mathematics in the Imperial College 

of Science and Technology 



" PHILONOUS. / am not for imposing any sense on 
your words : you are at liberty to explain them as 
you please. Only, I beseech you, make me understand 

something by them" 

BERKELEY, 

The First Dialogue between 
Hylas and Philonous. 



CAMBRIDGE 

AT T.HE UNIVERSITY PRESS 
1919 



I 



^: : ;. , . : TO 

ERIC ALFRED WHITEHEAD 

ROYAL FLYING CORPS 

November 27, 1898 to March 13, 1918 

Killed in action over the Foret de Gobain 

giving himself that the city of his vision 

may not perish. 

The music of his life was without discord, 
perfect in its beauty. 




WMNT6O fN GREAT BRITAIN 



PREFACE 

THERE are three main streams of thought which are 
relevant to the theme of this enquiry; they may, with 
sufficient accuracy, be termed the scientific, the mathe- 
matical, and the philosophical movements. 

Modern speculative physics with its revolutionary 
theories concerning the natures of matter and of 
electricity has made urgent the question, What are the 
ultimate data of science? It is in accordance with the 
nature of things that mankind should find itself acting 
and should then proceed to discuss the rationale of its 
activities. Thus the creation of science precedes the 
analysis of its data and can even be accompanied by 
the acceptance of faulty analyses, though such errors 
end by warping scientific imagination. 

The contributions of mathematics to natural science 
consist in the elaboration of the general art of deductive 
reasoning, the theory of quantitative measurement by 
the use of number, the theory of serial order, of 
geometry, of the exact measurement of time, and of 
rates of change. The critical studies of the nineteenth 
century and after have thrown light on the nature of 
mathematics and in particular on the foundations of 
geometry. We now know many alternative sets of 
axioms from which geometry can be deduced by the 
strictest deductive reasoning. But these investigations 
concern geometry as an abstract science deduced from 
hypothetical premisses. In this enquiry we are concerned 
with geometry as a physical science. How is space 
rooted in experience? 

The modern theory of relativity has opened the pos- 
sibility of a new answer to this question. The successive 



781551 



vi PREFACE 

labours of Larmor, Lorentz, Einstein, and Minkovski 
have opened a new world of thought as to the relations 
of space and time to the ultimate data of perceptual 
knowledge. The present work is largely concerned with 
providing a physical basis for the more modern views 
which have thus emerged. The whole investigation is 
based on the principle that the scientific concepts of 
space and time are the first outcome of the simplest 
generalisations from experience, and that they are not 
to be looked for at the tail end of a welter of differential 
equations. This position does not mean that Einstein's 
recent theory of general relativity and of gravitation is 
to be rejected. The divergence is purely a question of 
interpretation. Our time and space measurements may 
in practice result in elaborate combinations of the 
primary methods of measurement which are explained 
in this work. For example, the theory of gravitational 
matter may involve the theory of * vagrant solids ' which 
is pointed out as a subject for investigation in article 39, 
but not developed. It has certainly resulted from 
Einstein's investigations that a modification of the 
gravitational law, of an order of magnitude which is 
v 2 /c 2 of the main effect [v being the velocity of the matter 
and c that of light], will account for the more striking 
outstanding difficulties otherwise unexplained by the 
law of gravitation. This is a remarkable discovery for 
which the utmost credit is due to the author. Now 
that the fact is known, it is easy to see that it is the 
sort of modification which on the simple electromagnetic 
theory of relativity is likely to be required for this law. 
I have however been anxious to disentangle the con- 
sideration of the main positions of this enquiry from 
theories designed to explain special laws of nature. 



PREFACE vii 

Also at the date of writing the evidence for some of the 
consequences of Einstein's theory is ambiguous and 
even adverse. In connection with the theory of rela- 
tivity I have received suggestive stimulus from Dr L. 
Silberstein's Theory of Relativity, and from an import- 
ant Memoir* by Profs. E. B. Wilson and G. N. Lewis. 
The discussion of the deduction of scientific concepts 
from the simplest elements of our perceptual knowledge 
at once brings us to philosophical theory. Berkeley, 
Hume, Kant, Mill, Huxley, Bertrand Russell and 
Bergson, among others, have initiated and sustained 
relevant discussions. But this enquiry is touched by 
only one side of the philosophical debate. We are con- 
cerned only with Nature, that is, with the object of 
perceptual knowledge, and not with the synthesis of 
the knower with the known. This distinction is exactly 
that which separates natural philosophy from meta- 
physics. Accordingly none of our perplexities as to 
Nature will be solved by having recourse to the con- 
sideration that there is a mind knowing it. Our theme 
is the coherence of the known, and the perplexity which 
we are unravelling is as to what it is that is known. 
In matters philosophic the obligations of an author to 
others usually arise from schools of debate rather than 
from schools of agreement. Also such schools are the 
more important in proportion as assertion and retort do 
not have to wait for the infrequent opportunities of 
formal publication, hampered by the formidable per- 
manence of the printed word. At the present moment 
England is fortunate in this respect. London, Oxford 
and Cambridge are within easy reach of each other, and 

* c The Space-Time Manifold of Relativity.' Proc. of the 
Amer. Acad. of Arts and Sciences, vol. XLVIII, 1912. 



viii PREFACE 

provide a common school of debate which rivals schools 
of the ancient and medieval worlds. Accordingly I 
have heavy obligations to acknowledge to Bertrand 
Russell, Wildon Carr, F. C. Schiller, T. P. Nunn, 
Dawes Hicks, McTaggart, James Ward, and many 
others who, amid their divergencies of opinion, are 
united in the candid zeal of their quest for truth. 

It is quite unnecessary to draw attention to the in- 
completeness of this investigation. The book is merely 
an enquiry. It raises more difficulties than those which 
it professes to settle. This is inevitable in any philo- 
sophical work, however complete. All that one can 
hope to do is to settle the right sort of difficulties and to 
raise the right sort of ulterior questions, and thus to 
accomplish one short step further into the unfathomable 
mystery. 

Memories are short, and perhaps it is not inapt to 
put on record circumstances common to the life of all 
England during years of war. The book is the product 
of intervals of leisure amid pressing occupation, a refuge 
from immediate fact. It has been thought out and 
written amid the sound of guns guns of Kitchener's 
army training on Salisbury Plain, guns on the Somme 
faintly echoing across the Sussex coast : some few parts 
composed to pass times of expectation during air-raids 
over London, punctuated by the sound of bombs and 
the answer of artillery, with argument clipped by the 
whirr of aeroplanes. And through the land anxiety, and 
at last the anguish which is the price of victory. 

A. N. W. 
April 20, 1919 



CONTENTS 

PART I 

THE TRADITIONS OF SCIENCE 
CHAPTER I. MEANING 

ARTS. PAGES 

1. TRADITIONAL SCIENTIFIC CONCEPTS ... 1-4 

2. PHILOSOPHIC RELATIVITY 4-8 

3. PERCEPTION 8-15 

CHAPTER II. THE FOUNDATIONS OF 
DYNAMICAL PHYSICS 

4. NEWTON'S LAWS OF MOTION 16-19 

5. THE ETHER 20-23 

6. MAXWELL'S EQUATIONS 23-26 

APPENDIX I : NEWTON'S LAWS OF MOTION . . . 27-28 
APPENDIX II: CLERK MAXWELL'S EQUATIONS OF THE 

ELECTROMAGNETIC FIELD 29-30 

CHAPTER III. SCIENTIFIC RELATIVITY 

7. CONSENTIENT SETS 3J-32 

8. KINEMATIC RELATIONS . . . . . 32-37 

9. MOTION THROUGH THE ETHER .... 37~4I 
10. FORMULAE FOR RELATIVE MOTION . . . . 41-46 
APPENDIX: MATHEMATICAL FORMULAE .... 47-50 

CHAPTER IV. CONGRUENCE 

n. SIMULTANEITY 5 I- 54 

12. CONGRUENCE AND RECOGNITION . . . . 54~57 



x CONTENTS 

PART II 

THE DATA OF SCIENCE 
CHAPTER V. THE NATURAL ELEMENTS 

ARTS. PAGES 

13. THE DIVERSIFICATION OF NATURE . . . . 59~ 6t 

14. EVENTS , 61-62 

15. OBJECTS 62-67 

CHAPTER VI. EVENTS 

1 6. APPREHENSION OF EVENTS . . . , . 68-71 

17. THE CONSTANTS OF EXTERNALITY . . . . 7 l ~74 

18. EXTENSION . . . . . ... 74-77 

19. ABSOLUTE POSITION . . . . . . 77~7$ 

20. THE COMMUNITY OF NATURE . . . . . 78-79 

21. CHARACTERS OF EVENTS . . . . . . 79-81 

CHAPTER VII. OBJECTS 

22. TYPES OF OBJECTS . . . . . * 82-83 

23. SENSE-OBJECTS . . . . * . . '. 83-88 

24. PERCEPTUAL OBJECTS . . . > e . , . 88-93 

25. SCIENTIFIC OBJECTS . . . . . . 93-98 

26. DUALITY OF NATURE . . , . " - . . . 98-99 

PART III 
THE METHOD OF EXTENSIVE ABSTRACTION 

CHAPTER VIII. PRINCIPLES OF THE METHOD 
OF EXTENSIVE ABSTRACTION 

27. THE RELATION OF EXTENSION, FUNDAMENTAL PRO- 

PERTIES . 101-102 

28. INTERSECTION, SEPARATION AND DISSECTION . . 102 

29. THE JUNCTION OF EVENTS 102-103 

30. ABSTRACTIVE CLASSES . . . . . 104-106 

31. PRIMES AND ANTIPRIMES 106-108 

32. ABSTRACTIVE ELEMENTS 108-109 



CONTENTS xi 



CHAPTER IX. DURATIONS, MOMENTS AND 
TIME-SYSTEMS 

ARTS. PAGES 

33. ANTIPRIMES, DURATIONS AND MOMENTS . . . 110-112 

34. PARALLELISM AND TIME-SYSTEMS .... 112-115 

35. LEVELS, RECTS, AND PUNCTS 115-118 

36. PARALLELISM AND ORDER ..... 118-120 



CHAPTER X. FINITE ABSTRACTIVE ELEMENTS 

37. ABSOLUTE PRIMES AND EVENT-PARTICLES . . 121-123 

38. ROUTES. . v 123-126 

39. SOLIDS 126 

40. VOLUMES ; 126-127 



CHAPTER XI. POINTS AND STRAIGHT LINES 

41. STATIONS . . 128-129 

42. POINT-TRACKS AND POINTS . . . . . 129-131 

43. PARALLELISM . . . . . . .131-133 

44. MATRICES 133 

45. NULL-TRACKS . . . . . . . 133-136 

46. STRAIGHT LINES 136-138 



CHAPTER XII. NORMALITY AND CONGRUENCE 

47. NORMALITY . 139-140 

48. CONGRUENCE 141-146 



CHAPTER XIII. MOTION 

49. ANALYTIC GEOMETRY ...... 147-151 

50. THE PRINCIPLE OF KINEMATIC SYMMETRY . . 151-155 

51. TRANSITIVITY OF CONGRUENCE .... 155-157 

52. THE THREE TYPES OF KINEMATICS . . . . 157-164 



Xll 



CONTENTS 



PART IV 

V 

THE THEORY OF OBJECTS 
CHAPTER XIV. THE LOCATION OF OBJECTS 



ARTS. 

53. LOCATION 



54- UNIFORM OBJECTS 

55. COMPONENTS OF OBJECTS . . 

CHAPTER XV. MATERIAL OBJECTS 

56. MATERIAL OBJECTS 

57. STATIONARY EVENTS . . . . . , , . 

58. MOTION OF OBJECTS . . . ... , 

59. EXTENSIVE MAGNITUDE 

CHAPTER XVI. CAUSAL COMPONENTS 



PAGES 
165-167 
167-169 
169-170 



171-172 
172-175 

1 75-i 77 
177-181 



60. APPARENT AND CAUSAL COMPONENTS 

6 1 . TRANSITION FROM APPEARANCE TO CAUSE . 

CHAPTER XVII. FIGURES 

62. SENSE-FIGURES 

63. GEOMETRICAL FIGURES . 



. 182-184 
. 184-189 



190-192 
193-194 



CHAPTER XVIII. RHYTHMS 



64. RHYTHMS 



195-200 






PART I 
THE TRADITIONS OF SCIENCE 



CHAPTER I .>/; " _ 

MEANING 

/. Traditional Scientific Concepts . i-i What is a phys- 
ical explanation? The answer to this question, even 
when merely implicit in the scientific imagination, must 
profoundly affect the development of every science, 
and in an especial degree that of speculative physics. 
During the modern period the orthodox answer has 
invariably been couched in terms of Time (flowing 
equably in measurable lapses) and of Space (timeless, 
void of activity, euclidean), and of Material in space 
(such as matter, ether, or electricity). 

The governing principle underlying this scheme is 
that extension, namely extension in time or extension 
in space, expresses disconnection. This principle issues 
in the assumptions that causal action between entities 
separated in time or in space is impossible and that ex- 
tension in space and unity of being are inconsistent. 
Thus the extended material (on this view) is essentially 
a multiplicity of entities which, as extended, are diverse 
and disconnected. This governing principle has to be 
limited in respect to extension in time. The same 
material exists at different times. This concession intro- 
duces the many perplexities centering round the notion 
of change which is derived from the comparison of 
various states of self-identical material at different 
times. 



w. 



2 I. THE TRADITIONS OF SCIENCE 

1-2 The ultimate fact embracing all nature is (in this 
traditional point of view) a distribution of material 
throughout all space at a durationless instant of time, 
and another such ultimate fact will be another distri- 
.butioh bF the' same material throughout the same space 
at another; dxirationless instant of time. The difficulties 
of this extreme statement are evident and were pointed 
out even in classical times when the concept first took 
shape. Some modification is evidently necessary. No 
room has been left for velocity, acceleration, momentum, 
and kinetic energy, which certainly are essential physical 
quantities. 

We must therefore in the ultimate fact, beyond which 
science ceases to analyse, include the notion of a state 
of change. But a state of change at a durationless instant 
is a very difficult conception. It is impossible to define 
velocity without some reference to the past and the 
future. Thus change is essentially the importation of 
the past and of the future into the immediate fact em- 
bodied in the durationless present instant. 

This conclusion is destructive of the fundamental 
assumption that the ultimate facts for science are to be 
found at durationless instants of time. 

1 3 The reciprocal causal action between materials 
A and B is the fact that their states of change are partly 
dependent on their relative locations and natures. The 
disconnection involved in spatial separation leads to 
reduction t)f such causal action to the transmission of 
stress across the bounding surface of contiguous 
materials. But what is contact? No two points are in 
contact. Thus the stress across a surface necessarily 
acts on some bulk of the material enclosed inside. To 
say that the stress acts on the immediately contiguous 



MEANING 3 

material is to assert infinitely small volumes. But there 
are no such things, only smaller and smaller volumes. 
Yet (with this point of view) it cannot be meant that 
the surface acts on the interior. 

Certainly stress has the same claim to be regarded as 
an essential physical quantity as have momentum and 
kinetic energy. But no intelligible account of its mean- 
ing is to be extracted from the concept of the continuous 
distribution of diverse (because extended) entities 
through space as an ultimate scientific fact. At some 
stage in our account of stress we are driven to the con- 
cept of any extended quantity of material as a single 
unity whose nature is partly explicable in terms of its 
surface stress. 

1-4 In biology the concept of an organism cannot be 
expressed in terms of a material distribution at an 
instant. The essence of an organism is that it is one 
thing which functions and is spread through space. 
Now functioning takes time. Thus a biological or- 
ganism is a unity with a spatio-temporal extension 
which is of the essence of its being. This biological 
conception is obviously incompatible with the tradi- 
tional ideas. This argument does not in any way depend 
on the assumption that biological phenomena belong 
to a different category to other physical phenomena. 
The essential point of the criticism on traditional con- 
cepts which has occupied us so far is that the concept 
of unities, functioning and with spatio-temporal ex- 
tensions, cannot be extruded from physical concepts. 
The only reason for the introduction of biology is that 
in these sciences the same necessity becomes more 
clear. 



I 2 



4 I. THE TRADITIONS OF SCIENCE 

I '5 The fundamental assumption to be elaborated 
in the course of this enquiry is that the ultimate facts 
of nature, in terms of which all physical and biological 
explanation must be expressed, are events connected 
by their spatio-temporal relations, and that these rela- 
tions are in the main reducible to the property of events 
that they can contain (or extend over) other events 
which are parts of them. In other words, in the place 
of emphasising space and time in their capacity of 
disconnecting, we shall build up an account of their 
complex essences as derivative from the ultimate ways 
in which those things, ultimate in science, are inter- 
connected. In this way the data of science, those 
concepts in terms of which all scientific explanation 
must be expressed, will be more clearly apprehended . 
But before proceeding to our constructive task, some 
further realisation of the perplexities introduced by 
the traditional concepts is necessary. 

2. Philosophic Relativity. 2-1 The philosophical 
principle of the relativity of space means that the pro- 
perties of space are merely a way of expressing relations 
between things ordinarily said to be ' in space/ Namely, 
when two things are said to be ' both in space ' what is 
meant is that they are mutually related in a certain 
definite way which is termed * spatial.' It is an im- 
mediate consequence of this theory that all spatial 
entities such as points, straight lines and planes are 
merely complexes of relations between things or of 
possible relations between things. 

For consider the meaning of saying that a particle 
P is at a point Q. This statement conveys substantial 
information and must therefore convey something more 
than the barren assertion of self -identity * P is P.' Thus 



MEANING 5 

what must be meant is that P has certain relations to 
other particles P', P" , etc., and that the abstract possi- 
bility of this group of relations is what is meant by the 
point Q. 

The extremely valuable work on the foundations of 
geometry produced during the nineteenth century has 
proceeded from the assumption of points as ultimate 
given entities. This assumption, for the logical purpose 
of mathematicians, is entirely justified. Namely the 
mathematicians ask, What is the logical description of 
relations between points from which all geometrical 
theorems respecting such relations can be deduced? 
The answer to this question is now practically complete ; 
and if the old theory of absolute space be true, there is 
nothing more to be said. For points are ultimate simple 
existents, with mutual relations disclosed by our per- 
ceptions of nature. 

But if we adopt the principle of relativity, these 
investigations do not solve the question of the founda- 
tions of geometry. An investigation into the foundations 
of geometry has to explain space as a complex of rela- 
tions between things. It has to describe what a point 
is, and has to show how the geometric relations be- 
tween points issue from the ultimate relations between 
the ultimate things which are the immediate objects 
of knowledge. Thus the starting point of a discussion 
on the foundations of geometry is a discussion of the 
character of the immediate data of perception. It is 
not now open to mathematicians to assume sub silentio 
that points are among these data. 

2-2 The traditional concepts were evidently formed 
round the concept of absolute space, namely the concept 
of the persistent ultimate material distributed among 



6 I. THE TRADITIONS OF SCIENCE 

the persistent ultimate points in successive configura- 
tions at successive ultimate instants of time. Here 
* ultimate' means 'not analysable into a complex of 
simpler entities.' The introduction of the principle of 
relativity adds to the complexity or rather, to the 
perplexity of this conception of nature. The state- 
ment of general character of ultimate fact must now 
be amended into 'persistent ultimate material with 
successive mutual ultimate relations at successive 
ultimate instants of time.' 

Space issues from these mutual relations of matter 
at an instant. The first criticism to be made on such 
an assertion is that it is shown to be a metaphysical fairy 
tale by any comparison with our actual perceptual 
knowledge of nature. Our knowledge of space is based 
on observations which take time and have to be 
successive, but the relations which constitute space are 
instantaneous. The theory demands that there should 
be an instantaneous space corresponding to each instant, 
and provides for no correlation between these spaces; 
while nature has provided us with no apparatus for 
observing them. 

2-3 It is an obvious suggestion that we should amend 
our statement of ultimate fact, as modified by the ac- 
ceptance of relativity. The spatial relations must now 
stretch across time. Thus if P, P', P", etc. be material 
particles, there are definite spatial relations connecting 
P, P', P", etc. at time ^ with P, P', P", etc. at time Z 2 , 
as well as such relations between P and P' and P", etc. 
at time ^ and such relations between P and P' and P" y 
etc. at time t 2 . This should mean that P at time t 2 has 
a definite position in the spatial configuration consti- 
tuted by the relations between P, P', P", etc. at time t^ 



MEANING 7 

For example, the sun at a certain instant on Jan. ist, 
1900 had a definite position in the instantaneous space 
constituted by the mutual relations between the sun 
and the other stars at a definite instant on Jan. ist, 1800. 
Such a statement is only understandable (assuming the 
traditional concept) by recurring to absolute space and 
thus abandoning relativity; for otherwise it denies the 
completeness of the instantaneous fact which is the 
essence of the concept. Another way out of the difficulty 
is to deny that space is constituted by the relations of 
P, P', P", etc., at an instant, and to assert that it results 
from their relations throughout a duration of time, 
which as thus prolonged in time are observable. 

As a matter of fact it is obvious that our knowledge 
of space does result from such observations. But we 
are asking the theory to provide us with actual relations 
to be observed. This last emendation is either only a 
muddled way of admitting that * nature at an instant* 
is not the ultimate scientific fact, or else it is a yet more 
muddled plea that, although there is no possibility of 
correlations between distinct instantaneous spaces, yet 
within durations which are short enough such non- 
existent correlations enter into experience. 

2-4 The persistence of the material lacks any ob- 
servational guarantee when the relativity of space is 
admitted into the traditional concept. For at one instant 
there is instantaneous material in its instantaneous 
space as constituted by its instantaneous relations, and 
at another instant there is instantaneous material in its 
instantaneous space. How do we know that the two 
cargoes of material which load the two instants are 
identical? The answer is that we do not perceive iso- 
lated instantaneous facts, but a continuity of existence, 



8 I. THE TRADITIONS OF SCIENCE 

and that it is this observed continuity of existence 
which guarantees the persistence of material. Exactly 
so; but this gives away the whole traditional concept. 
For a * continuity of existence ' must mean an unbroken 
duration of existence. Accordingly it is admitted that 
the ultimate fact for observational knowledge is per- 
ception through a duration; namely, that the content 
of a specious present, and not that of a durationless 
instant, is an ultimate datum for science. 

2-5 It is evident that the conception of the instant 
of time as an ultimate entity is the source of all our 
difficulties of explanation. If there are such ultimate 
entities, instantaneous nature is an ultimate fact. 

Our perception of time is as a duration, and these 
instants have only been introduced by reason of a 
supposed necessity of thought. In fact absolute time 
is just as much a metaphysical monstrosity as absolute 
space. The way out of the perplexities, as to the ulti- 
mate data of science in terms of which physical ex- 
planation is ultimately to be expressed, is to express 
the essential scientific concepts of time, space and 
material as issuing from fundamental relations between 
events and from recognitions of the characters of events. 
These relations of events are those immediate deliver- 
ances of observation which are referred to when we say 
that events are spread through time and space. 

3. Perception. 3-1 The conception of one universal 
nature embracing the fragmentary perceptions of events 
by one percipient and the many perceptions by diverse 
percipients is surrounded with difficulties. In the first 
place there is what we will call the ' Berkeleyan Dilem- 
ma' which crudely and shortly may be stated thus: 
Perceptions are in the mind and universal nature is out 



MEANING 9 

of the mind, and thus the conception of universal 
nature can have no relevance to our perceptual life. 
This is not how Berkeley stated his criticism of mater- 
ialism; he was thinking of substance and matter. But 
this variation is a detail and his criticism is fatal to 
any of the traditional types of * mind-watching-things ' 
philosophy, even if those things be events and not 
substance or material. His criticisms range through 
every type of sense-perception, though in particular 
he concentrates on Vision. 

3*2 "Evpkranar*. Tell me, Alciphron, can you discern the 

doors, windows, and battlements of that same castle? 
Alciphron. I cannot. At this distance it seems only a small 

round tower. 
Euph. But I, who have been at it, know that it is no small round 

tower, but a large square building with battlements and 

turrets, which it seems you do not see. 
Ale. What will you infer from thence ? 
Euph. I would infer that the very object which you strictly and 

properly perceive by sight is not that thing which is several 

miles distant. 
Ale. Why so? 
Euph. Because a little round object is one thing, and a great 

square object is another. Is it not so ? 
Ale. I cannot deny it. 
Euph. Tell me, is not the visible appearance alone the proper 

object of sight ? 
Ale. It is. 

What think you now (said Euphranor, pointing towards 

the heavens) of the visible appearance of yonder planet? 

Is it not a round luminous flat, no bigger than a six-pence ? 
Ale. What then? 
Euph. Tell me then, what you think of the planet itself? Do 

* Alciphron, The Fourth Dialogue, Section 10. 



io I. THE TRADITIONS OF SCIENCE 

you not conceive it to be a vast opaque globe, with several 

unequal risings and valleys ? 
Ale. I do. 
Euph. How can you therefore conclude that the proper object 

of your sight exists at a distance ? 
Ale. I confess I do not know. 
Euph. For your further conviction, do but consider that 

crimson cloud. Think you that, if you were in the very 

place where it is, you would perceive anything like what 

you now see ? 

Ale. By no means. I should perceive only a dark mist. 
Euph. Is it not plain, therefore, that neither the castle, the 

planet, nor the cloud, which you see here, are those real 

ones which you suppose exist at a distance ? " 

33 Now the difficulty to be faced is just this. We 
may not lightly abandon the castle, the planet, and the 
crimson cloud, and hope to retain the eye, its retina, 
and the brain. Such a philosophy is too simple-minded 
or at least might be thought so, except for its wide 
diffusion. 

Suppose we make a clean sweep. Science then be- 
comes a formula for calculating mental ' phenomena * or 
'impressions.' But where is science? In books? But 
the castle and the planet took their libraries with them. 

No, science is in the minds of men. But men sleep 
and forget, and at their best in any one moment of 
insight entertain but scanty thoughts. Science there- 
5? \ fore is nothing but a confident expectation that relevant 
thoughts will occasionally occur. But by the bye, what 
has happened to time and space ? They must have gone 
after the other things. No, we must distinguish: space 
has gone, of course; but time remains as relating the 
succession of phenomena. Yet this won't do; for this 
succession is only known by recollection, and recollec- 



MEANING ii 

tion is subject to the same criticism as that applied by 
Berkeley to the castle, the planet, and the cloud. So 
after all, time does evaporate with space, and in their 
departure ' you ' also have accompanied them ; and I am 
left solitary in the character of a void of experience 
without significance. 

3-4 At this point in the argument we may break off, 
having formed a short catalogue of the sort of considera- 
tions which lead from the Berkeleyan dilemma to a 
complete scepticism which was not in Berkeley's own 
thought. 

There are two types of answer to this sceptical 
descent. One is Dr Johnson's. He stamped his foot 
on a paving-stone, and went on his way satisfied with 
its reality. A scrutiny of modern philosophy will, if 
I am not mistaken, show that more philosophers should 
own Dr Johnson as their master than would be willing 
to acknowledge their indebtedness. 

The other type of answer was first given by Kant. 
We must distinguish between the general way he set 
about constructing his answer to Hume, and the details 
of his system which in many respects are highly dis- 
putable. The essential point of his method is the 
assumption that ' significance ' is an essential element in 
concrete experience. The Berkeleyan dilemma starts 
with tacitly ignoring this aspect of experience, and thus 
with putting forward, as expressing experience, con- 
ceptions of it which have no relevance to fact. In the 
light of Kant's procedure, Johnson's answer falls into 
its place; it is the assertion that Berkeley has not 
correctly expounded what experience in fact is. 

Berkeley himself insists that experience is significant, 
indeed three-quarters of his writings are devoted to 



12 , I. THE TRADITIONS OF SCIENCE 

enforcing this position. But Kant's position is the 
converse of Berkeley's, namely that significance : is ex- 
perience. Berkeley first analyses experience, and then 
expounds his view of its significance, namely that it is 
God conversing with us. For Berkeley the significance 
is detachable from the experience. It is here that Hume 
came in. He accepted Berkeley's assumption that 
experience is something given, an impression, without 
essential reference to significance, and exhibited it in 
its bare insignificance. Berkeley's conversation with 
God then becomes a fairy tale. 

3-5 What is * significance '? Evidently this is a funda- 
mental question for the philosophy of natural know- 
ledge, which cannot move a step until it has made up 
its mind as to what is meant by this 'significance* 
which is experience. 

' Significance ' is the relatedness of things. To say 
that significance is experience, is to affirm that per- 
ceptual knowledge is nothing else than an apprehension 
of the relatedness of things, namely of things in their 
relations and as related. Certainly if we commence with 
a knowledge of things, and then look around for their 
relations we shall not find them. 'Causal connection' 
is merely one typical instance of the universal ruin of 
relatedness. But then we are quite mistaken in thinking 
that there is a possible knowledge of things as unrelated. 
It is thus out of the question to start with a knowledge 
of things antecedent to a knowledge of their relations. 
The so-called properties of things can always be ex- 
pressed as their relatedness to other things unspecified, 
and natural knowledge is exclusively concerned with 
relatedness. 

3-6 The relatedness which is the subject of natural 



MEANING 13 

knowledge cannot be understood without reference to 
the general characteristics of perception. Our percep- 
tion of natural events and natural objects is a perception 
from within nature, and is not an awareness contem- 
plating all nature impartially from without. When 
Dr Johnson ' surveyed mankind from China to Peru,' 
he did it from Pump Court in London at a certain date. 
Even Pump Court was too wide for his peculiar locus 
standi', he was really merely conscious of the relations 
of his bodily events to the simultaneous events through- 
out the rest of the universe. Thus perception involves 
a percipient object, a percipient event, the complete 
event which is all nature simultaneous with the per- 
cipient event, and the particular events which are 
perceived as parts of the complete event. This general 
analysis of perception will be elaborated in Part II. 
The point here to be emphasised is that natural know- 
ledge is a knowledge from within nature, a knowledge 
'here within nature' and 'now within nature,' and is 
an awareness of the natural relations of one element in 
nature (namely, the percipient event) to the rest of 
nature. Also what is known is not barely the things 
but the relations of things, and not the relations in the 
abstract but specifically those things as related. 

Thus Alciphron's vision of the planet is his percep- 
tion of his relatedness (i.e. the relatedness of his per- 
cipient event) to some other elements of nature which 
as thus related he calls the planet. He admits in the 
dialogue that certain other specified relations of those 
elements are possible for other percipient events. In 
this he may be right or wrong. What he directly knows 
is his relation to some other elements of the universe 
namely, I, Alciphron, am located in my percipient 



i 4 I. THE TRADITIONS OF SCIENCE 

event 'here and now' and the immediately perceived 
appearance of the planet is for me a characteristic of 
another event 'there and now.' In fact perceptual 
knowledge is always a knowledge of the relationship 
of the percipient event to something else in nature. 
This doctrine is in entire agreement with Dr Johnson's 
stamp of the foot by which he realised the otherness 
of the paving-stone. 

3-7 The conception of knowledge as passive con- 
templation is too inadequate to meet the facts. Nature 
is ever originating its own development, and the sense 
of action is the direct knowledge of the percipient event 
as having its very being in the formation of its natural 
relations. Knowledge issues from this reciprocal in- 
sistence between this event and the rest of nature, 
namely relations are perceived in the making and 
because of the making. For this reason perception is 
always at the utmost point of creation. We cannot put 
ourselves back to the Crusades and know their events 
while they were happening. We essentially perceive 
our relations with nature because they are in the making. 
The sense of action is that essential factor in natural 
knowledge which exhibits it as a self-knowledge en- 
joyed by an element of nature respecting its active 
relations with the whole of nature in its various aspects. 
Natural knowledge is merely the other side of action. 
The forward moving time exhibits this characteristic 
of experience, that it is essentially action. This passage 
of nature or, in other words, its creative advance is 
its fundamental characteristic; the traditional concept 
is an attempt to catch nature without its passage. 

3-8 Thus science leads to an entirely incoherent 
philosophy of perception in so far as it restricts itself 



MEANING 15 

to the ultimate datum of material in time and space, 
the spatio-temporal configuration of such material being 
the object of perception. This conclusion is no news 
to philosophy, but it has not led to any explicit re- 
organisation of the concepts actually employed in 
science. Implicitly, scientific theory is shot through 
and through with notions which are frankly inconsistent 
with its explicit fundamental data. 

This confusion cannot be avoided by any kind of 
theory in which nature is conceived simply as a complex 
of one kind of inter-related elements such as either 
persistent things, or events, or sense-data. A more 
elaborate view is required of which an explanation will 
be attempted in the sequel. It will suffice here to say 
that it issues in the assertion that all nature can (in 
many diverse ways) be analysed as a complex of things ; 
thus all nature can be analysed as a complex of events, | 
and all nature can be analysed as a complex of sense- 
data. The elements which result from such analyses, 
events, and sense-data, are aspects of nature of funda- i 
mentally different types, and the confusions of scientific 
theory have arisen from the absence of any clear re- 
cognition of the distinction between relations proper 
to one type of element anol relations proper to another 
type of element. It is of course a commonplace that 
elements of these types are fundamentally different. 
What is here to be insisted on is the way in which this \ 
commonplace truth is important in yielding an analysis ) 
of the ultimate data for science more elaborate than that 
of its current tradition. We have to remember that 
while nature is complex with time-less subtlety, human 
thought issues from the simple-mindedness of beings 
whose active life is less than half a century. 



CHAPTER II 

THE FOUNDATIONS OF DYNAMICAL 
PHYSICS 

4. Newton 9 s Laws of Motion. 4-1 The theoretical 
difficulties in the way of the application of the philo- 
sophic doctrine of relativity have never worried practical 
scientists. They have started with the working assump- 
tions that in some sense the world is in one euclidean 
space, that the permanent points in such a space have 
no individual characteristics recognisable by us, except 
so far as they are occupied by recognisable material or 
except in so far as they are defined by assigned spatial 
relations to points which are thus definitely recognisable, 
and that according to the purpose in hand either the 
earth can be assumed to be at rest or else astronomical 
axes which are defined by the aid of the solar system, 
of the stars, and of dynamical considerations deduced 
from Newton's laws of motion. 

4-2 Newton's laws* of motion presuppose the notions 
of mass and force. Mass arises from the conception 
of a passive quality of a material body, what it is in 
itself apart from its relation to other bodies ; the notion 
of ' force ' is that of an active agency changing the phys- 
ical circumstances of the body, and in particular its 
spatial relations to other bodies. It is fairly obvious 
that mass and force were introduced into science 
as the outcome of this antithesis between intrinsic 
quality and agency, although further reflection may 
somewhat mar the simplicity of this outlook. Mass and 
* Cf. Appendix I to this chapter. 



THE FOUNDATIONS OF DYNAMICAL PHYSICS 17 

force are measurable quantities, and their numerical 
expressions are dependent on the units chosen. The 
mass of a body is constant, so long as the body remains 
composed of the same self-identical material. Velocity, 
acceleration and force are vector quantities, namely they 
have direction as well as magnitude. They are thus 
representable by straight lines drawn from any arbitrary 
origin. 

4-3 These laws of motion are among the foundations 
of science; and certainly any alteration in them must 
be such as to produce effects observable only under 
very exceptional circumstances. But, as is so often the 
case in science, a scrutiny of their meaning produces 
many perplexities. 

In the first place we can sweep aside one minor 
difficulty. In our experience, a finite mass of matter 
occupies a volume and not a point. Evidently therefore 
the laws should be stated in an integral form, involving 
at certain points of the exposition greater elaboration 
of statement. These forms are stated (with somewhat 
abbreviated explanation) in dynamical treatises. 

Secondly, Lorentz's distinction between macro- 
scopic equations and microscopic equations forces 
itself on us at once, by reason of the molecular nature 
of matter and the dynamical nature of heat. A body 
apparently formed of continuous matter with its in- 
trinsic geometrical relations nearly invariable is in fact 
composed of agitated molecules. The equations of 
motion for such a body as used by an engineer or an 
astronomer are, in Lorentz's nomenclature, macro- 
scopic. In such equations even a differential element 
of volume is to be supposed to be sufficiently large to 
average out the diverse agitations of the molecules, and 
w. 2 



i8 I. THE TRADITIONS OF SCIENCE 

to register only the general unbalanced residuum which 
to ordinary observation is the motion of the body. 

The microscopic equations are those which apply to 
the individual molecules. It is at once evident that a 
series of such sets of equations is possible, in which 
the adjacent sets are macroscopic and microscopic 
relatively to each other. For example, we may penetrate 
below the molecule to the electrons and the core which 
compose it, and thus obtain infra-molecular equations. 
It is purely a question as to whether there are any 
observed phenomena which in this way receive their 
interpretation. 

The inductive evidence for the validity of Newton's 
equations of motion, within the experimental limits of 
accuracy, is obviously much stronger in the case of the 
macroscopic equations of the engineer and the astro- 
nomer than it is in the case of the microscopic equations 
of the molecule, and very much stronger than in the 
case of the infra-microscopic equations of the electron. 
But there is good evidence that even the infra-micro- 
scopic equations conform to Newton's laws as a first 
approximation. The traces of deviation arise when the 
velocities are not entirely negligible compared to that 
of light. 

4-4 What do we know about masses and about 
forces ? We obtain our knowledge of forces by having 
some theory about masses, and our knowledge of 
masses by having some theory about forces. Our 
theories about masses enable us in certain circumstances 
to assign the numerical ratios of the masses of the bodies 
involved; then the observed motions of these bodies 
will enable us to register (by the use of Newton's laws 
of motion) the directions and magnitudes of the forces 



THE FOUNDATIONS OF DYNAMICAL PHYSICS 19 

involved, and thence to frame more extended theories 
as to the laws regulating the production of force. Our 
theories about the direction and comparative magni- 
tudes of forces and the observed motions of the bodies 
will enable us to register (by the use of Newton's laws 
of motion) the comparative magnitudes of masses. The 
final results are to be found in engineers' pocket-books 
in tables of physical constants for physicists, and in 
astronomical tables. The verification is the concordant 
results of diverse experiments. One essential part of 
such theories is the judgment of circumstances which 
are sufficiently analogous to warrant the assumption of 
the same mass or the same magnitude of force in assign- 
ed diverse cases. Namely the theories depend upon the 
fact of recognition. 

4-5 It has been popular to define force as the product 
of mass and acceleration. The difficulty to be faced 
with this definition is that the familiar equation of 
elementary dynamics, namely, 

mf=P, 

now becomes mf= mf. 

It is not easy to understand how an important science 
can issue from such premisses. Furthermore the simple 
balancing of a weight by the tension of the supporting 
spring receives a very artificial meaning. With equal 
reason we might start with our theories of force as 
fundamental, and define mass as force divided by 
acceleration. Again we should be in equal danger of 
reducing dynamical equations to such identities as 

pif= p/f- 

Also the permanent mass of a bar of iron receives a very 
artificial meaning. 

2 2 



20 I. THE TRADITIONS OF SCIENCE 

5. The Ether. 5-1 The theory of stress between 
distant bodies, considered as an ultimate fact, was re- 
pudiated by Newton himself, but was adopted by some 
of his immediate successors. In the nineteenth century 
the belief in action at a distance has steadily lost ground. 

There are four definite scientific reasons for the 
adoption of the opposite theory of the transmission of 
stress through an intermediate medium which we will 
call the 'ether.' These reasons are in addition to the 
somewhat vague philosophic preferences, based on the 
disconnection involved in spatial and temporal separa- 
tion. In the first place, the wave theory of light also 
postulates an ether, and thus brings concurrent testi- 
mony to its existence. Secondly, Clerk Maxwell pro- 
duced the formulae for the stresses in such an ether 
which, if they exist, would account for gravitational, 
electrostatic, and magnetic attractions. No theory of 
the nature of the ether is thereby produced which in 
any way explains why such stresses exist ; and thus their 
existence is so far just as much a disconnected assump- 
tion as that of the direct stresses between distant bodies. 
Thirdly, Clerk Maxwell's equations of the electro- 
magnetic field presuppose events and physical pro- 
perties of apparently empty space. Accordingly there 
must be something, i.e. an ether, in the empty space 
to which these properties belong. These equations are 
now recognised as the foundations of the exact science 
of electromagnetism, and stand on a level with Newton's 
equations of motion. Thus another testimony is added 
to the existence of an ether. 

Lastly, Clerk Maxwell's identification of light with 
electromagnetic waves shows that the same ether is 
required by the apparently diverse optical and electro- 



THE FOUNDATIONS OF DYNAMICAL PHYSICS 21 

magnetic phenomena. The objection is removed that 
fresh properties have to be ascribed to the ether by each 
of the distinct lines of thought which postulate it. 

It will be observed that gravitation stands outside 
this unification of scientific theory due to Maxwell's 
work, except so far that we know the stresses in the 
ether which would produce it. 

5-2 The assumption of the existence of an ether at 
once raises the question as to its laws of motion. Thus 
in addition to the hierarchy of macroscopic and micro- 
scopic equations, there are the equations of motion for 
ether in otherwise empty space. The a priori reasons 
for believing that Newton's laws of motion apply to 
the ether are very weak, being in fact nothing more than 
the inductive extension of laws to cases widely dissimilar 
from those for which they have been verified. It is how- 
ever a sound scientific procedure to investigate whether 
the assumed properties of ether are explicable on the 
assumption that it is behaving like ordinary matter, if 
only to obtain suggestions by contrast for the formula- 
tion of the laws which do express its physical changes. 

The best method of procedure is to assume certain 
large principles deducible from Newton's laws and to 
interpret certain electromagnetic vectors as displace- 
ments and velocities of the ether. In this way Larmor 
has been successful in deducing Maxwell's equations 
from the principle of least action after making the 
necessary assumptions. In this he is only following a 
long series of previous scientists who during the nine- 
teenth century devoted themselves to the explanation 
of optical and electromagnetic phenomena. His work 
completes a century of very notable achievement in 
this field. 



22 I. THE TRADITIONS OF SCIENCE 

5-3 But it may be doubted whether this procedure 
is not an inversion of the more fundamental line of 
thought. It will have been noted that Newton's equa- 
tions, or any equivalent principles which are substituted 
for them, are in a sense merely blank forms. They 
require to be supplemented by hypotheses respecting 
the nature of the stresses, of the masses, and of the 
motions, before there can be any possibility of their 
application. Thus by the time that Newton's equations 
of motion are applied to the explication of etherial 
events there is a large accumulation of hypotheses 
respecting things of which we know very little. What 
in fact we do know about the ether is summed up in 
Maxwell's equations, or in recent adaptations of his 
equations such as those due to Lorentz. The discovery of 
electromagnetic mass and electromagnetic momentum 
suggests that, for the ether at least, we gain simpler 
conceptions of the facts by taking Maxwell's equations, 
or the Lorentz-Maxwell equations, as fundamental. 
Such equations would then be the ultimate microscopic 
equations, at least in the present stage of science, and 
Newton's equations become macroscopic equations 
which apply in certain definite circumstances to etherial 
aggregates. Such a procedure does not prejudge the 
debated theory of the purely electromagnetic origin of 
mass. 

5-4 The modern theory of the molecule is destructive 
of the obviousness of the prejudgment in favour of the 
traditional concepts of ultimate material at an instant. 
Consider a molecule of iron. It is composed of a central 
core of positive electricity surrounded by annular 
clusters of electrons, composed of negative electricity 
and rotating round the core. No single characteristic 



THE FOUNDATIONS OF DYNAMICAL PHYSICS 23 

property of iron as such can be manifested at an instant. 
Instantaneously there is simply a distribution of elec- 
tricity and Maxwell's equations to express our expecta- 
tions. But iron is not an expectation or even a recollec- 
tion. It is a fact; and this fact, which is iron, is what 
happens during a period of time. Iron and a biological 
organism are on a level in requiring time for functioning. 
There is no such thing as iron at an instant ; to be iron 
is a character of an event. Every physical constant 
respecting iron which appears in scientific tables is the 
register of such a character. What is ultimate in iron, 
according to the traditional theory, is instantaneous 
distributions of electricity; and this ultimateness is 
simply ascribed by reason of a metaphysical theory, 
and by no reason of observation. 

5-5 In truth, when we have once admitted the hier- 
archy of macroscopic and microscopic equations, the 
traditional concept is lost. For it is the macroscopic 
equations which express the facts of immediate observa- 
tion, and these equations essentially express the integral 
characters of events. But this hierarchy is necessitated 
by every concept of modern physics the molecular 
theory of matter, the dynamical theory of heat, the 
wave theory of light, the electromagnetic theory of 
molecules, the electromagnetic theory of mass. 

6. Maxwell's Equations*. 6-1 A discussion of 
Maxwell's equations would constitute a treatise on 
electromagnetism. But they exemplify some general 
considerations on physical laws. 

These equations (expressed for an axis-system a) 
involve for each point of space and each instant of time 
the vector quantities (F a , G a , # a ), (L a , M a , N a ) and 
* Cf. Appendix II to this chapter. 



24 I. THE TRADITIONS OF SCIENCE 

( a , v a9 w a ), namely the electric and magnetic 'forces' 
and the velocity of the charge of electricity. Now a 
vector involves direction ; and direction is not concerned 
with what is merely at that point. It is impossible to 
define direction without reference to the rest of space ; 
namely, it involves some relation to the whole of space. 
Again the equations involve the spatial differential 

^ o o 

operators z , r , r , which enter through the symbols 

dx a dy a dz a 

curl a and div a ; and they also involve the temporal 
differential operator . The differential coefficients 

vt a 

thus produced essentially express properties in the 
neighbourhood of the point (x a , y ay z a ) and of the time 
t a , and not merely properties at (x a , y a , z a , t a ). For a 
differential coefficient is a limit, and the limit of a 
function at a given value of its argument expresses a 
property of the aggregate of the values of the function 
corresponding to the aggregate of the values of the 
argument in the neighbourhood of the given value. 

This is essentially the same argument as that ex- 
pressed above in 1-2 for the particular case of motion. 
Namely, we cannot express the facts of nature as an 
aggregate of individual facts at points and at instants. 

6-2 In the Lorentz-Maxwell equations [cf. Ap- 
pendix II] there is no reference to the motion of the 
ether. The velocity (u a , v a , w a ) which appears in them 
is the velocity of the electric charge. What then are 
the equations* of motion of the ether ? Before we puzzle 
over this question, a preliminary doubt arises. Does 
the ether move? 

Certainly, if science is to be based on the data in- 
cluded in the Lorentz-Maxwell equations, even if the 



THE FOUNDATIONS OF DYNAMICAL. PHYSICS 25 

equations be modified, the motion of the ether does 
not enter into experience. Accordingly Lorentz assumes 
a stagnant ether : that is to say, an ether with no motion, 
which is simply the ultimate entity of which the vectors 
(F a , G a , H a ) and (L a , M a ,N a ) express properties. Such 
an ether has certainly a very shadowy existence; and 
yet we cannot assume that it moves, merely for the sake 
of giving it something to do. 

6-3 The ultimate facts contemplated in Maxwell's 
equations are the occurrences of p a (the volume- density 
of the charge), (u a , v w a ), (F a> G a , # a ), and (L tt , M a , N a ) 
at the space-time points in the neighbourhood surround- 
ing the space-time point (x ay y ay z a , t a ). But this is 
merely to say that the ultimate facts contemplated by 
Maxwell's equations are certain events which are oc- 
curring throughout all space. The material called ether 
is merely the outcome of a metaphysical craving. The 
continuity of nature is the continuity of events; and 
the doctrine of trai^mi^ion should be construed as a 
doctrine of the coextensiveness of events with space 1 - 
and time and of their reciprocal interaction. In this 
sense an ether can be admitted; but, in view of the 
existing implication of the term, clearness is gained by 
a distinction of phraseology. We shall term the tradi- 
tional ether an ' ether of material ' or a * material ether,' 
and shall employ the term ' ether of events ' to express 
the assumption of this enquiry, which may be loosely 
stated as being ' that something is going on everywhere 
and always.' It is our purpose to express accurately 
the relations between these events so far as they are 
disclosed by our perceptual experience, and in particular 
to consider those relations from which the essential 
concepts of Time, Space, and persistent material are 



26 I. THE TRADITIONS OF SCIENCE 

derived. Thus primarily we must not conceive of events 
as in a given Time, a given Space, and consisting of 
changes in given persistent material. Time, Space, and 
Material are adjuncts of events. On the old theory of 
relativity, Time and Space are relations between 
materials; on our theory they are relations between 
events. 



APPENDIX I TO CHAPTER II 
NEWTON'S LAWS OF MOTION 

Let (OaX a Y a Za) as in the accompanying figure be rect- 
angular axes at rest; let (x ap , y ap , z ap ) be the velocity of a 
material particle p of mass m at (x a , y a , z a ) relative to these 
axes, and let (x ap , ya p , %a p ) be the acceleration of the same 
particle. Also let (X ap , Y ap , Z ap ) be the force on the particle p. 
The first two of Newton's laws can be compressed into the 
equations 



(Xapj yap, *ap) 





N 



M 

Fig. i. 

It is unnecessary to trace the elementary consequences of 
these equations. 

The third law of motion considers a fundamental charac- 
teristic of force and is founded on the sound principle that all 



28 I. THE TRADITIONS OF SCIENCE 

agency is nothing else than relations between those entities 
which are among the ultimate data of science. The law is, 
Action and reaction are equal and opposite. This means that 
there must be particles p 1 ', p", p'" , etc. to whose agency 
(X ap , Y^ Zap) are due, and that we can write 

J\. ap == ** app' i ** app" T" 

Yap == Yapp' + Yapp" + 
Zap == Zapp' i Zapp" "T" < 

where (X app ' t Y app ', Z app ') is due to p' alone, (X app , Y ap p", 
Z ap p") to p" alone, and so on. 

Furthermore let the particle p' be at (xa',ya, %a) and (#' ap ', 
y'ap', z'ap) be the acceleration of/)'. Also let (X ap ', Yap', Z ap >) be 
the force on p' ; and let X ap ' p , Y ap ' p , etc. have meanings for p 9 
analogous to those which Xapp', etc. have for p. Then according 
to the third law the two forces 

(Xapp'i Yapp', Zapp') and (A a p-p, I ap'pt Zap'p) 

are equal and opposite, namely they are equal in magnitude, 
opposite in direction, and along the line joining p and />'. 
These requirements issue in two sets of equations 

**-app' T -&ap'p O; * app' ~r -* ap'p == O> ^app' ~r ^ap'p == O ^3^ 
and (yaZapp' - Z a Y app ') + (j'a'^ap'p - *a' ^ap'p) = O, . . .(4) 

with two analogous equations. 

The two equal and opposite forces on p and />', due to their 
mutual direct agency, namely, 

\Xapp', Yapp', Zapp) and (Xap'p, Yap'p, Z a p'p), 

together constitute what is called a * stress between/) and/)'/ 

Thus the third law of motion falls into three parts, symbolised 
by the three sets of equations (2), (3) and (4). The set (2) ex- 
presses that all force on matter is due to stresses between it 
and other ma'tter; and sets (3) and (4) express the two funda- 
mental characteristics of stresses. We need not stop to enquire 
whether the short verbal expression of the law logically expresses 
these three properties. This is a minor point of exposition 
dependent on the context in which this formulation of the law 
is found. 



APPENDIX II TO CHAPTER II 
MAXWELL'S EQUATIONS 

It will be convenient to state these equations in the slightly 
modified form which is due to Lorentz. Space is referred to 
the fixed rectangular axis system a, as in subarticle 6-1. It will 
be necessary to explain a few small points of nomenclature and 
notation. 

A vector is a directed physical quantity; for example, the 
electric force at a point is a vector. This example also shows 
that we have to conceive vectors which have analogous signi- 
fications at different points of space. Such a vector is the electric 
force which may have a distinct magnitude and direction at 
each point of space, but expresses at all points one definite 
physical fact. Such a vector will be a function of its position, 
that is to say, of the coordinates of the point (x a , y a , z a ) of which 
it is that characteristic vector. 

Let (Xa., Y a , Z a ) be any such vector. Then X a and Y a and 
Z a are each of them functions of (x a , y a , z a ) and also of the time 
/ a , i.e. they are functions of x at y a , Za, t a . We shall assume that 
our physical quantities are differentiable, except possibly at 
exceptional points. 

Let q(X a , Y a , Z a ) stand for (qX a > qY a , qZ a ), and analogously 

d (X Y Z^for ( dXa ^ 
( " a ' a) ' 



i j* /v T7 *7\r U-A-a , ^ -* a . u^a 

also div a (* a , Y a , Z.) for _ + -^ + g- 

and curia (X a , Y a , Z a ) for the vector 



_ 

dy a dz a ' dz a dx a ' dx a dy a ' 
Finally if (X a ' ', Y a '> Z a ') be another vector at the same point, 
then [(x*', Ya!, Z a ') . (X a , Y a , Z fl )] 



3 o I. THE TRADITIONS OF SCIENCE 

stands for what is called the ' vector product* of the two vectors, 
namely the vector 

( Y a Z a Z a *a > Z a ^-a ^a Z a > -^-a Y a. Y a Xa). 

It is evident that curl a (X a , Y a , Z a ) can be expressed in the 
symbolic form 



The vector equation 

(X a , Ya, Za) = (X a , Y a , Za') 

is an abbreviation of the three equations 

V" __ V ' V V ' 7 _ 7 ' 

<A-a -A-a , JL a J- a > ^a ^a 

Let (F a , G a , ^fa) be the electric force at (x a , y a , z a , t a ) t and let 
(L tt , M a , N a ) be the magnetic force at the same point and time. 
Also let p a be the volume density of the electric charge and 
(u a , v a , w a ) its velocity ; and let (Pa, Q a , R a ) be the ponderomotive 
force: all equally at (x a , y a , ^a, ^a). Finally let c be the velocity 
of light in vacua. 

Then Lorentz's form of Maxwell's equations is 

diVa(F a , G a , H a ) = p, ..... ................. (l) 

div a (L a , M a , N a ) = O, ..................... ( 2 ) 

M a , N a ) = - \ ^ (F a , G a , H a ) + pa (a, ^a, ^a) [ , (3) 
F a , G a , H a ) = -- ^- (L a , M a , 7V a ), ......... (4) 



(Pa, Qa, Ra) = (Pa, G a , ft) + [(tt B , , ) . (L a , M a , AT a )J. (5) 

It will be noted that each of the vector equations (3), (4), 
(5) stands for three ordinary equations, so that there are eleven 
equations in the five formulae. 



CHAPTER III 
SCIENTIFIC RELATIVITY 

7. , Consentient Sets, j-i A traveller in a railway 
carriage sees a fixed point of the carriage. The way- 
side stationmaster knows that the traveller has been in 
fact observing a track of points reaching from London 
to Manchester. The stationmaster notes his station 
as fixed in the earth. A being in the sun conceives the 
station as exhibiting a track in space round the sun, 
and the railway carriage as marking out yet another 
track. Thus if space be nothing but relations between 
material bodies, points as simple entities disappear. 
For a point according to one type of observation is a 
track of points according to another type. Galileo and 
the Inquisition are only in error in the single affirmation 
in which they both agreed, namely that absolute position 
is a physical fact the sun for Galileo and the earth for 
the Inquisition. 

7-2 Thus each rigid body defines its own space, with 
its own points, its own lines, and its own surfaces. Two 
bodies may agree in their spaces; namely, what is a 
point for either may be a point for both. Also if a third 
body agrees with either, it will agree with both. The 
complete set of bodies, actual or hypothetical, which 
agree in their space-formation will be called a * con- 
sentient' set. 

The relation of a ' dissentient ' body to the space of 
a consentient set is that of motion through it. The 
dissentient body will itself belong to another con- 
sentient set. Every body of this second set will have a 



32 I. THE TRADITIONS OF SCIENCE 

motion in the space of the first set which has the same 
general spatial characteristics as every other body of 
the second consentient set; namely (in technical lan- 
guage) it will at any instant be a screw motion with the 
same axis, the same pitch and the same intensity 
in short the same screw-motion for all bodies of the 
second set. Thus we will speak of the motion of one 
consentient set in the space of another consentient set. 
For example such a motion may be translation without 
rotation, and the translation may be uniform or ac- 
celerated. 

7-3 Now observers in both consentient sets agree as 
to what is happening. From different standpoints in 
nature they both live through the same events, which 
in their entirety are all that there is in nature. The 
traveller and the stationmaster both agree as to the 
existence of a certain event for the traveller it is the 
passage of the station past the train, and for the station- 
master it is the passage of the train past the station. 
The two sets of observers merely diverge in setting the 
same events in different frameworks of space and 
(according to the modern doctrine) also of time. 

This spatio-temporal framework is not an arbitrary 
convention. Classification is merely an indication of 
characteristics which are already there. For example, 
botanical classification by stamens and pistils and petals 
applies to flowers, but not to men. Thus the space of 
the consentient set is a fact of nature ; the traveller with 
the set only discovers it. 

8. Kinematic Relations. 8-1 The theory of relative 
motion is the comparison of the motion of a consentient 
set )8 in the space of a consentient set a with the motion 
of a in the space of /?. This involves a preliminary 



SCIENTIFIC RELATIVITY 33 

comparison of the space of a with the space of /?. Such 
a comparison can only be made by reference to events 
which are facts common to all observers, thus showing 
the fundamental character of events in the formation 
of space and time. The ideally simple event is one in- 
definitely restricted both in spatial and in temporal 
extension, namely the instantaneous point. We will 
use the term 'event-particle' in the sense of 'instan- I > 
taneous point-event.' The exact meaning of the ideal V 
restriction in extension of an event-particle will be 
investigated in Part III; here we will assume that the 
concept has a determinate signification. 

8-2 An , event-particle occupies instantaneously a 
certain point in the space of a and a certain point in 
the space of /?. Thus instantaneously there is a certain 
correlation between the points of the space of a and 
the points of the space of p. Also if the particle has 
the character of material at rest at the point in the space 
of a, this material-particle has a certain velocity in the 
space of fi ; and if it be material at rest at the point in 
the space of 0, the material-particle has a certain 
velocity in the space of a. The direction in -space of 
the velocity due to rest in the correlated a-point is said 
to be opposite to the direction in a-space of the velocity 
due to rest in the correlated /?-point. Also with con- 
gruent units of space and of time, the measures of 
the velocities are numerically equal. The consequences 
of these fundamental facts are investigated in Part 
III. The relation of the a-space to the -space 
which is expressed by the velocities at points in 
a-space due to rest in the points of /?-space and by 
the opposite velocities in -space due to rest in the 
points of a-space is called the 'kinematic relation* / 

w. 3 



34 I. THE TRADITIONS OF SCIENCE 

between the two consentient sets, or between the two 
spaces. 

83 The simplest form of this kinematic relation 
between a pair of consentient sets is when the motion 
of either set in the space of the other is a uniform trans- 
lation without acceleration and without rotation. Such 
a kinematic relation will be called^ 'simple/ If a con- 
sentient group a has a simple kinematic relation to each 
of two consentient sets, and y, then and y have 
a simple kinematic relation to each other. In technical 
logical language a simple kinematic relation is sym- 
metrical and transitive. 

The whole group of consentient sets with simple kine- 
matic relations to any one consentient set, including that 
set itself, is called a * simple' group of consentient sets. 

The kinematic relation is called * translatory ' when 
the relative motion does not involve rotation; namely, 
it is a translation but not necessarily uniform. 

8-4 The fact that the relational theory of space in- 
volves that each consentient set has its own space with 
its own peculiar points is ignored in the traditional 
presentation of physical science. The reason is that 
the absolute theory of space is not really abandoned, 
and the relative motion, which is all that can be ob- 
served, is treated as the differential effect of two absolute 
motions. 

8*5 In the enunciation of Newton's Laws of Motion, 
the velocities and accelerations of particles must be 
supposed to refer to the space of some given consentient 
set. Evidently the acceleration of a particle is the same 
in all the spaces of a simple group of consentient sets 
at least this has hitherto been the unquestioned as- 
sumption. Recently this assumption has been ques- 



SCIENTIFIC RELATIVITY 35 

tioned and does not hold in the new theory of relativity. 
Its axiomatic obviousness only arises from the covert 
assumption of absolute space. In the new theory 
Newton's equations themselves require some slight 
modification which need not be considered at this stage 
of the discussion. 

In either form, their traditional form or their modified 
form, Newton's equations single out one and only one 
simple group of consentient sets, and require that the 
motions of matter be referred to the space of any one 
of these sets. If the proper group be chosen the third 
law of action and reaction holds. But if the laws hold 
for one simple group, they cannot hold for any other 
such group. For the apparent forces on particles cannot 
then be analysed into reciprocal stresses in the space of 
any set not a member of the original simple group. 

Let the simple group for which the laws do hold be 
called the * Newtonian' group. 

8-6 Then, for example, if a consentient set a have 
a non-uniform translator^ kinematic relation to mem- 
bers of the Newtonian group, the particles of the 
material universe would, when their motions are 
referred to the a-space, appear to be acted on by forces 
parallel to a fixed direction, in the same sense along that 
direction, and proportional to the mass of the particle 
acted on. Such an assemblage of forces cannot be 
expressed as an assemblage of reciprocal stresses be- 
tween particles. Again if a consentient set ft have a 
non-translatory kinematic relation to the members of 
the Newtonian group, then, when motion is referred 
to the /?-space, ' centrifugal ' and ' composite centrifugal ' 
forces on particles make their appearance; and these 
forces cannot be reduced to stresses. 

32 



36 I. THE TRADITIONS OF SCIENCE 

87 The physical consequences of this result are best 
seen by taking a particular case. The earth is rotating 
and its parts are held together by their mutual gravi- 
tational attractions. The result is that the figure bulges 
at the equator; and, after allowing for the deficiencies 
of our observational knowledge, the results of theory 
and experiment are in fair agreement. 

The dynamical theory of this investigation does not 
depend on the existence of any material body other 
than the earth. Suppose that the rest of the material 
universe were annihilated, or at least any part of it 
which is visible to our eye-sight. Why not? For after 
all there is a very small volume of visible matter com- 
pared to the amount of space available for it. So there 
is no reason to assume anything very essential in the 
existence of a few planets and a few thousand stars. 
We are left with the earth rotating. But rotating 
relatively to what ? For on the relational theory it would 
seem to be the mutual relations of the earth's parts 
which constitute space. And yet the dynamical theory 
of the bulge does not refer to any body other than the 
earth, and so is not affected by the catastrophe of 
annihilation. It has been asserted that after all the 
fixed stars are essential, and that it is the rotation 
relatively to them which produces the bulge. But 
surely this ascription of the centrifugal force on the 
earth's surface to the influence of Sirius is the last 
refuge of a theory in distress. The point is that the 
physical properties, size, and distance of Sirius do not 
seem to matter. The more natural deduction (on the 
theory of Newtonian relativity) is to look on the result 
as evidence that the theory of any empty space is an 
essential impossibility. Accordingly the absoluteness of 



SCIENTIFIC RELATIVITY 37 

direction is evidence for the existence of the material 
ether. This result only reinforces a conclusion which 
has already been reached on other grounds. Thus space 
expresses mutual relations of the parts of the ether, 
as well as of the parts of the earth. 

9. Motion through the Ether. 9-1 The existence of 
the material ether should discriminate between the 
consentient sets of the Newtonian group. For one 
such set will be at rest relatively to the ether, and the 
remaining sets will be moving through it with definite 
velocities. It becomes a problem to discover pheno- 
mena dependent on such velocities. 

Can any phenomena be detected which are unequi- 
vocally due to a quasi-absolute motion of the earth 
through the ether? For this purpose we must put aside 
phenomena which depend on the differential velocities 
of two bodies of matter, e.g. the earth and a planet, or 
a star. For such phenomena are evidently primarily 
due to the relative velocity of the two bodies to each 
other, and the velocities relatively to the ether only 
arise as a hypothetical intermediate explanatory analysis. 
We require phenomena concerned solely with the 
earth, which are modified by the earth's motion through 
the ether without reference to any other matter. We 
have already concluded that the bulging of the earth 
at the equator is one such required instance, unless 
indeed (with Newton) we assume absolute space. 

9-2 The effects on the observed light due to the 
relative motions of the emitting body and the receiving 
body are various and depend in part on the specific 
nature of the assumed disturbances which constitute 
light. Some of these effects have been observed, for 
example, aberration and the effect on the spectrum 



38 I. THE TRADITIONS OF SCIENCE 

due to the motion of the emitting body in the line of 
sight. Aberration is the apparent change in the direc- 
tion of the luminous body due to the motion of the 
receiving body. The motion of the luminous body in 
the line of sight should alter the wave length of the 
emitted light due to molecular vibrations of given 
periodicity. In other words, it should alter the quality 
of the light due to such vibrations. These are the effects 
which have been observed, but they are of the type 
which we put aside as not relevant to our purpose 
owing to the fact that the observed effect ultimately 
depends merely on the relative motion of the emitting 
and receiving bodies. 

9-3 There are effects on interference fringes which 
we should expect to be due to the motion of the earth. 
In six months the velocity of the earth in its orbit is 
reversed. So that such effects as the earth's motion 
produces in the interference fringes of a certain purely 
terrestrial apparatus at one time can be compared with 
the corresponding effects in the same apparatus which 
it produces after the lapse of six months and as the 
experiments have been carried out the differences 
should have been easily discernible. No such differences 
have been observed. The effects, which are thus sought 
for, depend on no special theory of the nature of 
the luminous disturbance in the ether. They should 
result from the simple fact of the wave disturbance, 
and the magnitude .of its velocity relatively to the 
apparatus. 

It will be observed that the difficulty which arises 
from the absence of this predicted effect does not dis- 
criminate in any way between the philosophic theories 
of absolute or of relative space. The effect should arise 



SCIENTIFIC RELATIVITY 39 

from the motion of the earth relatively to the ether, 
and there is such relative motion whichever of the 
alternative spatial theories be adopted. 

9-4 Electromagnetic phenomena are also implicated 
in the theory of relative motion. Maxwell's equations 
of the electromagnetic field hold in respect to these 
phenomena an analogous position to that occupied by 
Newton's equations of motion for the explanation of 
the motion of matter. They differ from Newton's 
equations very essentially in their relation to the prin- 
ciple of relativity. Newton's equations single out no 
special member of the Newtonian group to which they 
specially apply. They are invariant for the spatio- 
temporal transformations from one such set to another 
within the Newtonian group. 

But Maxwell's electromagnetic equations are not 
thus invariant for the Newtonian group. The result 
is that they must be construed as referring to one par- 
ticular consentient set of this group. It is natural to 
suppose that this particular assumption arises from the 
fact that the equations refer to the physical properties 
of a stagnant ether ; and that accordingly the consentient 
set presupposed in the equations is the consentient set 
of this ether. The ether is identified with the ether 
whose wave disturbances constitute light ; and further- 
more there are practically conclusive reasons for 
believing light to be merely electromagnetic disturb- 
ances which are governed by Maxwell's equations. 

The motion of the earth through the ether affects 
other electromagnetic phenomena in addition to those 
known to us as light. Such effects, as also in the case 
of light, would be very small and difficult to observe. 
But the effect on the capacity of a condenser of the 



4 o I. THE TRADITIONS OF SCIENCE 

six-monthly reversal of the earth's velocity should 
under proper conditions be observable. This is 
known as Trouton's experiment. Again, as in the 
analogous case of light, no such effect has been 
observed. 

9-5 The explanation [the Fitzgerald-Lorentz hypo- 
thesis] of these failures to observe expected effects has 
been given, that matter as it moves through ether 
automatically readjusts its shape so that its lengths in 
the direction of motion are altered in a definite ratio 
dependent on its velocity. The null results of the 
experiments are thus completely accounted for, and 
the material ether evades the most obvious method of 
testing its existence. If matter is thus strained by its 
passage through ether, some effect on its optical pro- 
perties due to the strains might be anticipated. Such 
effects have been sought for, but not observed. Ac- 
cordingly with the assumption of an ether of material 
the negative results of the various experiments are ex- 
plained by an ad hoc hypothesis which appears to be 
related to no other phenomena in nature. 

9-6 There is another way in which the motion of 
matter may be balanced (so to speak) against the velocity 
of light. Fizeau experimented on the passage of light 
through translucent moving matter, and obtained 
results which Fresnel accounted for by multiplying 
the refractive index of the moving medium by a co- 
efficient dependent on its velocity. This is Fresnel's 
famous 'coefficient of drag.' He accounted for this 
coefficient by assuming that as the material medium in 
its advance sucks in the ether, it condenses it in a 
proportion dependent on the velocity. It might be 
expected that any theory of the relations of matter to 



SCIENTIFIC RELATIVITY 41 

ether, either an ether of material or an ether of events, 
would explain also this coefficient of drag. 

]Q. Formulae for Relative Motion. 10-1 In trans- 
forming the equations of motion from the space of 
one member of the Newtonian group to the space of 
another member of that group, it must be remembered 
that the facts which are common to the two standpoints 
are the events, and that the ideally simple analysis 
exhibits events as dissected into collections of event- 
particles. Thus if a and p be the two consentient sets, 
the points of the a-space are distinct from the points 
of the -space, but the same event-particle e is at the 
point P a at the time T a in the a-space and is at the point 
Pp at the time Tp in the -space. 

With the covert assumption of absolute space which 
is habitual in the traditional outlook, it is tacitly as- 
sumed that P a and Pp are the same point and that there 
is a common time and common measurement of time 
which are the same for all consentient sets. The first 
assumption is evidently very badly founded and cannot 
easily be reconciled to the nominal scientific creed ; the 
second assumption seems to embody a deeply rooted 
experience. The corresponding formulae of trans- 
formation which connect the measurements of space, 
velocity, and acceleration in the a-system for space and 
time with the corresponding measurements in the 
jS-system certainly are those suggested by common sense 
and in their results they agree very closely with the 
result of careful observation. These formulae are the 
ordinary formulae of dynamical treatises. For such 
transformations the Newtonian equations are invariant 
within the Newtonian group. 

10-2 But, as we have seen, this invariance, with these 



4 2 I. THE TRADITIONS OF SCIENCE 

formulae for transformation, does not extend to Max- 
well's equations for the electromagnetic field. The 
conclusion is that still assuming these formulae for 
transformation Maxwell's equations apply to the 
electromagnetic field as referred to one particular 
consentient set of the Newtonian group. It is natural 
to suppose that this set should be that one with respect 
to which the stagnant ether is at rest. Namely, stating 
the same fact conversely, the stagnant ether defines 
this consentient set. There would be no difficulty about 
this conclusion except for the speculative character of 
the material ether, and the failure to detect the evidences 
of the earth's motion through it. This consentient set 
defined by the ether would for all practical purposes 
define absolute space. 

10-3 There are however other formulae of trans- 
formation from the space and time measurements of 
set a to the space and time measurements of set j8 for 
which Maxwell's equations are invariant. These for- 
mulae were discovered first by Lannor for uncharged 
regions of the field and later by Lorentz for the general 
case of regions charged or uncharged. Larmor and 
Lorentz treated their discovery from its formal mathe- 
matical side. This aspect of it is important. It enables 
us, when we thoroughly understand the sequence of 
events in one electromagnetic field, to deduce innumer- 
able other electromagnetic fields which will be under- 
stood equally well. All mathematicians will appreciate 
what an advance in knowledge this constitutes. 

But Lorentz also pointed out that if these formulae for 
transformation could be looked on as the true formulae 
for transformation from one set to another of the 
Newtonian group, then all the unsuccessful experiments 



SCIENTIFIC RELATIVITY 43 

to detect the earth's motion through the ether could 
be explained. Namely, the results of the experiments 
are such as theory would predict. 

10-4 The general reason for this conclusion was given 
by Einstein in a theorem of the highest importance. 
He proved that the Lorentzian formulae of transfor- 
mation from one consentient set to another of the 
Newtonian group from set a to set are the neces- 
sary and sufficient conditions that motion with the one 
particular velocity c (the velocity of light in vacua) in 
one of the sets, a or 0, should also appear as motion 
with the same magnitude c in the other set, $ or a. The 
phenomena of aberration will be preserved owing to 
the relation between the directions of the velocity 
expressing the movements in a-space and /2-space 
respectively. This preservation of the magnitude of a 
special velocity (however directed) cannot arise with 
the traditional formulae for relativity. It practically 
means that waves or other influences advancing with 
velocity c as referred to the space of any consentient 
set of the Newtonian group will also advance with the 
same velocity c as referred to the space of any other 
such set. 

10-5 At first sight the two formulae for trans- 
formation, namely the traditional formulae and the 
Lorentzian formulae, appear to be very different. We 
notice however that, if a and j8 be the two consentient 
sets and if V^ be the velocity of j8 in the a-space and 
of a in the -space, the differences between the two 
formulae all depend upon the square of the ratio of 
V a p to c, where c is the velocity of light in vacuo, and are 
negligible in proportion to the smallness of this number. 
For ordinary motions, even planetary motions, this 



44 I. THE TRADITIONS OF SCIENCE 

ratio is extremely small and its square is smaller still. 
Accordingly the differences between the two formulae 
would not be perceptible under ordinary circumstances. 
In fact the effect of the difference would only be per- 
ceived in those experiments, already discussed, whose 
results have been in entire agreement with the Lorentz- 
ian formulae. 

The conclusion at once evokes the suggestion that 
the Lorentzian formulae are the true formulae for 
transformation from the space and time relations of a 
consentient set a to those of a consentient set j8, both 
sets belonging to the Newtonian group. We may 
suppose that, owing to bluntness of perception, mankind 
has remained satisfied with the Newtonian formulae 
which are a simplified version of the true Lorentzian 
relations. This is the conclusion that Einstein has 
urged. 

O 



Fig. 2. 

10-6 These Lorentzian formulae for transformation 
involve two consequences which are paradoxical if we 
covertly assume absolute space and absolute time. Let 
a and j8 be two consentient sets of the Newtonian group. 
Let an event-particle P happen at the point P a in the 
a-space and at the point Pp in the -space, and let 
another event-particle Q happen at points Q a and Qp 
in the two spaces respectively. Then according to the 
traditional scientific outlook, P a and Pp are not dis- 
criminated from each other ; and similarly for Q a andjj^. 
Thus evidently the distance P a Q a is (on this theory) 



SCIENTIFIC RELATIVITY 45 

equal to PpQp, because in fact they are symbols for 
the same distance. But if the true distinction between 
the a-space and the ^-space is kept in mind, including 
the fact that the points in the two spaces are radically 
distinct, the equality of the distances P a Q a and PpQp 
is not so obvious. According to the Lorentzian for- 
mulae such corresponding distances in the two spaces 
will not in general be equal. 

The second consequence of the Lorentzian formulae 
involves a more deeply rooted paradox which concerns 
our notions of time. If the two event-particles P and O 
happen simultaneously when referred to the points 
P a and Q a in the a-space, they will in general not happen 
simultaneously when referred to the points Pp and Qp 
in the -space. This result of the Lorentzian formulae 
contradicts the assumption of one absolute time, and 
makes the time-system depend on the consentient set 
which is adopted as the standard of reference. Thus 
there is an a-timaas well as an a-space, and a /?-time 
as well as a /S-space. 

10-7 The explanation of the similarities and differ- 
ences between spaces and times derived from different 
consentient sets of the Newtonian group, and of the 
fact of there being a Newtonian group at all, will be 
derived in Parts II and III of this enquiry from a con- 
sideration of the general characteristics of our percep- 
tive knowledge of nature, which is our whole knowledge 
of nature. In seeking such an explanation one principle 
may be laid down. Time and space are among the 
fundamental physical facts yielded by our knowledge 
of the external world. We cannot rest content with 
any theory of them which simply takes mathematical 
equations involving four variables (x, y, z> t) and 



4 6 I. THE TRADITIONS OF SCIENCE 

interprets (x, y, z) as space coordinates and t as a 
measure of time, merely on the ground that some 

(physical law is thereby expressed. This is not an inter- 
pretation of what we mean by space and time. What we 
mean are physical facts expressible in terms of im- 
mediate perceptions; and it is incumbent on us to 
produce the perceptions of those facts as the meanings 
of our terms. 

Einstein has interpreted the Lorentzian formulae in 
terms of what we will term the 'message' theory, 
discussed in the next chapter. 



47 



APPENDIX TO CHAPTER III 

Let a and ($ be two consentient sets of the Newtonian group. 
Let (O a X a Y a Z a ) be the rectangular axis system in the space 
of , and (Ofi'Xp F/Z/) be the rectangular axis system in the 
space of f$. 

First consider the traditional theory of relativity. Then the 
time-system is independent of the consentient set of reference. 





Fig. 3- 

At the time t let the event-particle which instantaneously 
happens at the point O a in the space of a happen at Op in the 
space of j8, and let the event-particle which happens at Op in 
the space of j8 happen at O a ' in the space of a. Let the axis 
O a X a be in the direction of the motion of ft in the a-space, and 
the axis Op'Xp be in the direction reversed of the motion of 
a in the /?-space. Also let O/ be so chosen that O a ' lies on O a X a . 
Then the event-particles at the instant t which happen on O a X a 
are the event-particles which happen at the instant t onOp'Xp'. 
Also we choose OpY? and Op'Zp so that the event-particles 
which happen at time t on O/iy and O/Z/ respectively 
happen on straight lines in the a-space which are parallel to 
O a Ya and O a Z a . Let F a/3 be the velocity of in a-space and 



48 I. THE TRADITIONS OF SCIENCE 

Vp a be the velocity of a in /?-space. Then (with a suitable origin 

of time) 

V* + Vpa = o, ) 

O a Oa'=00<V, \ ............ (I) 

X a = Xp + V a pt, y a = yp, Za. = %fi] 

These are the 'Newtonian' formulae for relative motion. 

Secondly consider the Lorentzian [or 'electromagnetic'] 
theory of relativity. The two time-systems for reference to 
a and for reference to j8 respectively are not identical. Let t a 
be the measure of the lapse of time in the a-system, and tp be 
the measure of the lapse of time in the /S-system. The dis- 
tinction between the two time-systems is embodied in the fact 
that event-particles which happen simultaneously at time t a 
in a-space do not happen simultaneously throughout space j$. 
Thus supposing that an event-particle happens at (# a , jVa, #a, t a ) 
in a-space and a-time and at (xp,yp, %p, tp) in /?-space and /3-time, 
we seek for the formulae which are to replace equations (i) of 
the Newtonian theory. 

As before let O a X a lie in the direction of the motion of j8 in a, 
and Op'Xp in the reverse direction of the motion of a in /3. 
Also let Oa lie on O a Xa, so that event-particles which happen 
on O a X a also happen on Op'Xp' . One connection between the 
two time-systems is secured by the rule that event-particles 
which happen simultaneously at points in a-space on a plane 
perpendicular to O a X a also happen simultaneously at points in 
jS-space on a plane perpendicular to Op'Xp . Accordingly the 
quasi-parallelism of O a Y a to Op'Yp, and of O a Z a to Op'Zp, is 
defined and secured in the same way as for Newtonian relativity. 

The same meaning as above will be given to V a p and Vp a ', 
also c is the fundamental velocity which is the velocity of light 
in vacua . Then we define 

Q*-Q(i.-!V/<3-' ................ (2) 

The formulae for transformation are 



tp = a a - aa, , . . 



APPENDIX 49 

These formulae are symmetrical as between a and j3, so that 



It is evident that when V^\c is small, 



and when x a and Xp are not too large 

Xp == XQ, V o,p *a . 

Thus the formulae reduce to the Newtonian type. 

T , r dx a - . . r dxp 

Let # a , y a , z a stand for -77- , etc., and xp t yp, Zp for -~, etc. 

ai a dtp 

Then it follows immediately from the preceding formulae that 



.(5) 



With the notation of Appendix II to Chapter II, the formulae 
of transformation for Maxwell's equations are 



and 



and 



= n 0? (AT. + ^f H^ , 









w. 



50 I. THE TRADITIONS OF SCIENCE 

where (u a , v a > w a ) is the velocity of the charge at (x a , y a , %a) at 
the time t a . 

Also it immediately follows from formulae (5) that 



Hence 

(V + V + V-c 8 ) and 
vanish together. This proves Einstein's theorem on the in- 
variance of the velocity , so far as concerns the sufficiency of 
the Lorentzian formulae to produce that result. 



CHAPTER IV 
CONGRUENCE 

//. Simultaneity, n-i Einstein analysed the ideas 
of time-order and of simultaneity. Primarily (according 
to his analysis) time-order only refers to the succession 
of events at a given place. Accordingly each given 
place has its own time-order. But these time-orders 
are not independent in the system of nature, and their 
correlation is known to us by means of physical measure- 
ments. Now ultimately all physical measurement 
depends upon coincidence in time and place. If P l 
and P 2 be two places, the time-orders O l and O 2 which 
belong to P 1 and P 2 are correlated by observations of 
coincidences at P l and at P 2 respectively. 

Thus, confining ourselves to the two places P and P 2 , 
there are two distinct processes of correlating the time- 
order of events throughout the universe, namely by 
a series of observations of coincidences at P based on 
time-order O and by a series of observations of coin- 
cidences at P 2 based on time-order O 2 . These two 
processes are distinct and will only agree by some 
accident of special circumstance. 

1 1 -2 What are the observations at P 1 which will 
assign to an event at P 2 a position in the time-order O l ? 
Suppose some message a wave disturbance, for ex- 
ample starts from P 1 when event e l happens at P x , 
reaches P 2 when event e 2 happens at P 2 , and is 
immediately reflected so as to return to P 1 when 
event /' happens at P x . Now according to the 
method of time-measurement for O x , there is an event 

42 



52 I. THE TRADITIONS OF SCIENCE 

/ which happens at mid-time between e l and e . 
Then, when certain conditions have been fulfilled, the 
event e 2 at P 2 is defined as simultaneous with the event 
e at P! according to the method of correlation appro- 
priate to place Pj. In this way a time-order of events 
at P 2 is derived solely from observation of coincidence 
at P x and is based solely on the fundamental time-order 
Oj at Pj. Thus the time-order at P 1 is extended as a 
time-order for all events at all places. 

11-3 There are questions which require elucidation 
before this definition can be understood. What is a 
place? We have chosen a vague term on purpose, so 
as to postpone its consideration until now. A place can 
only be marked by phenomena capable of recognition, for 
example the continued appearance of a material body. 
Thus we must construe P x and P 2 to be the names of 
material bodies, or of persistent sets of circumstances 
which will serve the same purpose. In general P x 
and P 2 will be in relative motion with respect to each 
other. 

What of the message which passes from P 1 to P 2 
and back to P x ? Its transmission must be uniform. 
Suppose the message travels with velocity c, that is, 
with the velocity of light in vacuo. Then, assuming the 
electromagnetic formulae for relativity, this velocity 
relative to Pj is independent (so far as its magnitude 
is concerned) of the velocity which we ascribe to P t 
through space. 

1 1 -4 Thus our recording body P 3 can be any body 
at rest in some consentient set of the Newtonian group, 
and we reckon motion as relative to the space of this 
set. We send our message with the velocity of light 
in vacuo. Then, according to the local time-order O x 



CONGRUENCE 53 

at P 19 the event e 2 at P 2 is simultaneous with the event 
/ at P x . This definition of simultaneity in the local 
time-order at P x is independent of any assumption of 
absolute rest for P l9 provided that the electromagnetic 
formulae for relativity are adopted. The local time- 
order at P 1 is also in complete agreement with the local 
time-order at any body Q l which is rigidly connected 
with P I9 i.e. which belongs to the same consentient 
set. 

1 1 '5 The reason why the velocity of light has been 
adopted as the standard velocity in the definition of 
simultaneity is because the negative results of the ex- 
periments to determine the earth's motion require that 
this velocity, which is the ' c' of Maxwell's equations, 
should have this property. Also light signals are after 
all our only way of detecting distant events. 

Certainly, once granting the idea of time-order being 
a local affair connected with a specific body P 19 the 
acceptance of the electromagnetic formula connecting 
t a and tp is a slight affair. There is no presumption 
against it, once granting the conception of diverse 
time-orders which had not hitherto been thought of. 

1 1 -6 But there are certain objections to the accept- 
ance of Einstein's definition of simultaneity, the 
'signal-theory' as we will call it. In the first place 
light signals are very important elements in our lives, 
but still we cannot but feel that the signal-theory 
somewhat exaggerates their position. The very meaning 
of simultaneity is made to depend on them. There are 
blind people and dark cloudy nights, and neither blind 
people nor people in the dark are deficient in a sense 
of simultaneity. They know quite well what it means 
to bark both their shins at the same instant. In fact 



54 I. THE TRADITIONS OF SCIENCE 

the determination of simultaneity in this way is never 
made, and if it could be made would not be accurate ; 
for we live in air and not in vacuo. 

Also there are other physical messages from place to 
place; there is the transmission of material bodies, the 
transmission of sound, the transmission of waves and 
ripples on the surface of water, the transmission of nerve 
excitation through the body, and innumerable other 
forms which enter into habitual experience. The trans- 
mission of light is only one form among many. 

Furthermore local time does not concern one material 
particle only. The same definition of simultaneity holds 
throughout the whole space of a consentient set in the 
Newtonian group. The message theory does not ac- 
count for the consentience in time-reckoning which 
characterises a consentient set, nor does it account for 
the fundamental position of the Newtonian group. 

12. Congruence and Recognition. 12-1 Again the 
theory that measurement is essentially coincidence re- 
quires severe qualification. For if it were true only 
coincident things, coincident both in time and space, 
could be equal, yet measurement can only be of the 
slightest importance in so far as some other element 
not coincidence enters into it. 

Let us take a simple example. Two footrules are 
placed together and are found to coincide. Then at 
the moment of coincidence they are equal in length. 
But what is the use of that information ? We want to 
use one rule to-morrow in London and the other rule 
a week hence in Manchester, and to know that the stuffs 
which they measure are of equal length. Now we 
know that, provided they are made of certain sorts of 
material (luckily, materials easy to procure) and treated 



CONGRUENCE 55 

with certain precautions (luckily, precautions easy to 
observe), the footrules will not have altered their lengths 
to any extent which can be detected. But that means a 
direct judgment of constancy. Without such a judg- 
ment in some form or other, measurement becomes 
trivial. 

12-2 It may be objected that whenever the footrules 
are brought together, or when stuffs measured by them 
are brought together, the coincidences will be observed ; 
and that this is all we need for the importance of 
measurement. 

But the coincidences will not be observed unless the 
circumstances of the various experiments are suffi- 
ciently uniform. The stuffs must be under the same 
tension or at the same temperatures as on previous 
occasions. Sooner or later and somehow or other a 
judgment of constancy, that is, of the preservation of 
property, is required. Ultimately this judgment reposes 
upon direct common sense; namely, obviously the foot- 
rule is of good stiff material and has not perceptibly 
changed amid slight differences of circumstance. The 
coincidences which can easily be obtained between 
lengths of elastic thread inspire no such beliefs, because 
evidently the thread has been stretched. 

12-3 Again, in Einstein's own example, there is the 
direct judgment of the uniformity of conditions for the 
uniform transmission of light. Thus any ordinary event 
among the fixed stars does not affect this uniformity 
for the transmission from the sun to the earth. 
Apart from such presuppositions, so obvious that 
they do not enter into consciousness, the whole theory 
collapses. 

12-4 These judgments of constancy are based on an 



5 6 I. THE TRADITIONS OF SCIENCE 

immediate comparison of circumstances at different 
times and at different places. Such judgments are not 
infallible and are capable of being tested under certain 
circumstances. For example it may be judged that two 
footrules would coincide if they were brought together ; 
and this experiment can be made, and the judgment 
tested. 

The rejection of an immediate judgment of constancy 
is no paradox. There are differences between any dis- 
tinct sets of circumstances, and it is always possible 
that these differences cut deeper than we have per- 
ceived so as to produce unsuspected divergences of 
properties. 

But a judgment of constancy is recognition, and re- 
cognition is the source of all our natural knowledge. 
Accordingly though isolated judgments may be rejected, 
it is essential that a rational consideration of nature 
should assume the truth of the greater part of such 
judgments and should issue in theories which embody 
them. 

12-5 This recognition of congruity between distinct 
circumstances has no especial connection with coin- 
cidence and extends far beyond the mere judgments 
of time and space. Thus judgments of the matching 
of colours can be made without coincidence by most 
people to some slight extent, and by some people with 
surprising accuracy. It may be urged that only in the 
case of judgments of spatial and temporal coincidence 
can great accuracy be obtained. This may be true; but 
complete accuracy is never obtained, and the ideal of 
accuracy shows that the meaning is not derived from 
the measurement. Our recognitions are the ultimate 
facts of nature for science, and the whole scientific 



CONGRUENCE 57 

theory is nothing else than an attempt to systematise 
our knowledge of the circumstances in which such 
recognitions will occur. The theory of congruence is 
one branch of the more general theory of recognitions. 
Another branch is the theory of objects which is con- 
sidered in the next part of this enquiry. 



PART II 
THE DATA OF SCIENCE 

CHAPTER V 
THE NATURAL ELEMENTS 

13. The Diversification of Nature. 13-1 Our per- 
ceptual knowledge of nature consists in the breaking 
up of a whole which is the subject matter of perceptual 
experience, or is the given presentation which is ex- 
perience or however else we prefer to describe the 
ultimate experienced fact. This whole is discriminated 
as being a complex of related entities, each entity having 
determinate qualities and relations and being a subject 
concerning which our perceptions, either directly or 
indirectly, afford definite information. This process of 
breaking up the subject matter of experience into a 
complex of entities will be called the * diversification 
of nature.' % 

13-2 This diversification of nature is performed in 
different ways, according to different procedures which 
yield different analyses of nature into component 
entities. It is not merely that one mode of diversification 
of nature is incomplete and leaves out some entities 
which another mode supplies. The entities which are 
yielded by different modes of diversification are radi- 
cally different ; and it is the neglect of this distinction 
between the entities of complexes produced by different 
modes of diversification which has produced so much 
confusion in the principles of natural knowledge. 



6o II. THE DATA OF SCIENCE 

There are an indefinite number of types of entity 
disclosed in this diversification. An attempt in this 
enquiry to trace the subtlety of nature would only blur 
the main argument. Accordingly we confine attention 
to five modes of diversification which are chiefly im- 
portant in scientific theory. These types of entities 
are: (i) events, (ii) percipient objects, (iii) sense-objects, 
(iv) perceptual objects, (v) scientific objects. These are 
five radically distinct types of entities yielded by five 
distinct procedures; and their only common quality 
as entities is that they are all alike subjects yielded for 
our knowledge by our perceptions of nature. 

13-3 The entities which are the product of any one 
mode of diversification of nature will be called elements, 
or aspects, of nature; each such entity is one natural 
element. Thus each mode of diversification produces 
natural elements of a type peculiar to itself. 

One mode of diversification is not necessarily more 
abstract than another. Objects can be looked on as 
qualities of events, and events as relations between 
objects, or more usefully we can drop the meta- 
physical and difficult notion of inherent qualities and 
consider the elements of different types as bearing to 
each other relations. 

There are accordingly two main genera of relations 
to be distinguished, namely ' homogeneous ' relations 
which relate among themselves natural elements of the 
same type, and * heterogeneous ' relations which relate 
natural elements of different types. 

13-4 Another way of considering the diversification 
of nature is to emphasise primarily the relations between 
natural elements. Thus those elements are what is 
perceived in nature as thus related. In other words the 



THE NATURAL ELEMENTS 61 

relations are treated as fundamental and the natural 
eleriients are introduced as in their capacity of relata. 
But of course this is merely another mode of expression, 
since relations and relata imply each other. 

14. Events. 14*1 Events are the relata of the funda- 
mental homogeneous relation of * extension.' Every 
event extends over other events which are parts of 
itself, and every event is extended over by other events 
of which it is part. The externality of nature is the 
outcome of this relation of extension. Two events are 
mutually external, or are * separate/ if there fe no event 
which is part of both. Time and space both spring from 
the relation of extension. Their derivation will be con- 
sidered in detail in subsequent parts of this enquiry. 
It follows that time and space express relations between 
events. Other natural elements which are not events 
are only in time and space derivatively, namely, by 
reason of their relations to events. Great confusion 
has been caused to the philosophy of science by this 
neglect of the derivative nature of the spatial and tem- 
poral relations of objects of various types. 

14-2 The relation of extension exhibits events as 
actual as matters of fact by means of its properties 
which issue in spatial relations; and it exhibits events 
as involving the becomingness of nature its passage or 
creative advance by means of its properties which 
issue in temporal relations. Thus events are essentially 
elements of actuality and elements of becomingness. An 
actual event is thus divested of all possibility. It is what 
does become in nature. It can never happen again; for 
essentially it is just itself, there and then. An event is 
just what it is, and is just how it is related and it is 
nothing else. Any event, however similar, with different 



62 II. THE DATA OF SCIENCE 

relations is another event. There is no element of 
hypothesis in any actual event. There are imaginary 
events or, rather, imaginations of events but there 
is nothing actual about such events, except so far as 
imagination is actual. Time and space, which are 
entirely actual and devoid of any tincture of possibility, 
are to be sought for among the relations of events. 

14-3 Events never change. Nature develops, in the 
sense that an event e becomes part of an event e' which 
includes (i.e. extends over) e and also extends into the 
futurity beyond e. Thus in a sense the event e does 
change, namely, in its relations to the events which were 
not and which become actual in the creative advance 
of nature. The change of an event , in this meaning 
of the term 'change/ will be called the 'passage' of e\ 
and the word 'change' will not be used in this sense. 
Thus we say that events pass but do not change. The 
passage of an event is its passing into some other event 
which is not it. 

An event in passing becomes part of larger events ; 
and thus the passage of events is extension in the 
making. The terms ' the past,' ' the present,' and ' the 
future' refer to events. The irrevocableness of the past 
is the unchangeability of events. An event is what it is, 
when it is, and where it is. Externality and extension 
are the marks of events ; an event is there and not here 
[or, here and not there], it is then and not now [or, now 
and not then] , it is part of certain wholes and is a whole 
extending over certain parts. 

15. Objects. 15-1 Objects enter into experience by 
recognition and without recognition experience would 
divulge no objects. Objects convey the permanences 
recognised in events, and are recognised as self-identical 



THE NATURAL ELEMENTS 63 

amid different circumstances; that is to say, the same 
object is recognised as related to diverse events. Thus 
the self-identical object maintains itself amid the flux 
of events : it is there and then, and it is here and now ; 
and the 'it' which has its being there and here, then 
and now, is without equivocation the same subject for 
thought in the various judgments which are made 
upon it. 

15-2 The change of an object is the diverse relation- 
ships of the same object to diverse events. The object 
is permanent, because (strictly speaking) it is without 
time and space; and its change is merely the variety 
of its relations to the various events which are passing 
in time and in space. This passage of events in time 
and space is merely the exhibition of the relations of 
extension which events bear to each other, combined 
with the directional factor in time which expresses that 
ultimate becomingness which is the creative advance 
of nature. These extensional relations of events are 
analysed in later parts of this enquiry. But here we 
merely make clear that change in objects is no deroga- 
tion from their permanence, and expresses their relation 
to the passage of events; whereas events are neither 
permanent nor do they change. Events (in a sense) 
are space and time, namely, space and time are abstrac- 
tions from events. But objects are only derivatively in 
space and time by reason of their relations to events. 

15-3 The ways in which events and objects enter 
into experience are distinct. Events are lived through, 
they extend around us. They are the medium within 
which our physical experience develops, or, rather, they 
are themselves the development of that experience. The 
facts of life are the events of life. 



6 4 II. THE DATA OF SCIENCE 

Objects enter into experience by way of the intellect- 
uality of recognition. This does not mean that every 
object must have been known before; for in that case 
there never could have been a first knowledge. We must 
rid our imagination of the fallacious concept of the 
present as instantaneous. It is a duration, or stretch of 
time ; and the primary recognition of an object consists 
of the recognition of its permanence amid the partial 
events of the duration which is present. Its recognition 
is carried beyond the present by means -of recollection 
and memory. 

Rational thought which is the comparison of event 
with event would be intrinsically impossible without 
objects. 

15-4 Objects and events are only waveringly dis- 
criminated in common thought. Whatever is purely 
matter of fact is an event. Whenever the concept of 
possibility can apply to a natural element, that element 
is an object. Namely, objects have the possibility of 
recurrence in experience: we can conceive imaginary 
circumstances in which a real object might occur. The 
essence of an object does not depend on its relations, 
which are external to its being. It has in fact certain 
relations to other natural elements ; but it might (being 
the same object) have had other relations. In other 
words, its self -identity is not wholly dependent on its 
relations. But an event is just what it is, and is just how 
it is related; and it is nothing else. 

Thus objects lack the fixedness of relations which 
events possess, and thus time and space could never 
be a direct expression of their essential relations. Two 
objects have (by the mediation of events) all the mutual 
space relations which they do have throughout their 



THE NATURAL ELEMENTS 65 

existence, and might have many which they do not have. 
Thus two objects, being what they are, have no neces- 
sary temporal and spatial relations which are essential 
to their individualities. 

15-5 The chief confusion between objects and events 
is conveyed in the prejudice that an object can only be 
in one place at a time. That is a fundamental property 
of events ; and whenever that property appears axiom- 
atic as holding of some physical entity, that entity is 
an event. It must be remembered however that ordinary 
thought wavers confusedly between events and objects, 
It is the misplacement of this axiom from events to- 
objects which has wrecked the theory of natural 
objects. 

15*6 It is an error to ascribe parts to objects, where 
4 part' here means spatial or temporal part. The 
erroneousness of such ascription immediately follows 
from the premiss that primarily an object is not in 
space or in time. The absence of temporal parts of 
objects is a commonplace of thought. No one thinks 
that part of a stone is at one time and another part of 
the stone is at another time. The same stone is at both 
times, in the sense in which the stone is existing at 
those times (if it be existing). But spatial parts are in 
a different category, and it is natural to think of various 
parts of a stone, simultaneously existing. Such a con- 
ception confuses the stone as an object with the event 
which exhibits the actual relations of the stone within 
nature. It is indeed very natural to ascribe spatial parts 
to a stone, for the reason that a stone is an instance of 
a perceptual object. These objects are the objects of 
common life, and it is very difficult precisely to discern 
such an object in the events with which it has its most 

w. 5 



/ 



66 II. THE DATA OF SCIENCE 

obvious relations. The struggle to make precise the 
concept of these objects either forces us back to the 
sense-objects or forward to the scientific objects. The 
difficulty is chiefly one of making thought clear. That 
there is a perception of an object with self -identity, 
is shown by the common usage of mankind. Indeed 
these perceptual objects forced upon mankind and 
seemingly also on animals, unless it be those of the 
lowest type their knowledge of the objectified char- 
acter of nature. But the confusion of the object, which 
is a unity, with the events, which have parts, is always 
imminent. In biological organisms the character of 
the organism as an object is more clear. 

15-7 The fundamental rule is that events have parts 
and that except in a derivative sense, from their 
relations to events objects have no parts. On the 
other hand the same object can be found in different 
parts of space and time, and this cannot hold for 
events. Thus the identity of an object may be an 
important physical fact, while the identity of an event is 
essentially a trivial logical necessity. Thus the prisoner 
in the dock may be the man who did the deed. But 
the deed lies in the irrevocable past ; only the allegation 
of it is before the court and perhaps (in some countries) 
a reconstitution of the crime. Essentially the very deed 
itself is never there. 

15-8 The continuity of nature is to be found in 
events, the atomic properties of nature reside in objects. 
The continuous ether is the whole complex of events ; 
and the atoms and molecules are scientific objects, 
which are entities of essentially different type to the 
events forming the ether. 

15-9 This contrast in the ways we perceive events 



THE NATURAL ELEMENTS 67 

and objects deserves a distinction in nomenclature. 
Accordingly, for want of better terms, we shall say that 
we 'apprehend' an event and 'recognise* an object. \ ^ 
To apprehend an event is to be aware of its passage 
as happening in that nature, which we each of us know 
as though it were common to all percipients. It is un- 
necessary for the purposes of science to consider the 
difficult metaphysical question of this community of 
nature to all. It is sufficient that, for the awareness of 
each, it is as though it were common to all, and that 
science is a body of doctrine true for this quasi-common 
nature which is the subject for the experience of each 
percipient; namely, science is true for each percipient. 

To recognise an object is to be aware of it in its 
specific relations to definite events in nature. Thus we 
refer the object to some events as its 'situations/ we 
connect it with other events as the locus from which it 
is being perceived, and we connect it with other events 
as conditions for such perception of it as in such situa- 
tions from such a locus of percipience. 

Accordingly in these (arbitrary) senses of the words 
we apprehend nature as continuous and we recognise 
it as atomic. 



52 



CHAPTER VI 
EVENTS 

16. Apprehension of Events. 16-1 It is the purpose 
of this chapter to summarise the leading characteristics 
of our knowledge of nature as diversified into a complex 
of events. 

Perception is an awareness of events, or happenings, 
forming a partially discerned complex within the back- 
ground of a simultaneous whole of nature. This aware- 
ness is definitely related to one event, or group of events, 
within the discerned complex. This event is called the 
percipient event. The simultaneity of the whole of 
nature comprising the discerned events is the special 
relation of that background of nature to the percipient 
event. This background is that complete event which 
is the whole of nature simultaneous with the percipient 
event, which is itself part of that whole. Such a com- 
plete whole of nature is called a * duration.' A duration 
(in the sense in which henceforth the word will be used) 
is not an abstract stretch of time, and to that extent the 
term * duration ' is misleading. In perception the asso- 
ciated duration is apprehended as an essential element 
in the awareness, but it is not discriminated into all its 
parts and qualities. It is the complete subject matter for 
a discrimination which is only very partially performed. 

Thus the whole continuum of nature ' now-present * 
means one whole event (a duration), rendered definite 
by the limitation * now-present ' and extending over all 
events now-present. Namely, the various finite events 
now-present for an awareness are all parts of one asso- 



EVENTS 69 

elated duration which is a special type of event. A 
duration is in a sense unbounded; for it is, within 
certain limitations, all that there is. It has the property 
of completeness, limited by the condition 'now- 
present'; it is a temporal slab of nature. 

1 6-2 This fact of nature as a present- whole is forced 
on our apprehension by the character of perception. 
Perceptual awareness is complex. There are the various 
types of sense-perception, and differences in extensity 
and in intensity. There are also differences in attention 
and in consequent clearness of awareness, shading off 
into a dim knowledge of events barely on the threshold 
of consciousness. Thus nature, as we know it, is a con- 
tinuous stream of happening immediately present and 
partly dissected by our perceptual awareness into 
separated events with diverse qualities. Within this 
present stream the perceived is not sharply differen- 
tiated from the unperceived; there is always an in- 
definite ' beyond ' of which we feel the presence although 
we do not discriminate the qualities of the parts. This 
knowledge of what is beyond discriminating perception 
is the basis of the scientific doctrine of externality. 
There is a present-whole of nature of which our detailed 
knowledge is dim and mediate and inferential, but 
capable of determination by its congruity with clear 
immediate perceptual facts. 

16-3 The condition * now-present ' specifies a par- 
ticular duration. It evidently refers to some relation; 
for 'now' is 'simultaneous with,' and 'present' is 'in 
the presence of ' or ' presented to.' Thus ' now-present ' 
refers to some relation between the duration and some- 
thing else. This 'something else' is the event 'here- 
present,' which is the definite connecting link between 



7 o II. THE DATA OF SCIENCE 

individual experienced knowledge and self-sufficient 
nature. The essential existence of the event 'here- 
present' is the reason why perception is from within 
nature and is not an external survey. It is the ' percipient 
event.' The percipient event defines its associated 
duration, namely its corresponding ' all nature.' 

16-4 The 'here' in 'here-present' also refers to the 
specific relation between the percipient event and its 
associated duration. It means 'here within the dura- 
tion,' i.e. ' here within the present continuum of nature.' 
Thus the relation between an event ' here-present ' and 
its associated duration embodies in some form the 
property of rest in the duration; for otherwise 'here' 
would be an equivocation. The relation in any concrete 
case may be complex, involving more than one meaning 
of 'here,' but the essential character of the relation 
is that as we (according to the method of extensive 
abstraction) properly diminish the extent of such an 
event, the property of 'rest in' the associated duration 
becomes more obvious. When an event has the pro- 
perty of being a percipient event unequivocally here 
within an associated duration, we shall say that it is 
' cogredient' with the duration. 

16-5 An event can be cogredient with only one 
duration. To have this relation to the duration it must 
be temporally present throughout the duration and 
exhibit one specific meaning of 'here.' But a duration 
can have many events cogredient with it. Namely any 
event, which is temporally present throughout that 
duration and in relation to an event here-present defines 
one specific meaning of 'there,' is an event 'there- 
present ' which has the same relation of cogredience to 
that duration and (to that extent) is (so far) potentially 



EVENTS 71 

an event ' here-present ' in that duration for some 
possible act of apprehension. Thus cogredience is a 
condition for a percipient event yielding unequivocal 
meanings to ' here ' and ' now.' 

The relation of cogredience presupposes that the 
duration extends over the event ; but the two relations 
must not be confounded. In the first place a duration 
extends over events which are not temporally present 
throughout it, so that the specification of the duration 
would not be a complete answer to the question ' When ?' 
as asked of the event. Secondly, the question ' Where ? ' 
which means ' Where in the duration?' may not be 
susceptible of the one definite answer ' There ' which 
is only possible if cogredience holds. The question 
' Whither ? ' which contemplates change in the ' there ' 
of an event, definitely refers to events which are parts 
of a duration but are not cogredient with it. Cogredience 
is the relation of absolute position within a duration; 
we must remember that a duration is a slab of nature 
and not a mere abstract stretch of time. Cogredience 
is the relation which generates the consentient sets 
discussed in Chapter III of Part I. The details of the 
deduction belong to Part III. 

16-6 It is not necessary to assume that there is one 
event which is the system of all nature throughout all 
time. For scientific purposes the only unbounded 
events are durations and these are bounded in their 
temporal extension. 

17. The Constants of Externality, ij-i The 'con- 
stants of externality' are those characteristics of a 
perceptual experience which it possesses when we 
assign to it the property of being an observation of the 
passage of external nature, namely when we apprehend 



7 2 II. THE DATA OF SCIENCE 

it. A fact which possesses these characteristics, namely 
these constants of externality, is what we call an 
' event.' 

A complete enumeration of these constants is not 

necessary for our purpose; we only need a survey of 

just those elements in the apprehension of externality 

from which the concepts of time, space and material 

arise. In this survey the attitude of mind to be avoided 

j is exhibited in the questions, ' How, being in space, 

\do we know it ? ' ' How, being in time, do we know it ? ' 

#nd 'How, having material, do we know of it? ' 

Again we are not considering a priori necessities, 
nor are we appealing to a priori principles in proof. 
We are merely investigating the characteristics which 
in experience we find belonging to perceived facts 
when we invest them with externality. The constants 
of externality are the conditions for nature, and deter- 
mine the ultimate concepts which are presupposed 
in science. 

17-2 In order to enter upon this investigation from 
the standpoint of habitual experience, consider the 
simplest general questions which can be asked of a 
percipient of some event in nature, ' Which ?' 'What?' 
'How? 1 'When?' 'Where?' 'Whither?' These six 
questions fall into two sets. The first three invite 
specification of qualities and discrimination amid alter- 
native entities ; the remaining three refer to the spatio- 
temporal relation of a part to a whole within which 
in some sense the perceived part is located. 

They can be construed as referring to events or to 
objects. The former way of understanding them is 
evidently the more fundamental, for our awareness 
of nature is directly an awareness of events or happen- 



EVENTS 73 

ings, which are the ultimate data of natural science. 
The conditions which determine the nature of events 
can only be furnished by other events, for there is 
nothing else in nature. A reference to objects is only 
a way of specifying the character of an event. It is an 
error to conceive of objects as causing an event, except 
in the sense that the characters of antecedent events 
furnish conditions which determine the natures of 
subsequent events. 

17*3 The ultimate nature of events has been blurred 
by the confusion which seems to be introduced by its 
acknowledgment. Events appear as indefinite entities 
without clear demarcations and with mutual relations 
of baffling complexity. They seem, so to speak, deficient 
in thinghood. A lump of matter or a charge of electricity 
in a position at an instant, retaining its self-identity in 
other positions at succeeding instants, seems a simple 
clue for the unravelling of the maze. This may be un- 
reservedly granted; but our purpose is to exhibit this 
conception of spatio-temporal material in its true rela- 
tion to events. When this has been effected, the 
mechanical rigidity (so to speak) of the traditional views 
of time, space and material is thereby lost, and the way 
is opened for such readjustments as the advance of 
experimental knowledge may suggest. 

17-4 The six questions of 17-2 immediately reveal 
that what is ultimate in nature is a set of determinate 
things, each with its own relations to other things of 
the set. To say this is a truism, for thought and judg- 
ment are impossible without determinate subjects. But 
the reluctance to abandon a vague indetermination of 
events has been an implicit reason for the refusal to 
consider them as the ultimate natural entities. 



I 



74 II- THE DATA OF SCIENCE 

This demarcation of events is the first difficulty 
which arises in applying rational thought to experience. 
In perception no event exhibits definite spatio-temporal 
limits. A continuity of transition is essential. The 
definition of an event by assignment of demarcations 
is an arbitrary act of thought corresponding to no per- 
ceptual experience. Thus it is a basal assumption, 
essential for ratiocination relating to perceptual ex- 
perience, that there are definite entities which are 
events; though in practice our experience does not 
enable us to identify any such subject of thought, as 
discriminated from analogous subjects slightly more or 
slightly less. 

This assumption must not be construed either as 
asserting an atomic structure of events, or as a denial 
of overlapping events. It merely asserts the ideal possi- 
bility of perfect definiteness as to what does or does not 
belong to an event which is the subject of thought, 
though such definiteness cannot be achieved in human 
knowledge. It is the claim which is implicit in every 
advance towards exact observation, namely that there 
is something definite to be known. The assumption 
is the first constant of ^externality, namely the belief 
that what has been apprehended as a continuum, is a 
potentially definite complex of entities for knowledge. 
The assumption is closely allied with the conception 
of nature as * given/ This conception is the thought 
of an event as^a thing which * happened' apart from all 
theory and as a fact self-sufficient for a knowledge 
discriminating it alone. 

18. Extension. 18-1 The second constant of exter- 
nality is the relation of extension which holds between 
events. An event x may * extend over' an event y. 



EVENTS 



75 



i.e. in other words y may be part of x. The concepts 
of time and of space in the main, though not entirely, 
arise from the empirically determined properties of 
this relation of extension. It is evident from the uni- 
versal and uniform application of the spatio-temporal 
concepts that they must arise from the utilisation of 
the simplest characteristics without which no datum 
of knowledge would be recognised as an event belonging 
to the order of nature. Extension is a relation of this 
type. It is a property so simple that we hardly recognise 
it as such it of course is so. Thus the event which is 
the passage of the car is part of the whole life of the 
street. Also the passage of a wheel is part of the event 
which is the passage of the car. Similarly the event 
which is the continued existence of the house extends 
over the event which is the continued existence of a 
brick of the house, and the existence of the house during 
one day extends over its existence during one specified 
second of that day. 

1 8 -2 Every element of space or of time (as conceived 
in science) is an abstract entity formed out of this 
relation of extension (in association at certain stages 
with the relation of cogredience) by means of a deter- 
minate logical procedure (the method of extensive 
abstraction). The importance of this procedure depends 
on certain properties of extension which are laws of 
nature depending on empirical verification. There is, 
so far as I know, no reason why they should be so, 
except that they are. These laws will be stated in the 
succeeding parts so far as is necessary to exemplify the 
definitions which are there given and to show that these 
definitions really indicate the familiar spatial and tem- 
poral entities which are utilised by science in precise 



y6 II. THE DATA OF SCIENCE 

and determinate ways. Many of the laws can be logi- 
cally proved when the rest are assumed. But the proofs 
will x not be given here, as our aim is to investigate the 
structure of the ideas which we apply to nature and 
the fundamental laws of nature which determine their 
importance, and not to investigate the deductive science 
which issues from them. 

18-3 The various elements of time and space are 
formed by the repeated applications of the method 
of extensive abstraction. It is a method which in 
its sphere achieves the same object as does the dif- 
ferential calculus in the region of numerical calcula- 
i tion, namely it converts a process of approximation 
\ into an instrument of exact thought. The method 
is merely the systematisation of the instinctive pro- 
cedure of habitual experience. The approximate pro- 
cedure of ordinary life is to seek simplicity of relations 
among events by the consideration of events sufficiently 
restricted in extension both as to space and as 
to time; the events are then 'small enough/ The 
procedure of the method of extensive abstraction is 
to formulate the law by which the approximation is 
achieved and can be indefinitely continued. The com- 
plete series is then defined and we have a 'route of 
approximation.' These routes of approximation ac- 
cording to the variation of the details of their formation 
are the points of instantaneous space (here called 
'event-particles'), linear segments (straight or curved) 
between event-particles (here called 'routes'), the 
moments of time (each of which is all instantaneous 
nature), and the volumes incident in moments. Such 
elements are the exactly determined concepts on which 
the whole fabric of science rests. 



\ 



EVENTS 



77 



1 8 -4 The parts of an event are the set of events 
(excluding itself) which the given event extends over. 
It is a mistake to conceive an event as the mere logical 
sum of its parts. In the first place if we do so, we are 
necessarily driven back to conceive of more funda- 
mental entities, not events, which would not have the 
mere abstract logical character which (on this supposi- 
tion) events would then have. Secondly, the parts of an 
event are not merely one set of non-overlapping events 
exhausting the given event. They are the whole com- 
plex of events contained in that event; for example, if 
a be the given event, and a extends over b y and b over c, 
then a extends over c and both b and c are parts of a. 
Thus an event has its own substantial unity of being 
which is not an abstract derivative from logical con- 
struction. The physical fact of the concrete unity of 
an event is the foundation of the continuity of nature 
from which are derived the precise laws of the mathe- 
matical continuity of time and space. Not any two 
events are in combination just one event, though there 
will be other events of which both are parts. We recur 
to this point in Part III, art. 29, when considering 
thexjunction of events. 

19. Absolute Position. 19-1 The third constant of 
externality is the fact (already explained) that an event 
as apprehended is related to a complete whole of nature 
which extends over it and is the duration associated 
with the percipient event of that perception. 

19-2 The fourth constant of externality is the refer- 
ence (already explained) of the apprehended event to 
the percipient event which (when sufficiently restricted 
in its temporal extension) has a definite station within 
the associated duration. 



7 8 II. THE DATA OF SCIENCE 

19-3 The fifth constant is the above-mentioned fact 
of the definite station of a percipient event within its 
duration. Namely, when the specious present is properly 
limited, there is a definite univocal meaning to the 
relation 'here within the duration' of the percipient 
event to the duration. 

19-4 Thus the third, fourth, and fifth constants of 
externality convey its very essence, and without them 
our perceptual experience appears as a disconnected 
dream. They embody the reference of an event to a 
definite an absolute spatio-temporal position within 
a definite whole of nature, which whole is defined and 
limited by the actual circumstances of the perception. 
This position, or station, within such a whole is presup- 
posed in the questions, ' When ? ' ' Where ? ' ' Whither ? ' 

20. The Community of Nature. 20-1 One other 
constant of externality is required in scientific thought. 
We will call it the association of events with a ' com- 
munity of nature.' This sixth constant arises from the 
fragmentary nature of perceptual knowledge. There 
are breaks in individual perception, and there are 
distinct streams of perception corresponding to diverse 
percipients. For example, as one percipient awakes 
daily to a fresh perceptual stream, he apprehends the 
same external nature which can be comprised in one 
large duration extending over all his days. Again the 
same nature and the same events are apprehended by 
diverse percipients; at least, what they apprehend is as 
though it were* the same for all. 

2O-2 Thus we distinguish between the qualities of 
events as in individual perception namely, the sense- 
data of individuals and the objective qualities of the 
actual events within the common nature which is the 



EVENTS 79 

datum for apprehension. In this assumption of a nature 
common for all percipients, the immediate knowledge 
of the individual percipient is entirely his perceptual 
awareness derived from the bodily event * now-present 
here.' But this event occurs as related to the events 
of antecedent or concurrent nature. Accordingly he 
is aware of these events as related to his bodily event 
* now-present here ' ; but his knowledge is thus mediate 
and relative namely, he only knows other events 
through the medium of his body and as determined 
by relations to it. The event here-now, comprising 
in general the bodily events, is the immediate event 
conditioning awareness. 

20-3 The form that this awareness of nature takes 
is an awareness of sense-objects now-present, namely 
qualities situated in the events within the duration 
associated with the percipient event. Thus the im- 
mediate awareness qualifies the events of the specious 
present. Thus the common nature which is the object 
of scientific research has to be constructed as an inter- 
pretation. This interpretation is liable to error, and 
involves adjustments. This question is further con- 
sidered in the next chapter and in Part IV. 

21 . Characters of Events. 21 -I The characters of 
events arbitrarily marked out in nature are of baffling 
complexity. There are two ways of obtaining events 
of a certain simplicity. In the first place we may con- 
sider events cogredient with our present duration. This 
is in fact to fix attention on a given position in space 
and to consider what is now going on within it. The 
spatial relations will be simplified, but (unless we are 
lucky) the other characters will be very complex. The 
second method is to consider events whose time-parts 



8o II. THE DATA OF SCIENCE 

show a certain permanence of character. This is in 
fact to follow the fortunes of objects, and may be 
termed the natural mode of discriminating the con- 
tinuous stream of external nature into events. The 
importance of this mode of discrimination could only 
be ascertained by experience. 

21-2 There is one essential event which each per- 
cipient discriminates, namely that event of which each 
part, contained within each successive duration that 
assumes for him the character of the duration now- 
present, correspondingly assumes for him the character 
of the event here-present. This event is the life of that 
organism which links the percipient's awareness to 
external nature. 

21-3 The thesis of this chapter can finally be sum- 
marised as follows : There is a structure of events and 
this structure provides the framework of the externality 
of nature within which objects are located. Any percept 
which does not find its position within this structure 
is not for us a percept of external nature, though it may 
find its explanation/row external events as being derived 
from them. The character of the structure receives its 
exposition from the quantitative and qualitative rela- 
tions of space and time. Space and time are abstractions 
expressive of certain qualities of the structure. This 
space-time abstraction is not unique, so that many 
space-time abstractions are possible, each with its own 
specific relation to nature. The particular space-time 
abstraction proper to a particular observant mind de- 
pends on the character of the percipient event which 
is the medium relating that mind to the whole of nature. 
In a space-time abstraction, time expresses certain 
qualities of the passage of nature. This passage has also 



EVENTS 81 

been called the creative advance of nature. But this 
passage is not adequately expressed by any one time- 
system. The whole set of time-systems derived from 
the whole set of space-time abstractions expresses the 
totality of those properties of the creative advance which 
are capable of being rendered explicit in thought. Thus 
no single duration can be completely concrete in the 
sense of representing a possible whole of all nature 
without omission. For a duration is essentially related 
to one space-time system and thus omits those aspects 
of the passage which find expression in other space- 
time systems. Accordingly there can be no duration 
whose bounding moments are the first and last moments ! 
of creation. 

Objects are entities recognised as appertaining to 
events; they are the recognita amid events. Events are 
named after the objects involved in them and according 
to how they are involved. 



w. 



CHAPTER VII 
OBJECTS 

22. Types of Objects. 22-1 We have now to consider 
natural elements which are objects of various types. 
There are in fact an indefinite number of such types 
corresponding to the types of recognisable permanences 
in nature of various grades of subtlety. It is only 
necessary here to attempt a rough classification of those 
which are essential to scientific thought. 

The consideration of objects introduces the concepts 
t)f * matter' or more vaguely, 'material' of 'trans- 
mission' and of 'causation.' These concepts express 
certain relations of objects to events, but the relations 
are too complex to be fully expressed in such simple 
terms. 

22-2 The essence of the perception of^an object is 
recognition. There is the primary recognition which is 
the awareness of permanence within the specious 
present; there is the indefinite recognition (which we 
may term 'recollection') which is the awareness of 
other perceptions of the object as related to other events 
separate from the specious present, but without any 
precise designation of the events; and there is the 
definite recognition (which we may term 'memory') 
which is an awareness of perception of the object as 
related to certain other definite events separate from 
the specious present. 

22*3 The awareness of external nature is an aware- 
ness of a duration, which is the being of nature through- 
out the specious present, and of a complex of events, 



OBJECTS 83 

each being part of the present duration. These events 
fall into two sets. In one set is the percipient event 
and in the other are the external events whose peculiar 
property, which has led to their discernment, is that 
they are the situations of sense-objects. 

22-4 The percipient event is discerned as the locus 
of a recognisable permanence which is the ' percipient 
object/ This object is the unity of the awareness 
whose recognition leads to the classification of a train 
of percipient events as the natural life associated with 
one consciousness. The discussion of the percipient 
object leads us beyond the scope of this enquiry. Owing 
to the temporal duration of the immediate present the 
self-knowledge of the percipient object is a knowledge 
of the unity of the consciousness within other parts of 
the immediate present. Thus, though it is a knowledge 
of what is immediately present, it is not a knowledge 
knowing itself. 

23. Sense-Objects. 23-1 The sense-object is the 
simplest permanence which we trace as self-identical 
in external events. It is some definite sense-datum, 
such as the colour red of a definite shade. We see red- 
ness here and the same redness there, redness then 
and the same redness now. In other words, we perceive 
redness in the same relation to various definite events, 
and it is the same redness which we perceive. Tastes, 
colours, sounds, and every variety of sensation are 
objects of this sort. 

23-2 There is no apprehension of external events 
apart from recognitions of sense-objects as related to 
them, and there is no recognition of sense-objects 
except as in relation to external events. 

In so far as recognition of a sense-object is confined 

62 



8 4 II. THE DATA OF SCIENCE 

to primary recognition within the present duration, the 
sense-object and the event do not clearly disentangle 
themselves; recollection and memory are the chief 
agents in producing a clear consciousness of a sense- 
object. But apart from recollection and memory, any 
factor, perceived as situated in an external event, 
which might occur again and which is not a relation 
between other such factors, is a sense-object. Sense- 
objects form the ultimate type of perceived objects 
(other than percipient objects) and do not express any 
permanence of relatedness between perceived objects 
of yet more fundamental types. 

23*3 A sense-object, such as a particular shade of 
redness, has a variety of relations to the events of nature. 
These relations are not explicable in terms of the two- 
termed relations to which attention is ordinarily con- 
fined. 

The events which (in addition to the sense-object) 
enter as terms into such a relation can be classified into 
three sets (not mutually exclusive), namely (i) per- 
cipient events, (ii) events which are * situations' of the 
sense-object, (iii) conditioning events. 

23*4 A percipient event in the polyadic relation of 
a sense-object to nature is the percipient event of an 
awareness which includes the recognition of that sense- 
object. An event e is a situation of the sense-object for 
that percipient event when for the associated awareness 
the sense-object is a quality of e. Now perception in- 
volves essentially both a percipient event and an as- 
sociated duration within which that percipient event 
is set and with which it is cogredient. A situation of a 
sense-object in respect to a given percipient event 
occurs within the associated duration of the percipient 



OBJECTS 85 

event. In fact the content of the awareness derived 
from a given percipient event is merely the associated 
duration as extending over a complex of events which 
are situations of sense-objects of perception and also 
as extending over the percipient event itself. For ex- 
ample, an astronomer looks through a telescope and 
sees a new red star burst into existence. He sees redness 
situated in some event which is happening now and 
whose spatial relations to other events, though fairly 
determinate as to direction from him, are very vague 
as to distance. 

23-5 We say that what he really sees is a star coming 
into being two centuries previously. But the relation of 
the event ' really seen ' to the percipient event and to the 
redness is an entirely different one from that of the event 
' seen* to these same entities. It is only the incurable 
poverty of language which blurs the distinction. 

This distinction between what is perceived' and 
what is 'really perceived' does not solely arise from 
time differences. For example Alciphron, in Berkeley's 
dialogue, sees a crimson cloud. Suppose that he had 
seen the cloud in a mirror. He would have 'seen* 
crimson as situated in an event behind the mirror, but 
he would have ' really seen ' the cloud behind him. 

These examples show that the property of being the 
situation of a sense-object for a given percipient event 
is in some respects a trivial property of an event. Yet, 
in other respects, it is very important; namely, it is 
important for the consciousness associated with the 
percipient event. The situations of sense-objects form 
the whole basis of our knowledge of nature, and the 
whole structure of natural knowledge is founded on the 
analysis of their relations. 



86 II. THE DATA OF SCIENCE 

23-6 The definiteness for human percipients of the 
! situations of sense-objects varies greatly for different 
types of such objects. The sound of a bell is in the bell, 
it fills the room, and jars the brain. The feeling a push 
against a hard rock is associated with the rock as hard- 
ness^ and with the body as effort, where hardness and 
effort are objects of sense. This duplication of sense- 
objects is a normal fact in perception, though one of 
the two associated pair, either the one in the body or the 
one in a situation separated from the body, is usually 
faintly perceived and indeterminate as to situation. 

23-7 The relationship between a sense-object and 
nature, so far as it is restricted to one percipient event 
and one situation, is completed by the conditioning 
events. The special characters in which they enter into 
that relationship depend on the particular case under 
consideration. Conditioning events may be divided 
into two main classes which are not strictly discrimin- 
ated from each other. Namely, there are the events 
which are 'jussive' conditions and the events which 
are 'active* conditions. An event which is an active 
condition is a cause of the occurrence of the sense- 
object in its situation for the percipient event; at least, 
it can be so termed in one of the many meanings of 
the word ' cause.' Also space and time are presupposed 
as the setting within which the particular events occur. 
But space and time are merely expressive of the rela- 
tions of extension among the whole ether of events. 
Thus this presupposition of space and time really calls 
in all events of all nature as passive conditions for that 
f particular perception of the sense-object. The laws of 
\ nature, express the characters of the active conditioning 
events and of the percipient events, which issue in the 



OBJECTS 87 

recognition of a definite sense-object in an assigned 
situation. 

23-8 The discovery of laws of nature depends on the 
fact that in general certain simple types of character of 
active conditioning events repeat themselves. These are 
the normal causes of the recognitions of sense-objects. 
But there are abnormal causes and part of the task in 
the analysis of natural law is to understand how the 
abnormal causes are consistent with those laws. For 
example, the normal cause of the sight of a colour in a 
situation (near by) is the rectilinear transmission of r 
light (during the specious present) from the situation 
to the percipient event through intervening events. 
The introduction of a mirror introduces abnormality. 
This is an abnormality of a minor sort. An example of 
major abnormality is when there is no transmission of 
light at all. The excessive consumption of alcohol pro- 
duces delirium and illusions of sight. In this example 
the active conditioning events are of a totally different 
character from those involving the transmission of light. 
The perception is a delusion in the sense that it suggests 
the normal conditioning events instead of the abnormal 
conditioning events which have actually occurred. Ab- 
normal conditioning events are in no way necessarily 
associated with error. For example, recollection and 
memory are perceptions with abnormal conditioning 
events ; and indeed in any abnormal circumstances error 
only arises when the circumstances are not recognised 
for what they are. 

23-9 Whereas the situations of a sense-object are 
always simultaneous with the associated percipient event, 
the active conditioning events are in general antecedent 
to it. These active conditioning events in general are 



88 II. THE DATA OF SCIENCE 

divisible into two classes not very clearly separated, 
namely the generating events and the transmitting 
events. This classification is especially possible in the 
case of perception under normal circumstances. 

24. Perceptual Objects. 24-1 Perceptual objects are 
the ordinary objects of common experience chairs, 
tables, stones, trees. They have been termed 'per- 
manent possibilities of sensation/ These objects are 
at least for human beings the most insistent of all 
natural objects. They are the 'things' which we see, 
touch, taste, and hear. The fact of the existence of such 
objects is among the greatest of all laws of nature, 
ranking with those from which space and time emerge. 

A perceptual object is recognised as an association of 
sense-objects in the same situation. The permanence 
of the association is the object which is recognised. It 
is not the case however that sense-objects are only per- 
ceived as associated in perceptual objects. There is 
always a perception of sense-objects some sounds, 
for instance not so associated. Furthermore, a sense- 
object associated in a perceptual object is perceived 
both as itself and as 'conveying* the perceptual object. 
For example, we see both the horse and the colour of 
the horse, but what we see (in the strict sense of the 
term) is simply colour in a situation. 

24-2 This property of 'conveying' an object is 
fundamental in the recognition of perceptual objects. 
It is the chief example of abnormal perception of sense- 
objects. It is already well-known in the theory of 
art-criticism, as is evidenced in such phrases as ' tactile- 
values ' or again in such simple phrases as 'painting 
water so that it looks wet.' 

The conveyance of a perceptual object by a sense- 



OBJECTS 89 

object is not primarily a judgment. It is a sensuous 
perception of sense-objects, definite as to situation but 
not very determinate as to exact character. Judgments 
quickly supervene and form an important ingredient 
of what may be termed ' completed recognition.' These 
judgments will be called * perceptual judgments.' 

24-3 Thus in the completed recognition of a percep- 
tual object we discern (i) the primary recognition of 
one or more sense-objects in the same situation, (ii) the 
conveyance of other sense-objects by these primary re- 
cognitions, and (iii) the perceptual judgment as to 
the character of the perceptual object which in its turn 
influences the character of the sense-objects conveyed. 

The content of the perceptual judgment is (i) that 
an analogous association of sense-objects, with * legal' 
modifications and in the same situation as that actually 
apprehended, is recognisable from other percipient 
events, and (ii) that the event which is the common 
situation of these associations of sense-objects, recog- 
nised or recognisable, is an active condition for these 
recognitions. 

24-4 The situation of a perceptual object is what we 
call the ' generating ' event among the active conditions 
for the associated sense-objects, provided that the 
perceptual judgment is correct. 

If the perceptual judgment is false, the perceptual 
object as perceived is a delusion. 

The situation of a non-delusive perceptual object is 
independent of any particular percipient event. 

24-5 Amid the development of events the same non- 
delusive perceptual object may be perceived in a 
developed situation, again with ' legal ' modifications 
of the association of perceived sense-objects. The 



90 II. THE DATA OF SCIENCE 

verbal analysis of what constitutes a legal modification 
of the association without breach of the essence of the 
observed permanence would be impossibly complex in 
each particular case; but the judgment as to what is 
allowable in modification is immediate in practice, 
apart from exceptional cases. 

A non-delusive perceptual object will be called a 
' physical object.' 

It is an essential characteristic of a physical object 
that its situation is an active condition for its perception. 
For this reason the object itself is often named as the 
cause. But the object is only derivatively the cause by 
its relation to its situation. Primarily a cause is always 
an event, namely, an active condition. 

24-6 The apprehension of an event as the situation 
of a physical object is our most complete perception of 
the character of an event. It represents a fundamental 
perception of a primary law of nature. It is solely by 
means of physical objects that our knowledge of events 
as active conditions is obtained, whether as generating 
conditions or as transmitting conditions. For example, 
the mirror is recognised as a physical object and its 
situation is the generating condition for that association 
of sense-objects ; but its situation is also a transmitting 
condition for the sense-objects and delusive perceptual 
objects which are perceived as images behind it. Again, 
the prism is a physical object and its situation is a 
transmitting condition for the sense-object which is 
the spectrum. 

So far as it is directly perceived in its various situa- 
tions, a physical object is a group of associations of 
sense-objects, each association being perceived or 
perceivable by a percipient object with an appropriate 



OBJECTS 91 

percipient event as its locus. But the object is more than 
the logical group; it is the recognisable permanent 
character of its various situations. 

24-7 In spite of their insistence in perception these 
physical objects are infected with an incurable vague- 
ness which had led speculative physics practically to 
cut them out of its scheme of fundamental entities. In 
the first place this vagueness arises from the unique 
situation of such an object within any small duration. 
The result is that the object is confounded with the 
event which is its situation. But a situation is prolonged 
in time, and a temporal part of that event is not the 
event itself. Now the object during ten seconds is 
not part of the object during one of these seconds. The 
object is always wholly itself during ten seconds or 
during one second. It is this train of thought which 
led to the introduction of the durationless instant of 
time as a fundamental fact, thus fatally confusing the 
philosophy of science. The error arose from not dis- 
criminating the object from its situation. The train of 
events which is the situation of the object through a 
prolonged stretch of time is not the unique object; it 
is the set of events with which the object has its unique 
association. The difficulty of this point of view arises 
from the fact that a temporal succession of events, each 
very similar to the others, ceases to mark for us the 
time-flux in comparison with the rhythmic changes of 
our bodies. The result is that in perceiving an un- 
changing cliff the recognition of permanence, i.e. of 
the object, overwhelms all other perception, the flux 
of events becoming a vague background owing to the 
absence of their demarcation in our perceptual experi- 
ence. 



92 II. THE DATA OF SCIENCE 

24-8 The essential unity of the object amid the 
spatial parts of its situation is more difficult to grasp. 
The derivation of space and time by the method of 
extensive analysis, as explained in Part III of this 
enquiry, exhibits the essential identity of extension in 
time and extension in space. Thus the reasons for 
denying temporal parts of an object are also reasons 
for denying to it spatial parts. Again, it is true 
that the leg of a chair occupies part of the space 
which is occupied by the chair. But in appealing 
to space we are appealing to relations between events. 
What we are saying is, that the situation of the leg of 
the chair is part of the situation of the chair. This fact 
only makes the leg to be part of the chair in a mediate 
derivative sense, by way of their relations to their 
situations. But the leg is one object with a recognisable 
permanence of association, and the chair is another, 
with recognisable permanence of association distinct 
from that of the leg, and their situations in all cir- 
cumstances have certain definite relations to each other 
expressible* in temporal and spatial terms. 

24-9 The second reason for the vagueness of physical 
objects is the impossibility of submitting the group of 
associations, forming the object, to any process of deter- 
mination with a progressive approximation to precision. 
A physical object is one of those entities of ordinary 
experience which refuse to be pressed into the service 
of science by way of a progressive exactness of deter- 
mination. Consider for example a definite object such 
as a certain woollen sock. It wears thin, but it remains 
the same object; it is darned, and remains the same 
object; finally after successive repairs no part of the 
* Cf . Chapters XIV and XV of Part IV. 



OBJECTS 93 

original wool is left, but it is the same sock. The truth 
is that each time we affirm the self-identity of this 
object we are construing the group of associations, 
which we recognise, in a more and more attenuated 
sense. The object which is both the sock at the end 
and the sock at the beginning is a very attenuated 
complex type of permanence, which would not be 
what we meant by the sock merely at the beginning of 
its career or as perceived merely at the end of its 
career. By insisting on the continued identity of 
the sock, we are in fact continually juggling with what 
we mean by the sock, always retaining the most com- 
plete associations which we can trace through the 
whole continuous series of events forming the successive 
situations of the sock. The physical object ' works' 
perfectly for the ordinary usage of life, and is thus 
fully justified for that purpose in the eyes of the prag- 
matic philosopher. 

24*91 But these objects do represent essential facts 
of nature; sometimes, as it may seem to us, trivial facts 
not worth disentangling from the events which are 
their situations, sometimes useful facts. But their 
essential character is exemplified when we reach bio- 
logical facts. A living organism exhibits a certain unity 
of being which is merely the exhibition of the enhanced 
importance of the unity of the physical object. 

25. Scientific Objects. 25-1 The various types of 
scientific objects arise from the determination of the 
characters of the active conditioning events which are 
essential factors in the recognition of sense-objects. 

The perceptual judgment which is present in the 
completed recognition of physical objects introduces 
the notion of hypothetical perceptions by percipient 



94 II. THE DATA OF SCIENCE 

objects, located for an indefinite number of hypothetical 
percipient events. In other words, it is a judgment on 
the events of the universe as being favourable active 
conditions for the perception of the physical object, 
granting the correspondingly favourable percipient 
events. There are an indefinite number of such per- 
cipient events, actual or imaginary. The characters of 
events as active conditions are to be inferred from their 
adjustment to these innumerable possibilities of per- 
ception of each physical object. 

25-2 Also in another way physical objects are the 
links connecting nature as perceived with nature as 
conditioning its own perception. Physical objects are 
often termed the causes of the perception of sense- 
objects, other than 'the sense-objects which are among 
their own components. For example, the telescope is 
the cause of the astronomer's seeing the star. But a 
physical object is a cause only in an indirect mediate 
sense. The fact of the telescope being in the right 
position at the right time was an active condition for 
the astronomer's sight of the star. Now this fact is an 
event which is a * situation' of the telescope. Thus in 
our experience the situations of physical objects are 
discovered to be active conditions for the perception 
of sense-objects. In this way a knowledge of the char- 
acters of events, in so far as they are active conditions, 
can be observed and inferred; and the passage from 
perception to causation is effected. 

25-3 At once the question arises, In what terms are 
the characters of the conditioning events to be ex- 
pressed? The unanimous answer has been, that the 
expression is to be in terms of ' matter,' or allowing 
for the more subtle ether in terms of 'material.' In 



OBJECTS 95 

so deciding none of the distinctions made above have 
been consistently held in view. The result has been 
the persistent lapses into confusion which have been 
exhibited in a brief abstract in the first part of this 
enquiry. 

Matter has been classified into the various kinds of 
matter which are the chemical substances; thence the 
atomic theory of matter has been established; and 
thence some form of electromagnetic theory of mole- 
cules is emerging. It is in the last degree unlikely that 
the present form of this theory will represent its final 
stage. All novel theories emerge with a childlike sim- 
plicity which they ultimately shed. But, apart from 
specific details, it can as little be doubted that in its 
main concepts the theory is true. 

25 '4 We will accordingly pass by the elaborate task 
of tracking down and interpreting intermediate stages 
of scientific concepts important though they are 
and pass at once to the consideration of molecules and i 
electrons. The characters of events in their capacity \ 
of active conditioning events for sense-objects are 
expressed by their relations to scientific ^objects. 
Scientific objects are not directly perceived, they are 
inferred by reason of their capacity to express these 
characters, namely, they express how it is that events 
are conditions. In other words they express the causal 
characters of events. 

25 '5 At the present epoch the ultimate scientific 
objects are electrons. Each such scientific object has 
its special relation to each event in nature. Events as 1 
thus related to a definite electron are called the ' field ' 
of that object. The relations of the object to different 
parts of the field are interconnected; and, when the 



9 6 II. THE DATA OF SCIENCE 

relationship of the object to certain parts of the field 
is known, its relationship to the remaining parts can 
be calculated. 

As here defined the field of an electron extends 
through all time and all space, each event bearing a 
certain character expressed by its relation to the electron. 
As in the case of other objects, the electron is an atomic 
unity, only mediately in space and in time by reason 
of its specific relations to events. This field is divisible 
into two parts, namely, the * occupied' events and the 
1 unoccupied' events. The occupied event corresponds 
to the situation of a physical object. In order to express 
these relations of an electron to events with sufficient 
simplicity, the method of extensive abstraction [cf. 
Part III] has to be employed. The success of this 
method depends on the principle of convergence to 
simplicity with diminution of extent. The result is 
to separate off the temporal and spatial properties of 
events. The relations of electrons to events can be 
expressed in terms of spatial positions and spatial 
motions at all instants throughout the whole of 
time. 

25-6 In terms of space and time (as derived by the 
method of extensive abstraction) the situation of a 
physical object shrinks into its spatial position at an 
instant together with its associated motion. Also an 
event occupied by an electron shrinks into the position 
at an instant of the electric charge forming its nucleus, 
together with 'its associated motion. But the quanti- 
tative charge is entirely devoid of character apart from 
its associated field; it expresses the character of the 
occupied events which is due to their relation to the 
electron. Its permanence of quantity reflects the per- 



OBJECTS 97 

manence which is recognised in the electron, considered 
for itself alone. 

25-7 The 'unoccupied' events possess a definite 
character expressive of the reign of law in the creative 
advance of nature, i.e. in the passage of events. This 
type of character of events unoccupied by the electron 
is also shared by the occupied events. It expresses the 
role of the electron as an agency in the passage of events. 
In fact the electron is nothing else than the expression 
of certain permanent recognisable features in this 
creative advance. 

Thus the character of event e which it receives from 
electron A, which does not occupy it, is one of the in- 
fluences which govern the change of electron B, which 
does occupy e y into the occupation of other events 
succeeding e. The complete rule of change for B can 
be expressed in terms of the complete character which 
e receives from its relations to all the electrons in the 
universe. 

25-8 The connectedness of the characters which 
events receive from a given electron is expressed by 
the notion of transmission, namely the characters are 
transmitted from the occupied events according to a 
regular rule, which depends on the continuity of events 
arising from their mutual relations of extension. This 
transmission through events is expressible as a trans- 
mission through space with finite velocity. 

25-9 Thus in an event unoccupied by it an electron 
is discerned only as an agent modifying the character 
of that event ; whereas in an event occupied by it the 
electron is discerned as itself acted on, namely the 
character of that event governs the fate of the electron. 
Thus in a sense there is no action at a distance; for 

w. 7 



9 8 II. THE DATA OF SCIENCE 

the fate of each electron is wholly determined by the 
event it occupies. But in a sense there is action at a 
distance, since the character of any event is modified 
(to however slight a degree) by any other electron, 
however separated by intervening events. This action 
at a distance is in its turn limited to being a transmission 
through the intervening events. 

26. Duality of Nature. 26-1 There are two sides to 
nature, as it were, antagonistic the one to the other, 
and yet each essential. The one side is development 
in creative advance, the essential becomingness of 
nature. The other side is the permanence of things, 
the fact that nature can be recognised. Thus nature is 
always a newness relating objects which are neither 
new nor old. 

26-2 Perception fades unless it is equally stimulated 
from both sides of nature. It is essentially apprehension 
of the becomingness of nature. It requires transition, 
contrast, and newness, and immediacy of happening. 
Thus essentially perception is an awareness of events 
in the act of passing into what has never yet been. But 
equally perception requires recognition. Now electrons 
in so far as they are ultimate scientific objects and 
if they are such objects do not satisfy the complete 
condition for recognisability. 

26-3 Such ultimate scientific objects embody what 
is ultimately permanent in nature. Thus they are the 
objects whose relations in events are the unanalysable 
expression of the order of nature. But the recognition 
in perception requires the recurrence of the ways in 
which events pass. This involves the rhythmic repe- 
tition of the characters of events. This permanence 
of rhythmic repetition is the essential character of 



OBJECTS 99 

molecules, which are complex scientific objects. There 
is no such thing as a molecule at an instant. A molecule 
requires a minimum of duration in which to display its 
character. Similarly physical objects are steady com- 
plexes of molecules with an average permanence of 
character throughout certain minimum durations. 

26-4 Thus the recognition which is involved in 
perception is the reason for the importance in physical 
science of Lorentz's hierarchy of microscopic and 
macroscopic equations. 

26-5 The further consideration of objects, in par- 
ticular their instantaneous spatial positions and the 
quantitative distribution of material through space, 
is resumed in Part IV, after the theory of space and 
time has been established. 



72 



PART III 



THE METHOD OF EXTENSIVE 
ABSTRACTION 

CHAPTER VIII 

PRINCIPLES OF THE METHOD OF 
EXTENSIVE ABSTRACTION 

27. The Relation of Extension, Fundamental Properties. 
27-1 The fact that event a extends over event b will 
be expressed by the abbreviation aKb. Thus ' K* is to 
be read * extends over ' and is the symbol for the funda- 
mental relation of extension. 

27-2 Some properties of K essential for the method 
of extensive abstraction are, 

(i) aKb implies that a is distinct from 6, namely, 
1 part ' here means ' proper part ' : 

(ii) Every event extends over other events and is 
itself part of other events: the set of events which an 
event e extends over is called the set of parts of e : 

(iii) If the parts of b are also parts of a and a and b 
are distinct, then aKb: 

(iv) The relation K is transitive, i.e. if aKb and bKc, 
then aKc: 

(v) If aKc, there are events such as b where aKb 
and bKc : 

(vi) If a and b are any two events, there are events 
such as e where eKa and eKb. 

It follows from (i) and (iv) that aKb and bKa are 
inconsistent. Properties (ii) and (v) and (vi) together 



102 III. METHOD OF EXTENSIVE ABSTRACTION 

postulate. something like the existence of an ether; but 
it is not necessary here to pursue the analogy. 

28\ Intersection, Separation and Dissection. 28-1 Two 
events * intersect' when they havejparts in common. 
Intersection, as thus defined, includes the case when 
one event extends over the other, since K is transitive. 
If every intersector of b also intersects a, then either 
aKb or a and b are identical. 

Events which do not intersect are said to be 'se- 
parated.' A 'separated set* of events is a set of events 
of which any two are separated from each other. 

28-2 A 'dissection' of an event is a jseparated set 
such that the set of intersectors of its members is 
identical with the set of intersectors of the event. Thus 
a dissection is a non-overlapping exhaustive analysis 
of an event into a set of parts, and conversely the 
dissected event is the one and only event of which that 
set is a dissection. There will always be an indefinite 
number of dissections of any given event. 

If aKb, there are dissections of a of which b is a 
member. It follows that if b is part of a, there are 
always events separated from b which are also parts of a. 

29. The Junction of Events . 29-1 Two events x and 
y are 'joined' when there is a third event z such that 
(i) z intersects both x and j>, and (ii) there is a dissection 
of z of which each member is a part of x, or of j, or of 
both. 

The concept of the continuity of nature arises entirely 
from this relation of the junction between two events. 
Two joined events are continuous one with the other. 
Intersecting events are necessarily joined; but the 
notion of junction is wider than that of intersection, 
for it is possible for two separated events to be joined. 




PRINCIPLES OF EXTENSIVE ABSTRACTION 103 

Two events which are joined have that relation to each 
other necessary for the existence of one event which 
extends over them and over no extraneous events. Two 
events which are both separated and joined are said 
to be ' ad joined/ 

y 

29-2 An event x is said to ' injoin ' an event y when 
(i) x extends over y, and (ii) there is some third event 
z which is separated from x and 
adjoined to y. 

In this definition a property of 
the boundary of an event first 
makes its appearance. The as- 
sumption that examples of the 
relation of injunction hold is a 
long step towards a theory of such boundaries, as the 
annexed diagram illustrates. It is important to note that 
injunction has been defined purely in terms of extension. 

If xKy and z is separated from x and adjoins j>, then 
z adjoins x. 

293 Injunction and adjunction are the closest 
types of boundary union possible respectively for an 
event with its part and for a pair of separated events. 
The geometry for events is four- dimensional, but in 
the three-dimensional analogue such a surface union 
for a pair of volumes would be the existence of a finite 
area of surface in common. 

[Note that spatial diagrams, such as the one above, 
are to some extent misleading in that they emphasise 
the spatial character of events at the expense of their 
temporal character. The temporal character is very 
far from being represented by an extra dimension 
producing an ordinary four-dimensional euclidean 
geometry.] 



io 4 HI. METHOD OF EXTENSIVE ABSTRACTION 

30. Abstractive Classes. 30-1 A set of events is 
called an * abstractive class ' when (i) of any two of its 
members one extends over the other, and (ii) there is 
no event which is extended over by every event of the 
set. 

The properties of an abstractive class secure that 
its members form a series in which the predecessors 
extend over their successors, and that the extension of 
the members of the series (as we pass towards the 
1 converging end* comprising the smaller members) 
diminishes without limit ; so that there is no end to the 
series in this direction along it and the diminution of 
the extension finally excludes any assignable event. 
Thus any property of the individual events which 
survives throughout members of the series as we pass 
towards the converging end is a property belonging to 
an ideal simplicity which is beyond that of any one 
assignable event. There is no one event which the 
series marks out, but the series itself is a route of 
approximation towards an ideal simplicity of ' content.' 
The systematic use of these abstractive classes is the 
'method of extensive abstraction.' All the spatial and 
temporal concepts can be defined by means of them. 

30-2 One class of events a, say is said to 'cover' 
another class of events /?, say when every member 
of a extends over some member of p. 

If a be an abstractive class and a covers j8, then p 
must have an infinite number of members and there 
can be no event which is extended over by every member 
of p. For any member of a, however small, extends over 
some member of p. The usual case of covering is when 
both classes, a and p, are abstractive classes; then each 
member of a, the covering class, extends over the whole 



PRINCIPLES OF EXTENSIVE ABSTRACTION 105 



converging end of subsequent to the first member of 
p which it extends over. 

303 Two classes of events are called '^-equal' J 
when each covers the other. Evidently such classes 
cannot have a finite number of members, ^-equality 
is a relation in which two abstractive classes can stand 
to each other. The relation is symmetrical and tran- 
sitive, and every abstractive class is J^-equal to itself. 

[Note. Abstractive classes and the relation of ' covering ' can j 
be illustrated by spatial diagrams, with the same caution as to 
their possibly misleading character. 

Consider a series of squares, concentric 
and similarly situated. Let the lengths of 
the sides of the successive squares, stated 
in order of diminishing size, be 



Then each square extends over all the 
subsequent squares of the set. Also let 

L h m = oi 




Fig- 5- 



namely, let h n tend to zero as n increases indefinitely. Then 
the set forms an abstractive class. 

Again, consider a series of rectangles, concentric and similarly 
situated. Let the lengths of the sides of the successive rectangles j 
stated in order of diminishing size, be (a, h^, (fl, /z 2 ), ...(, h n ),. . . . 



i 



i 



| 



j 



a 
Fig. 6. 



Thus one pair of opposite sides is of the same length through- 
out the whole series. Then each rectangle extends over all the 



io6 III. METHOD OF EXTENSIVE ABSTRACTION 

subsequent rectangles. Let h n tend to zero as n increases in- 
definitely. Then the set forms an abstractive class. 

Evidently the set of squares converges to a point, and the 
set of rectangles to a straight line. Similarly, using three dimen- 
sions and volumes, we can thus diagrammatically find abstractive 
classes which converge to areas. If we suppose the centre of 
the set of squares to be the same as that of the set of rectangles, 
and place the squares so that their sides are parallel to the sides 

| of the rectangles, then the set of rectangles covers the set of 
squares, but the set of squares does not cover the"* set of rect- 

; angles. 

Again, consider a set of concentric circles with their common 
centre at the centre of the squares, and let each circle be in- 
scribed in one of the squares, and let each square have one of 
the circles inscribed in it. Then the circles form an abstractive 
class converging to their common centre. The set of squares 
covers the set of circles and the set of circles covers the set of 

i squares. Accordingly the two sets are X-equal.] 

31. Primes and Antiprimes. 31 ! An abstractive 
class is called * prime in respect to the formative con- 
dition o-' [whatever condition V may be] when (i) it 
satisfies the condition or, and (ii) it is covered by every 
other abstractive class satisfying the same condition o-. 

For brevity an abstractive class which is prime in 
respect to a formative condition a is called a 'or-prime.' 
Evidently two a-primes, with the same formative con- 
dition a in the two cases, are jRT-equal. 

31-2 An abstractive class is called 'antiprime in 
respect to the formative condition a y [whatever con- 
dition * a ' may be] when (i) it satisfies the condition o-, 
and (ii) it covers every other abstractive class satisfying 
the same condition cr. For brevity an abstractive class 
which is antiprime in respect to a formative condition 
<i is called a a-antiprime. Evidently two cr-antiprimes, 



PRINCIPLES OF EXTENSIVE ABSTRACTION 107 

with the same formative condition a in the two cases, 
are jf^-equal. 

31-3 Let a be any assigned formative condition, 
let a p be the condition of * being a a-prime,' and let a a 
be the condition of * being a a-antiprime.' Thus an 
abstractive class, which satisfies the condition a p , 
(i) satisfies the condition a, and (ii) is covered by 
every other abstractive class satisfying the same condi- 
tion a. 

Hence any two abstractive classes which satisfy the 
condition a, p cover each other. Hence every class which 
satisfies the condition a p is covered by every other 
class which satisfies the same condition a p . That is 
to say, every such class is a a^-prime. Analogously, it 
is a a p -antiprime. 

Similarly the a-antiprimes are the a a -primes and 
a a -antiprimes. 

A formative condition a will be called * regular for 
primes' when (i) there are cr-primes and (ii) the set 
of abstractive classes X"-equal to any one assigned 
o--prime is identical with the complete set of a-primes ; 
and a will be called * regular for antiprimes ' when 
(i) there are o--antiprimes and (ii) the set of abstractive 
classes K-equal to any one assigned er-antiprime is 
identical with the complete set of a-antiprimes. Thus 
if o- be a formative condition regular for primes, the 
set of a-primes is the same as the set of abstractive 
classes K^equal to or-primes; and if o- be a formative 
condition regular for antiprimes, the set of a-antiprimes 
is the same as the set of abstractive classes ^-equal to 
a-antiprimes. 

31-4 JErrors arise unless we remember the existence 
of some exceptional abstractive classes. Since we 



io8 III. METHOD OF EXTENSIVE ABSTRACTION 

assume that each event has a definite demarcation we 
know that the laws of nature ordinarily assumed in 
science will issue in ascribing to each event a definite 
boundary which will be a spatial surface prolonged into 
three dimensions by reason of its time-extension. Thus 
the possibilities of the spatial contact of surfaces are 
reproduced in the three-dimensional boundaries of 
events. Abstractive classes exist whose converging ends 
converge to elements [instantaneous points, or routes, 
or etc.] on the surface of one of the members of the 
class. In such a case, as we pass down the abstractive 
class towards its converging end, after some definite 
member x of the class the remaining members, all 
extended over by #, have some form of internal contact 
; with the boundary of x. The closest form of such 
contact is to be injoined in x. But there will also be 
more abstract types of point-contact or of line-contact 
which we have not defined here, but know about from 
their occurrence in geometry. If we merely exclude 
such cases without explicit definition, we are really 
appealing to fundamental relations and properties 
; which have not been explicitly, recognised. We must 
use definitions based solely upon those properties of 
\ the relation K which have been made explicit. We 
cannot explicitly take account of point-contact till 
points have been defined. 

32. Abstractive Elements. 32-1 A * finite abstractive 
element deduced from the formative condition o-' is 
the set of events which are members of cr-primes, 
where cr is a formative condition regular for primes. 
The element is said to be ' deduced ' from its formative 
condition a. 
X An ' infinite abstractive element deduced from the 



PRINCIPLES OF EXTENSIVE ABSTRACTION 109 

formative condition o-' is the set of events which are 
members of or-antiprimes, where a is a formative con- 
dition regular for antiprimes. The element is said to 
be ' deduced ' from its formative condition a. 

The abstractive elements are the set of finite and < 
infinite abstractive elements. 

T 52*2^ An abstractive element deduced from a regular 
rormative condition a is such that every abstractive class 
formed out of its members either covers all a-primes 
[element finite] -or is covered by all cr-antiprimes [ele- 
ment infinite]. Thus it represents a set of equivalent 
routes of approximation guided by the condition that 
each route is to satisfy the condition a. 

-32^3 An abstractive element will be said to * inhere ' 
in any event which is a member of it. Two elements 
such that there are abstractive classes covered by both 
are said to 'intersect' in those abstractive classes. 

One abstractive element may cover another abstrac- 
tive element. The elements of the utmost simplicity 
will be those which cover no other abstractive elements. 
These are elements which in euclidean phrase may be 
said to be 'without parts and without magnitude -U Jj; 
will be our business to classify some of the more im- 
portant types of elements. ([The elements of the greatest 
complexity will be those which can cover elements of 
all types. These will be ' momentsTj < 

A point of nomenclature is important. We shall 
name individual abstractive elements by capital latin 
letters, classes of elements by capital or small latin 
letters, and also, as heretofore, events by small latin 
letters. K will continue to denote the fundamental 
relation of extension from which all the relations here 
considered are derived. 



CHAPTER IX 

DURATIONS, MOMENTS AND 
TIME-SYSTEMS 

33. Antiprimes, Durations and Moments. 33 ! Among 
the constants of externality discussed in Part II was 
the reference of events to durations which are, in a 
sense, complete wholes of nature. A duration has thus 
in some sense an unlimited extension, though it is 
bounded in its temporal extent. Although we have not 
yet in our investigation of K distinguished between 
spatial and temporal extension, durations can never- 
theless be defined in terms of K by this unlimited 
aspect of their extents. Namely, we assume that there 
are no other events with the same unlimited property. 
Accordingly, any abstractive class which is composed 
purely of durations can only be covered by abstractive 
classes which also are composed purely of durations. 

33-2 An abstractive class a is called an * absolute 
antiprime ' when a is itself one of the antiprimes which 
satisfy the formative condition of covering a. In other 
words, an absolute antiprime is an abstractive class 
which covers every abstractive class which covers it. 

If an abstractive class be an absolute antiprime, it 
is evident that the formative condition of * covering it ' 
is regular for antiprimes. Thus the set of events which 
are members of the absolute antiprimes which cover 
some one assigned absolute antiprime constitutes an 
abstractive element. Such an element will be called 
a 'moment.' Thus a moment is an abstractive element 
deduced from the condition of covering an absolute 
antiprime. 



DURATIONS, MOMENTS AND TIME-SYSTEMS in 



Only events of a certain type can be members of an 
absolute antiprime, namely events which in Part II 
have been called ' durations.' Only durations can 
extend over durations, and accordingly all the members 
of a moment are durations. 

33-3 We may conceive of a duration as a sort of 
temporal thickness (or, slab) of nature*. In an absolute 

* The slab of nature forming a duration is limited in its temporal 
dimension and unlimited in its spatial dimensions. Thus it repre- 
sents a finite time and infinite space. For example let the horizontal 

G E c A. 



time 



H f D 

Fig. 7. 

line represent the time; and assume nature to be spatially one-di- 
mensional, so that an unlimited vertical line in the diagram represents 




Fig. 8. 



ii2 III. METHOD OF EXTENSIVE ABSTRACTION 

antiprime we have a series of temporal thicknesses 
successively packed one inside the other and con- 
verging towards the ideal of no thickness. An absolute 
antiprime indicates the ideal of an extensionless 
moment of time. 

The set of moments which inhere in a duration are 
completely characteristic of that duration, and vice 
versa. A moment is to be conceived as an abstract of 
all nature at an instant. No abstractive element can 
cover a moment except that moment itself. A moment 
is a route of approximation to all nature which has lost 
its (essential) temporal extension ; thus it is nature under 
the aspect of a three-dimensional instantaneous space. 
This is the ideal to which we endeavour to approximate 
in our exact observations. 

34. Parallelism and Time-Systems. 34-1 * If the 
Newtonian theory of relativity were true, no pair of 
durations would lack durations extending over both 
of them, namely larger durations including both the 
given durations. But on the electromagnetic theory of 
relativity this is not necessarily the case, namely some 
pairs of durations are extended over by a family of 

space at an instant. Then the area between the unlimited parallel 
lines AB and HG represents a duration. Also the area between CD 
and EF represents another duration which is extended over by the 
duration bounded by AB and HG. But in fig. 7 we have assumed 
only one time-system, which is the Newtonian hypothesis. Suppose 
there are many time-systems and consider two such systems a and /?. 
These are represented by two lines inclined to each other. A dura- 
tion of time-system a is represented by the area between AB arid 
CD, and a duration of time-system j8 is represented by the area 
between EF and HK. Two such durations necessarily intersect 
and also can neither completely extend over the other. 

These diagrams are crude illustrations of some properties of 
durations and are in many respects misleading as the sequel will 
show. 



DURATIONS, MOMENTS AND TIME-SYSTEMS 113 

durations and some are not. We shall adopt the electro- 
magnetic theory of relativity. 

A pair of durations both of which are parts of the 
same duration are called * parallel'; and also a pair of 
moments such that there are durations in which both 
inhere are called ' parallel/ 

Parallelism has the usual properties of transitiveness r 
symmetry and reflexiveness. Also two durations which 
do not intersect are parallel; and parallel moments 
which are not identical never intersect. If two parallel 
durations intersect there is a duration which is their 
complete intersection, but there are no durations 
among the common parts of two durations which are 
not parallel. Two moments which are not parallel 
necessarily intersect. 

34-2 Two durations which are parallel to the same 
duration are parallel to each other; thus it is evident 
that each absolute antiprime and each moment must 
be composed of parallel durations. 

A ' family of parallel durations ' is formed by all the 
durations parallel to a given duration, including that 
duration itself. Evidently any two members of such a 
family are parallel, and no duration out of the family 
is parallel to any duration of the family. 

Analogously to such families of parallel durations, 
there are families of parallel moments, with the pro- 
perty that no two moments of the same family intersect 
and that any moment out of a given family intersects 
every moment belonging to the family. 

The durations which are the members of the various 
moments of a given family of moments themselves form 
a family of parallel durations. Thus corresponding to 
a family of parallel durations there is one and only 

w. 8 



ii4 HI. METHOD OF EXTENSIVE ABSTRACTION 

one family of parallel moments ; and corresponding to 
a family of parallel moments there is one and only 
one family of parallel durations. A pair of such corre- 
sponding families, one of durations and the other of 
moments, form the ' time-system ' associated with either 
of the two families. 

Evidently each duration belongs to one and only 
one family of parallel durations ; and thus each duration 
belongs to one and only one time-system. Also each 
moment belongs to one and only one family of parallel 
moments; and thus each moment belongs to one and 
only one time-system. Thus two distinct time-systems 
have no durations in common and no moments in 
common. But every event not a duration is contained 
in some durations of any given time-system. Further- 
more there will be a minimum duration in a given 
time-system which is the duration 'when' the event 
happened in that time-system ; namely, the minimum 
duration has the properties (i) that it extends over the 
event and (ii) that every duration which is part of it 
intersects the event. 

34-3 The moments of a time-system are arranged 
in serial order in this way : 

(i) A duration belonging to a time-system is 'bounded' 
by a moment of the same time-system when each dura- 
tion in which that moment inheres intersects the given 
duration and also intersects events separated from the 
given duration: 

(ii) Every duration has two such bounding moments, 
and every pair of parallel moments bound one duration 
of that time-system: 

(iii) A moment B of a time-system 'lies between* 
two moments A and C of the same time-system 



DURATIONS, MOMENTS AND TIME-SYSTEMS 115 

when B inheres in the duration which A and C 
bound : 

(iv) This relation of ' lying between' has the following 
properties which generate continuous serial order in 
each time-system, namely, 

(a) Of any three moments of the same time-system, 
one of them lies between the other two : 

() If the moment B lies between the moments 
A and C, and the moment C lies between the moments 
B and Z), then B lies between A and D : 

(y) There are not four moments in the same time- 
system such that one of them lies between each pair 
of the remaining three : 

(S) The serial-order among moments of the same 
time-system has the Cantor-Dedekind type of con- 
tinuity. 

Nothing has yet been said about the measurement 
of the lapse of time. This topic will be considered as 
part of the general theory of congruence. 

35. Levels, Reels, and Puncts. 35-1 The electro- 
magnetic theory of relativity is obviously the more 
general of the two. It has also the merit of providing 
definitions of flatness, of straightness, of punctual 
position, of parallelism, of time-order and spatial order 
as interconnected phenomena, and (with the help of 
cogredience) of perpendicularity and of congruence. 
The theory of extension has also provided the definition 
of a duration. It is a remarkable fact that the charac- 
teristic concepts of time and of geometry should thus \ 
be exhibited as arising out of the nature of things as ; 
expressed by the two fundamental relations of extension \ 
and cogredience. It has already been explained that a 
moment is the route of approximation towards an 

82 



n6 III. METHOD OF EXTENSIVE ABSTRACTION 

instantaneous three-dimensional whole of nature. The 
set of abstractive elements and abstractive classes 
covered by both of two non-parallel moments is the 
locus which is their common intersection. Such a locus 
will be called a * level' in either moment. A level is in 
fact an instantaneous plane in the instantaneous space 
of any moment in which it lies. But we reserve the 
conventional spatial terms, such as ' plane/ for the 
time-less spaces to be defined later. Accordingly the 
word 'level' is used here. 

35-2 An indefinite number of non-parallel moments 
will intersect each other in the same level, forming their 
complete intersection; and one level will never be 
merely a (logical) part of another level. Let three 
mutually intersecting moments (M ly M 2 and M 3 , say) 
intersect in the levels / 23 , / 31 , / 12 . Then three cases can 
arise: either (i) the levels are all identical [this will 
happen if any two are identical], or (ii) no pair of the 
levels intersect, or (iii) a pair of the levels, say / 31 and 
/ 12 , intersect. In case (i) the three moments are called 
'co-level/ In case (ii) there are special relations of 
parallelism of levels, to be considered later. In case 
(iii) the locus of abstractive elements and abstractive 
classes which forms the intersection of / 31 and / 12 will 
be called a 'rect'; let this rect be named r l2B . Then 
r 123 is also the complete intersection of / 12 and 7 23 , and 
of 7 23 and / 31 , and of the three moments M 19 M 2 , M 3 . 
When three nioments have a rect as their complete 
intersection they are called 'co-rect.' A rect is an in- 
stantaneous straight line in the instantaneous three- 
dimensional space of any moment in which it lies. 
But, as before, the conventional space-nomenclature 
is avoided in connection with instantaneous spaces. 



DURATIONS, MOMENTS AND TIME-SYSTEMS 117 

353 For four distinct moments there are four pos- 
sible cases in respect to their intersection. In case (i) 
there is no common intersection: in case (ii) there is 
a common intersection which is a level: in case (iii) 
there is a common intersection which is a rect: in 
case (iv) there is a common intersection which is 
neither a rect nor a level; in this case the common 
intersection will be called a ' punct.' 

Consider four moments M 19 M 2 , M 3 , M 4 which 
constitute an instance of case (iv). Let / 12 be the level 
which is the intersection of M^ and M 2 , and let r 234 
be the rect which is the intersection of M 2 , M 3 , M 4 . 
Then the rect r 234 does not lie in the level / 12 . The 
rect r 234 intersects the level / 12 in the common inter- 
section of the four moments. This common inter- 
section is an instantaneous point in the instantaneous 
spaces of the moments. In accordance with our practice 
of avoiding the conventional spatial terms when speaking 
of an instantaneous space, we have called this inter- 
section a 'punct.' Since space is three-dimensional, 
any moment either covers every member of a given 
punct or covers none of its members. A punct repre- 
sents the ideal of the maximum simplicity of absolute 
position in the instantaneous space of a moment in 
which it lies. 

35-4 It is tempting, on the mathematical analogy 
of four-dimensional space, to assert the existence of 
unlimited events which may be called the complete 
intersections of pairs of non-parallel durations. It is 
dangerous however blindly to follow spatial analogies ; 
and I can find no evidence for such unlimited events, 
forming the complete intersections of pairs of inter- 
secting durations, except in the excluded case of 



n8 III. METHOD OF EXTENSIVE ABSTRACTION 

parallelism when the complete intersection (if it exist) 
is itself a duration. Accordingly, apart from parallelism, 
it may be assumed that the events extended over by a 
pair of intersecting durations are all finite events. No 
change in the sequel is required if the existence of such 
infinite events be asserted. 

36. Parallelism and Order. 36-1 Two levels which 
are the intersections of one moment with two parallel 
moments are called ' parallel.' Two parallel levels do 
not intersect, and conversely two levels in the same 
moment which do not intersect are parallel. 

In any moment there will be a complete system of 
levels parallel to a given level in that moment, and such 
levels will be parallel to each other. 

Similarly 'parallel' rects are defined by the inter- 
section of parallel levels with a given level, all in one 
moment. Thus within any moment the whole theory 
of euclidean parallelism (so far as it is non-metrical) 
follows, and need not be further elaborated except to 
note the existence of parallelograms. 

36-2 The definitions of parallel levels and of paral- 
lel rects can be extended to include levels and rects 
which are not co-momental : 

(i) Two levels, / and /', are parallel if / is the inter- 
section of moments M l and M 2 , and /' of moments 
MI and M 2 ', where M is parallel to M/ and M 2 to M 2 ' : 

(ii) Two rects, r and r', are parallel if r is the inter- 
section of co-momental levels l and / 2 , and r' of co- 
momental levels // and / 2 ', where 7 X is parallel to // 
and 7 2 to Z 2 '. 

A moment and a rect which do not intersect are 
parallel. A rect either intersects a moment in one 
punct', or is parallel to it, or is contained in it. 



DURATIONS, MOMENTS AND TIME-SYSTEMS 119 

36-3 The essential characteristic of space is bound 
up in what may be termed the * repetition property' 
of parallelism." This repetition property is an essential 
element in congruence as will be seen later; also the 
homogeneity of space depends on it. [Examples of the 
repetition property are as follows: if a rect intersects 
any moment in one and only one punct, then it inter- 
sects each moment of that time-system in one and only 
one punct : if a level intersects any moment in one and 
only one rect, then it intersects any moment of that time- 
system in one and only one rect. But we must not 
apply the theory of repetition in parallelism mechani- 
cally without attention to the nature of the property 
concerned. For example, if a rect is incident in a 
moment, it does not intersect any other moment of 
the same time-system, and therefore a fortiori is not 
incident in any of them; and analogously for a level 
incident in a moment. 

36-4 Puncts on a rect have an order which is deri- 
vative from the order of moments in a time-system and 
which connects the orders of various time-systems. The 
puncts on any given rect r will respectively be incident 
in the moments of any time-system a to which the rect 
is not parallel. Any moment of a will contain one 
punct of r, and any punct of r will lie in one moment 
of a. Thus the puncts of r have derivatively the order 
of the moments of a. Again let be another such time- 
system. Then the puncts of r have derivatively the 
order of the moments of j8. But it is found that these 
two orders for puncts on r are identical, namely there 
is only one order for the puncts on r to be obtained in 
this way. By means of these puncts on rects the orders 
of moments of different time-systems are correlated. 



120 III. METHOD OF EXTENSIVE ABSTRACTION 

Thus the existence of order in the instantaneous spaces 
of moments is explained ; but the theory of congruence 
has not yet been entered upon. 

36-5 The set of puncts, rects and levels in any one 
moment thus form a complete three-dimensional 
euclidean geometry, of which the meaning of the metri- 
cal properties has not yet been investigated. It is 
not necessary here to enunciate the fundamental pro- 
positions [such as two puncts defining a rect, and so on] 
from which the whole theory can be deduced so far as 
metrical relations are not concerned. 



CHAPTER X 
FINITE ABSTRACTIVE ELEMENTS 

37. Absolute Primes and Event-Particles. 37*1 It 
follows from the principles of convergence to simplicity 
with diminution of extent that, for exhibiting the 
relations between events in their utmost simplicity, 
abstractive elements of minimum complexity are re- 
quired, that is, elements which converge towards the 
ideal of an atomic event. This requisite exacts that the 
formative condition from which the ' atomic' element 
is deduced should be such as to impose the minimum 
of restriction on convergence. 

37-2 An abstractive class which is prime in respect 
to the formative condition of * covering all the elements 
and abstractive classes constituting some assigned 
punct' is called an ' absolute prime.' 

Evidently the condition satisfied by an absolute 
prime is regular for primes. The abstractive element 
deduced from an absolute prime is called an * event- 
particle.' An event-particle is the route of approxima- 
tion to an atomic event, which is an ideal satisfied by 
no actual event. 

An abstractive class which is antiprime in respect 
to the formative condition of ' being a member of some 
assigned punct' is evidently an absolute prime. In 
fact this set of antiprimes is identical with the set of 
absolute primes. 

An event-particle is an instantaneous point viewed 
in the guise of an atomic event. The punct which an 
event-particle covers gives it an absolute position in 



122 III. METHOD OF EXTENSIVE ABSTRACTION 

the instantaneous space of any moment in which it lies. 
Event-particles on a rect lie in the order derived from 
the puncts which they cover. 

37-3 The complete set of event-particles inhering 
in an event will be called the set 'analysing' that event. 
A set of event-particles can only analyse one event, and 
an event can be analysed by only one set of event- 
particles. 

An event-particle ' bounds' an event x when every 
event in which the event-particle inheres intersects 
both x and events separated from x. The set of event- 
particles bounding an event is called the 'boundary' 
of that event. A boundary can only bound one event 
and every event has a boundary. 

Event-particles which neither inhere in an event nor 
bound it are said to lie 'outside' it. 

The existence of boundaries enables the contact of 
events to be defined, namely, events are in 'contact' 
when their boundaries have one or more event-particles 
in common. The adjunction of events implies contact 
but not vice versa; since adjunction requires that a 
solid of the boundaries should be in common. But 
we define the notion of solid by means of that of ad- 
junction, and not conversely. 

37-4 If A and B are distinct event-particles, there 
are events separated from each other in which A and B 
respectively inhere. 

Two events intersect if there are event-particles each 
inhering in both events ; and conversely, there are event- 
particles inhering in both events if they intersect. 

37-5 The fact that the instantaneous geometry 
within a moment is three-dimensional leads to the 
conclusion that the geometry for all event-particles 



FINITE ABSTRACTIVE ELEMENTS 123 

will be four-dimensional. It is to be noted however 
that the straight lines for this four-dimensional geo- 
metry have so far only been defined for event-particles 
which are co-momental, namely the rects. Event- 
particles which are not co-momental will be called 
* sequent.' Straight lines of the four- dimensional space 
joining sequent event-particles will be defined in 
Chapter XL 

37-6 The theory of contact is based on the four- 
dimensionality of the geometry of event-particles. 
Some results of that datum are now to be noted. 

A 'simple' abstractive class is an abstractive class 
for which there is no one event-particle on the bound- 
aries of all those members of the converging end, 
which succeed some given member of the class; 
namely, for a simple abstractive class there is no one 
event-particle at which all members of the converging 
end have contact. 

Absolute antiprimes and absolute primes are simple 
abstractive classes. The 'atomic* property of an abso- 
lute prime is expressed by the theorem, that an absolute 
prime is a simple abstractive class which is covered by 
every simple abstractive class which it covers. The 
property of ' instantaneous completeness ' exhibited by 
an absolute antiprime is expressed by the theorem, that 
an absolute antiprime is an abstractive class which 
covers every abstractive class that covers it. 

38. Routes. 38-1 Event-particles are abstractive 
elements of atomic simplicity. Routes are abstractive 
elements in which is found the first advance towards 
increasing complexity. 

A 'linear' abstractive class is a simple abstractive 
class (A) which (i) covers two event-particles p and p 2 



124 HI. METHOD OF EXTENSIVE ABSTRACTION 

(called the end-points), and (ii) is such that no selection 
of the event-particles which it covers can be the com- 
plete set of event-particles covered by another simple 
abstractive class, provided that the selection comprises 
Pi and p. 2 and does not comprise all the event-particles 
covered by A. The condition (i) secures that a linear 
abstractive class converges to an element of higher 
complexity than an event-particle; and the condition 
(ii) secures that it has the linear type of continuity. 

A * linear prime' is an abstractive class which is 
prime in respect to the formative condition of (i) being 
covered by an assigned linear abstractive class covering 
two assigned end-points and (ii) being itself a linear 
abstractive class covering the same assigned end-points. 
This formative condition is evidently regular for primes. 

A * route' is the abstractive element deduced from 
a linear prime. The two assigned event-particles 
which occur as end-points in the definition of the linear 
prime from which a route is deduced are called the 
' end-points ' of that route. A route is said to lie between 
its end-points. 

38-2 A route is a linear segment, straight or curved, 
between two event-particles, co-momental or sequent. 
There are an indefinite number of routes between a 
given pair of event-particles as end-points. A route w r ill 
cover an infinite number of event-particles in addition 
to its end-points. The continuity of events issues in a 
theory of the continuity of routes. 

If A and B be any two event-particles covered by a 
route R, there is one and only one route with A and B 
as end-points which is covered by R. 

If A, B and C be any three event-particles covered 
by a route R, then B is said to 'lie between' A and C 



FINITE ABSTRACTIVE ELEMENTS 125 

on the route R if B is covered by that route with A 
and C as end-points which is covered by R. 

The particles on any route are arranged in a con- 
tinuous serial order by this relation of * lying between ' 
holding for triads of points on it. The necessary and 
sufficient conditions which the relation must satisfy 
to produce this serial order are detailed in (iv) of 34*3. 

38-3 A route may, or may not, be covered by a 
moment. If it is so covered it is called a * co-momental 
route/ A 'rectilinear route' is a route such that all 
the event-particles which it covers lie on a rect. In a 
rectilinear route the order of the event-particles on the 
rect agrees with the order of the event-particles as 
defined by the relation of * lying between' as defined 
for the route. 

Between any two event-particles on a rect there is 
one and only one rectilinear route. If A and B be two 
event-particles on a rect, the rectilinear route between 
them can also be defined as the element deduced from 
the prime with the formative condition of being a 
simple abstractive class which covers A and B and all 
the event-particles between A and B on the rect. 

38-4 Among the routes which are not co-momental, 
the important type is that here named * kinematic 
routes.' A * kinematic route' is a route (i) whose end- 
points are sequent and (ii) such that each moment, 
which in any time-system lies between the two moments 
covering the end-points, covers one and only one event- 
particle on the route, and (iii) all the event-particles 
of the route are so covered. 

The event-particles covered by a kinematic route 
represent a possible path for a * material particle.' But 
this anticipates later developments of the subject, since 



iz6 III. METHOD OF EXTENSIVE ABSTRACTION 

the concept of a * material particle' has not yet been 
defined. 

39. Solids. 39-1 A 'solid prime* is a prime with 
the formative condition of being a simple abstractive 
class which covers all the event-particles shared in 
common by both boundaries of two adjoined events. 
This formative condition is evidently regular for primes. 
A * solid' is the abstractive element deduced from a 
solid prime. 

39-2 If two event-particles are covered by a solid, 
there are an indefinite number of routes between them 
covered by the same solid. 

A solid may or may not be covered by a moment. 
If it is so covered, it is called 'co-momenta!.' 

A solid which is not co-momental is called ' vagrant.' 
The properties of vagrant solids are assuming import- 
ance in connection with Einstein's theory of gravitation ; 
the consideration of these properties is not undertaken 
in this enquiry. Co-momental solids are also called 
' volumes.' Volumes are capable of a simpler definition 
which is given in the next article. 

40. Volumes. 40-1 A ' volume prime ' is a prime with 
the formative condition of being a simple abstractive 
class which covers all the event-particles inhering in 
an assigned event and covered by an assigned moment. 
If there are no such particles, there will be no corre- 
sponding volume prime. This formative condition is 
evidently regular for primes. 

A * volume ' is the abstractive element deduced from 
a volume prime. A volume is thus the section of an 
event made by a moment. 

40*2 Any volume is covered by the assigned moment 
of which mention occurs in its definition. Thus every 



FINITE ABSTRACTIVE ELEMENTS 127 

volume (as here defined) is co-momental. Also a 
volume only covers those event-particles of which 
mention occurs in its definition. This set of event- 
particles is completely characteristic of the volume, 
and may be considered as the volume conceived as a 
locus of event-particles. 

In exactly the same way a solid, or a route, is com- 
pletely defined by the event-particles which it covers 
and vice versa. Thus solids and routes can be conceived 
as loci of event-particles. 

The concrete event itself is also defined by (or, 
analysed by) the event-particles inhering in it, and such 
a set of event-particles defines only one event. Thus 
an event can be looked on as a locus of event-particles. 
An event e' which is part of an event e is defined in 
this way by a set of event-particles which are some 
of the set defining e. This fact is the reason for the 
confusion of the logical 'all' and 'some' with the 
physical * whole ' and ' part ' which apply solely to 
events. An event is also uniquely defined by the set 
of event-particles which form its boundary. 



CHAPTER XI 
POINTS AND STRAIGHT LINES 

41 '. Stations. 41-1 The fact that an event is 'co- 
gredient' with a duration is a fundamental fact not to 
be explained purely in terms of extension. It has been 
pointed out in Part II that the exact concept of cogre- 
dience is 'Here throughout the duration' or * There 
throughout the duration/ Let this fundamental rela- 
tion of finite events to durations be denoted by ' G,' 
and let ' aGb' mean 'a is a finite event which is co- 
gredient with the duration b.' 

41-2 A 'stationary prime' within a duration b is a 
prime whose formative condition (cr) is that of being 
a simple abstractive class, such that each of its members 
extends over events which (i) are inhered in by some 
assigned event-particle P inherent in b and (ii) have 
the relation G to b. This formative condition is regular 
for primes. A 'station' within a duration b is the 
abstractive element deduced from a stationary prime 
within b. 

41-3 Each event-particle in a duration is covered by 
one and only one station in that duration; and any 
event-particle covered by a station can be taken as the 
'assigned event-particle' of the formative condition, 
inherent in every event which is a member of the station. 
Every station is a route; and also every station in a 
duration intersects every moment of that duration 
[i.e. inherent in it] in one and only one event-particle, 
and intersects no other moments of that time-system. 
It will be noted that a station is associated with a definite 



POINTS AND STRAIGHT LINES 129 

time-system, namely the time-system corresponding 
to its duration. 

41-4 A station of one time-system either does not 
intersect a station of another time-system or intersects 
it in one event-particle only. Thus stations belong to 
the type of routes which have been denominated 
* kinematic routes.' Each station exhibits an unchanging 
meaning of 'here' throughout the duration in which 
it is a station; namely, every event-particle in a station 
is 'here' in the duration in the same sense of 'here' as 
for every other event-particle in that station. 

42. Point-Tracks and Points. 42-1 Consider all the 
durations belonging to one time-system. Of these 
durations some intersect each other, and some are 
parts of others. Thus any event-particle P is covered 
by many durations of this time-system, and lies in 
stations corresponding to these durations. We have 
now to consider the relations to each other of these 
various stations, each containing P. The fundamental 
theorem is as follows : If d and d' be durations of the 
same time-system, and d extends over d', and if P be 
an event-particle inhering in d', and s and s' be the 
stations of P in d and d' respectively, then s covers s' . 
In other words used in less technical senses, If d' be 
part of d, then s' is part of s. 

42-2 Any given station s in a duration d can thus 
be indefinitely prolonged throughout the time-system 
to which d belongs. For let d- L be any other duration 
of the same time-system which intersects d in the dura- 
tion d' and also extends beyond d. Then the part of s 
which is included in d' y namely s' (say), is a station in d'. 
Also there is one and only one station in d l9 s 1 (say), 
which covers s' ; and no other station in d 1 covers any 

w. 9 



130 III. METHOD OF EXTENSIVE ABSTRACTION 

event-particle of $'. In this way the station s is pro- 
longed in the time-system by the addition of the station 
s l9 and so on indefinitely. The complete locus of event- 
particles thus defined by the indefinite prolongation 
of a station throughout its associated time-system is 
called a * point-track/ 

A point-track intersects any moment of any time- 
system in one and only one event-particle. 

42-3 Each point-track has a unique association with 
the time-system in which the routes lying on it are 
stations. A point-track is called a * point* in the 'space 
of its associated time-system/ This space of a time- 
system is called * time-less ' because its points have no 
special relation to any one moment of its associated 
time-system. 

Each event-particle is contained in one and only one 
point of each time-system, and will be said to * occupy ' 
such a point. Two points of the same time-system 
never intersect ; two point-tracks which are respectively 
points in the spaces of different time-systems either 
do not intersect or intersect in one event-particle only. 

Since each point-track intersects any moment in one 
and only one event-particle, two co-momental event- 
particles cannot lie on the same point-track. A pair 
of sequent event-particles lie in one and only one 
point-track, apart from exceptional cases when they 
lie in 'null-tracks/ Null-tracks are introduced later 
in article 45.. 

42-4 In the four-dimensional geometry of event- 
particles it has already been pointed out that rects 
have the character of straight lines, but that since 
sequent event-particles do not lie on the same rect 
there is a missing set of straight lines required to com- 



POINTS AND STRAIGHT LINES 131 

plete the goemetry. Point-tracks [together with the 
exceptional set of loci termed * null-tracks '] form this 
missing set of straight lines for this geometry of event- 
particles. 

The event-particles occupying a point-track have an 
order derived from the covering moments of any time- 
system. Those on a null-track have an order derived 
from routes which it is not necessary to discuss. 

43. Parallelism. 43-1 A theory of parallelism holds 
for point-tracks and can be connected with the analo- 
gous theory for rects. Point-tracks which are points 
in the space of the same time-system are called 
'parallel.' Thus a complete family of parallel point- 
tracks is merely a complete family of points in the 
space of some time-system. The parallelism of point- 
tracks is evidently transitive, symmetrical and reflexive. 
The definition of the parallelism of stations is derived 
from that of point-tracks. 

43 2 The parallelism of point-tracks and the paral- 
lelism of rects and moments are interconnected. Let 
r be any rect in a moment M, and let IT be any family 
of parallel point-tracks. Then a certain set of point- 
tracks belonging to TT will intersect r, and this set will 
intersect any moment parallel to M in a rect parallel 
to r. Again let p be any point-track and let p be any 
complete family of parallel rects. Then a certain set 
of rects belonging to p will intersect p ; name it p p . Let 
P be any event-particle on some member of p p ; then 
the point-track containing P and parallel to p will 
intersect every member of p p . 

43-3 A theorem analogous to those of 43-2 also holds 
for two families of point- tracks. Let p be any point- 
track and let -n be any family of parallel point-tracks 

92 



132 III. METHOD OF EXTENSIVE ABSTRACTION 

to which p does not belong. Then a certain set of 
point-tracks belonging to IT will intersect/); name it -rr p . 
Let P be any event-particle occupying some member 
of K P ; then the point-track occupied by P and parallel 
top will intersect every member of 7r p . 

This theorem, the theorems of 43-2 and the corre- 
sponding theorem for two families of parallel rects are 
examples of the repetition property of parallelism. It 
is evident that, given any three event-particles not on 
one rect or one point-track, a parallelogram can be 
completed of which the three event-particles are three 
corners, any one of the event-particles being at the 
junction of the adjacent sides through the three corners. 
In such a parallelogram opposite sides are always of 
jthe same denomination, namely both rects or both 
point-tracks; but adjacent sides may be of opposite 
denominations. 

43 '4 The event-particles occupying a point p in the 
time-less space of a time-system a appear at the 
successive moments of a as successively occupying the 
same point p. If ft be any other time-system, then the 
point p of the space of a intersects a series of points of 
the space of ft in event-particles which lie on the suc- 
cessive moments of ft. These event-particles of p thus 
occupy a succession of points of ft at a succession of 
moments of ft\ and we shall find that this locus of 
points is what is meant by a straight line in the space 
of ft. Thus .the point p in the space of a correlates 
the successive points on a straight line of ft with the 
successive moments of ft Thus in the space of ft the 
point p of the space of a appears as exemplifying 
the kinematical conception of a moving material par- 
ticle traversing a straight line. It will appear later 



POINTS AND STRAIGHT LINES 133 

that, owing to the 'repetition property' of parallelism, 
the motion is uniform. 

44. Matrices. 44-1 A level is obtained by taking a 
rect r and an event-particle P co-momental with r, and 
by forming the locus of event-particles on rects through 
P and intersecting r y including also particles on the rect 
through P and parallel to r. 

The same level would be obtained by taking the 
particles on the rects intersecting r and parallel to some 
one rect through P which intersects r. 

44-2 Analogously to levels, a locus of event-particles 
called a 'matrix' is obtained by taking a rect r and an 
event-particle P which is not co-momental with r, and 
by forming the locus of event-particles on rects or 
point-tracks through P and intersecting r, including also 
the event-particles on the rect through P and parallef 
tor. 

A 'matrix' is a two-dimensional plane in the four- 
dimensional geometry of event-particles. Levels and 
matrices together make up the complete set of such 
two-dimensional planes, and have the usual properties 
of such planes which need not be detailed here. 

44-3 Matrices are also obtained by taking an event- 
particle P and a point-track^), and by forming the locus 
of event-particles on rects or point-tracks through P 
and intersecting/), including also event-particles on the 
point-track through P and parallel to p. Any matrix 
can be generated in either of the two ways. Further- 
more matrices can be generated by the use of parallels 
in the same way as levels are generated as explained in 
44-1 and as assumed in 43-4. 

45. Null-Tracks. 45-1 The relations between rects 
and point-tracks are best understood by taking a rect 



134 HI. METHOD OF EXTENSIVE ABSTRACTION 

r and a particle P which is not co-level with r. In this 
way a matrix is obtained as explained in 44-2. 




Fig. 9. 



Then in respect to P the rect r is divided into three 
(logical) parts by two event-particles I p and J p . The 
segment between I p and J p has the property that any 
event-particle on it is joined to P by a point-track [e.g. 
p in the figure] ; and either of the two infinite segments, 
namely that beyond I p and that beyond J p> is such that 
any event-particle on it is joined to P by a rect [e.g. 
r' and r" in the figure]. The above diagram and 
succeeding diagrams have the defect of representing 
matrices by levels, and thus of giving the conceptions 
an undeserved air of paradox. 

Again we may take an event-particle P and a point- 
track p not containing P. In this way a matrix is 
obtained as explained in 44*3. 

Then in respect to P the point-track p is divided 
by two event-particles I p andj^ into three (logical) parts. 
The segment between I p and J p has the property that 
any event-particle on it is joined to P by a rect [e.g. r in 
the figure] ; and either of the two infinite segments, re- 
spectively beyond I p and beyond J p9 is such that any 



POINTS AND STRAIGHT LINES 



135 



event-particle on it is joined to P by a point-track 
[e.g./)' and/)" in the figure]. 

P 



Fig. 10. 



45-2 It is evident therefore that a matrix in respect 
to an event-particle P lying on it is separated into four 
regions by two loci I p PI p and J p PJ p which may equally 
well be termed rects or point-tracks. 



P **' 




J'P 



Fig. ii. 



The event-particles in the vertically opposed regions 
I P PJ P and I P 'PJ P ' are joined to P by rects ; and the event- 
particles in the vertically opposed regions I p PJ p and 
I P 'PJ P are joined to P by point-tracks. 



136 III. METHOD OF EXTENSIVE ABSTRACTION 

The loci which bound the regions separating point- 
tracks from rects will be called ' null-tracks.' Their 
special properties will be considered later when con- 
gruence has been introduced. In any matrix there are 
two families of parallel null-tracks; and there is one 
member of each family passing through each event- 
particle on the rectilinear track. The order of event- 
particles on a null-track is derived from its intersection 
with systems of parallel rects [not co-momental] or 
of parallel point-tracks or from the orders on routes 
lying on it. 

46. Straight Lines. 46-1 There is evidently an im- 
portant theory of parallelism for families of matrices 
analogous to the theory of parallels for families of 
levels. The detailed properties need not be elaborated 
here. 

Two matrices may either (i) be parallel, or (ii) inter- 
sect in one event-particle only, or (iii) intersect in a 
rect, or (iv) intersect in a point-track, or (v) intersect 
in a null-track. For the intersection of two levels only 
cases (i), (ii) and (iii) can occur; for the intersection of 
a level and a matrix only cases (ii) and (iii) can occur. 

46-2 Each matrix contains various sets of parallel 
point-tracks. Any one such set is a locus of points in 
the space of some time-system. Such a locus of points 
is called a 'straight line' in the space of the time- 
system. 

A matrix which contains the points of a straight line 
in the space of any time-system a will be called 'an 
associated matrix for a,' and it is called 'the matrix 
including' that straight line. 

A matrix is an associated matrix for many time- 
systems, but it is the matrix including only one straight 



POINTS AND STRAIGHT LINES 137 

line in each corresponding space. The family of time- 
systems for which a given matrix is an associated matrix 
is called a ' collinear ' family. A whole family of parallel 
matrices are associated matrices for the same collinear 
family of time-systems, if any one matrix of the family 
is thus associated. In the space of any one time-system 
the straight lines included by a family of parallel 
associated matrices are said to be parallel. 

46-3 A matrix intersects a moment in a rect. If the 
moment belong to a time-system with which the matrix 
is associated, this rect in the moment corresponds to 
the straight line included by the matrix in the sense 
that it has one particle occupying each of its points. 
A rect thus associated with a straight line will be said 
to ' occupy' it. 

Thus the event-particles on a matrix m associated 
with a time-system a can be exhaustively grouped into 
mutually exclusive subsets in two distinct ways : (i)They 
can be grouped into the points of a which lie on m; 
this locus of points is the included straight line in the 
space of a, which we will name m a : (ii) The event- 
particles on m can be grouped into the sets of parallel 
rects which are the intersections of m with the moments 
of a, and thus each of these rects occupies m a . 

46-4 There are three different types of meaning 
which can be given to the idea of * space ' in connection 
with external nature, (i) There is the four-dimensional 
space of which event-particles are the points and the 
rects and point-tracks and null-tracks are the straight 
lines. In the geometry of this space there is a lack of 
uniformity between the congruence theories for rects 
and for point-tracks, and no such theory for null-tracks, 
(ii) There are the three-dimensional momentary (in- 



138 III. METHOD OF EXTENSIVE ABSTRACTION 

stantaneous) spaces in the moments of any time- 
system a, of which event-particles are the points and 
rects are the straight lines. The observed space of 
ordinary perception is an approximation to this exact 
concept, (iii) There is the time-less three-dimensional 
space of the time-system a, of which point-tracks are 
the points and matrices include the straight lines. This 
is the space of physical science. 

There is an exact correlation between the time-less 
space of a time-system and any momentary space of 
the same time-system. For any point of the momentary 
space is an event-particle which occupies one and only 
one point of the time-less space ; and any straight line 
of the momentary space is a rect which lies in one 
associated matrix including one straight line of the 
time-less space, or (in other words) each straight line 
of the momentary space occupies a straight line of the 
time-less space. 

A time-system corresponds to a consentient set of 
the Newtonian group, and the time-less space of the 
time-system is the space of the corresponding con- 
sentient group. 



CHAPTER XII 
NORMALITY AND CONGRUENCE 

47. Normality. 47-1 A point-track will be said to 
be * normal ' to the moments of the time-system in the 
space of which it is a point. 

A matrix is said to be * normal ' to the moments which 
are normal to any of the point-tracks which it contains. 

Consider an event-particle P and a matrix m which 
contains P. Let a, , y, . . . be the collinear set of time- 
systems whose points lie in or are parallel to the 
matrix m. Let P a , P^, P y , ... be the moments of the 
time-systems a, , y, . . . which contain P. Then the 
levels P a/3 , Pp yy ... in which respectively P a and P^, P^ 
and P 7 , etc., intersect are identical, and the event-particle 
P is the sole event-particle forming the intersection of m 
and P af3 . Also m intersects each of these moments P a , 
and P^, and P 7 , etc., in rects r a , r^ r y , etc., respectively. 
The level P aj8 and the matrix m are said to be mutually 
* normal.' It will be noted that any two time-systems, 
a and /?, determine one level and one matrix which are 
mutually normal and each contain a given event- 
particle. Corresponding to any level containing P there 
is one matrix normal to it at P; and corresponding to 
any matrix containing P there is one level normal to 
it at P. 

If / and m be a level and a matrix normal to each 
other, then the rects in 7 will be called normal to the 
rects and point-tracks in m. A pair of rects which are 
normal to each other will also be called ' perpendicular ' 
or 'at right-angles.' Two point-tracks can never be 



i 4 o III. METHOD OF EXTENSIVE ABSTRACTION 

normal to each other since no point-track lies on a level. 
Parallels to normals are themselves normal. 

47-2 Continuing the notation of 47-1 we note that 
the matrix m includes straight lines n a , n^ n y , etc., of 
the spaces of a, j8, y, etc., and intersects the moments 
P a , Pp, P 7 , etc., in rects T aJ r^r yy etc., which respectively 
occupy a , rip, W T , etc. The rect r a contains P and is 
normal to every rect lying in P aj3 . Let r' be any rect 
containing P and lying in P a p. Then r' and r a are 
mutually normal and both lie in the moment P a . 

The rect r 1 occupies one straight line in the space 
of a; name this straight line ri ' . Then the straight lines 
n a and ri will be said to be * normal ' to each other. This 
definition of the normality of straight lines can be given 
in general terms thus: Two straight lines in the same 
space are said to be normal to each other when they 
are respectively occupied by normal rects lying in the 
same moment of the corresponding time-system. 

47-3 Continuing the notation of 47-2 let /' be the 
level containing r a and r' ; this level lies in P a and con- 
tains P. Let m' be the matrix normal to /' at P. Then 
m' intersects P a/3 in a rect r" which is normal both to 
r a and to r'. Thus at an event-particle P in a level P a/3 
pairs of mutually normal rects, r' and r", exist, one of 
them chosen arbitrarily; and at an event-particle P 
in a moment P a triads of mutually normal rects, r a and 
r' and r", exist, with the usual conditions as to freedom 
of choice. 

The correspondence between a momentary space and 
the time-less space of the same time-system enables us 
immediately to extend these theorems to pairs of normal 
straight lines in a plane and to triads of intersecting 
mutually normal straight lines in three dimensions. 



NORMALITY AND CONGRUENCE 141 

48. Congruence. 48-1 Congruence is founded on 
the notion of repetition, namely in some sense congruent 
geometric elements repeat each other. Repetition em- 
bodies the principle of uniformity. Now we have found 
repetition to be a leading characteristic of parallelism ; 
accordingly a close connection may be divined to exist 
between congruence and parallelism. Furthermore we 
have just elaborated in outline the principles of nor- 
mality, pointing out how the property has its origin 
in the interplay of the relations of extension and co- 
gredience. ' But as we know from experience a 
leading property of normality is symmetry, namely, 
symmetry round the normal. Now symmetry is merely 
another name for a certain sort of repetition ; accordingly 
congruence and normality should be connected. 

We are thus led to look for an expression of the 
nature of congruence in terms of parallelism and 
normality, in particular in terms of repetition properties 
associated with them. 

48-2 Congruence, in so far as it is derived from 
parallelism, is defined by the statements that (i) the 
opposite sides of parallelograms are congruent to each 
other, and (ii) routes on the same rect, or on the same 
point-track, which are congruent to the same route are 
congruent to each other*. 

Also the general law holds that two routes which (as 
thus defined) are congruent to a third route, are con- 
gruent to each other. This law is a substantial theorem 
as to parallelism, and not a mere consequence of de- 
finitions. 

* This definition of congruence is given by Profs. E. B. Wilson and 
G. N. Lewis in their valuable memoir, 'The Space-Time Manifold 
of Relativity JProc. of the Amer. Acad. of Arts and Sciences,vol. XLVIII, 
1912 



i 4 2 III. METHOD OF EXTENSIVE ABSTRACTION 

But congruence, as thus expressed in terms of paral- 
lelism, merely establishes the congruent relation among 
straight routes on rects belonging to one parallel family, 
or on point-tracks belonging to one parallel family. 
For such routes in any one parallel family a system of 
numerical measurement can be established, of which 
the details need not be here elaborated. But no prin- 
ciple of comparison has yet been established between 
the lengths of two routes belonging to different parallel 
families of rects or belonging to different parallel 
families of point-tracks. When we can determine equal 
lengths on any two rects, whether parallel or no, the 
general principles for space-measurement will have been 
determined; and when we can determine equal lapses 
[i.e. lengths] of time on any two point-tracks, whether 
parallel or no, the general principles for time-measure- 
ment will have been determined. 

48-3 Congruence as between different parallel 
families results from the following definition founded 
on the repetition property [i.e. symmetry] of normality : 
Let AM and BC be a pair of mutually normal rects 
intersecting at M, or be a rect and point-track inter- 
secting at M [either AM or BC being the rect] and 
mutually normal, and let M be the middle event- 
particle of the straight route BC intervening between 
the event-particles B and C, then the straight routes 
AB and AC are congruent to each other. 

From the symmetry of normality either both pairs 
of particles, namely (A,B) and (A, C), are joined by 
rects, or both pairs are joined by point-tracks, or both 
pairs by null-tracks. As in the analogous case of con- 
gruence derived from parallelism, the transitiveness of 
congruence expresses a substantial law of nature and 



NORMALITY AND CONGRUENCE 



not a mere deduction from the terms of the defini- 
tion. 

A 



B 



M 

Fig. 12. 



48-4 The isosceles triangle of 48-3 must lie either 
on a level or on a matrix. If it lies on a level, all the 
straight routes of the figure must lie on rects. But on 
a matrix a pair of normals cannot be of the same de- 
nomination, i.e. not both rects nor both point-tracks. 
Thus five cases remain over for consideration. These 
cases are diagrammatically symbolised by the annexed 
figures where continuous lines represent rects, and 
dotted lines represent point-tracks. 




M 





(iii) 



B 



M 



(iv) 



B 



M 



Fig. 13- 



Evidently case (i) is the only case in which the 
triangle lies on a level ; the triangles in the remaining 
four cases lie on matrices. 



144 HI. METHOD OF EXTENSIVE ABSTRACTION 

The relations between the diagrams (ii) and (v) can 
best be seen by combining them into one figure as in 
(vi), and the relations between (iii) and (iv) by com- 
bining them into one figure as in (vii). 




/i 



>x^ / 


\\, 


./^ / 


\ ^S^ 


^r / 


\ ^x^ 


s' 1 


\ ^x, 


^ r 


\ ^x. 


./^ / 

** * ^ J 


\ . ^N 


5m /^ J5 iv A 


/ Cw J A Ciii 


Fig. 


14. 



48-5 Case (i) of 48-4 enables us to complete the con- 
gruence theory for spatial measurements. Let r^ and r 2 
be any two co-momental rects intersecting in the event- 
particle A. Let B be any particle on r 1? and let r 2 ' be 
the rect through B parallel to r 2 . 

Now assume that it is possible to find one pair of 
mutually normal rects, r and r', intersecting each other 
at Ay and respectively intersecting r 2 ' at D and Z)', 
where DB = BD'. Through B draw r" parallel to r' 
and intersecting r 2 in C* '; and through D draw r/ 
parallel to r x and intersecting r 2 in C'. 

Then from 48-1, AC" = BD' and AC = BD. Thus 
C" and C" denote the same event-particle. Now 



NORMALITY AND CONGRUENCE 145 

BM= MC'. Hence by case (i) of 48-4, AB= AC'. 
Thus lengths on r^ and r 2 are comparable. We need 
not here consider the theorems, either assumed as in- 
dependent laws of nature or deduced from previous 
assumptions, by which we know that the rectangular 
pair (r and r') exist, that C' and C" coincide and do 
not lie on opposite sides of A, and that BM= MC'. 

48-6 Again if r and r 2 are rects which are not co- 
momental and do not lie in parallel moments, their 
measurements are still comparable. For two inter- 
secting moments, M^ and M 2 , exist, of which M l 
contains r and M 2 contains r 2 . Thus any rect r' in the 




Fig. 15- 

level common to M l and M 2 has its measurements 
comparable both to those on r x and to those on r 2 ; and 
thus, by the transitiveness of congruence, the measure- 
ments on T-L and r 2 are comparable. By this procedure 
the employment of cases (ii) and (iii) of 48-4 is rendered 
unnecessary. Accordingly these cases become theorems 
instead of being definitions of congruence as contem- 
plated in their original enunciation. If they had been 
taken as definitions, the deduction of 48-5 would still 
be possible. But since the figure would now lie in a 



w. 



10 



146 III. METHOD OF EXTENSIVE ABSTRACTION 

matrix, one of r and r' would be a point-track and the 
other a rect. No very obvious principle then exists by 
which we could know of the existence of the pair 
(r and r') such that DB= BD' , apart from the assump- 
tion of the theorem which we want to prove. 

487 Cases (iv) and (v) of 48-4 deal with the com- 
parability of time-measurements in different time- 
systems. The same remarks as those in 48*6 apply; 
namely that the method of 48-5 could be applied, if inde- 
pendently we could convince ourselves that the requisite 
pair, r and r' (one a point-track and one a rect), exist. 

This comparability of time-measurements will be 
achieved by another method which depends on the 
fact that relative velocity is equal and opposite. The 
explanation of this method must be reserved for the 
next chapter. 



CHAPTER XIII 
MOTION 

49. Analytic Geometry. 49-1 Consider any time- 
system a: we will term the space of this time-system 
'a-space' and its moments ^-moments'; also the 
points and straight lines of a-space will be termed 
'a-points' and 'a-lines,' and rects and levels which lie 
in a-moments will be termed 'a-rects' and 'a-levels.' 
If P be any event-particle, then P a will denote the 
a-moment which covers P. If /? be any other time- 
system, there are no j8-moments which are also a- 
moments, and no ^-points which are also a-points; 
but there are a-levels which are also /2-levels and a-rects 
which are also j8-rects. For the two moments P a and 
Pp intersect in a common level which will be called 
P a p. Then rects lying in P aj3 are both a-rects and jS-rects. 
In particular through P in the level P aj3 pairs of mutually 
normal rects exist, and every rect through P and P aj8 
is a member of one such pair. 

49*2 Let O be any arbitrarily chosen event-particle, 
which we will term the origin; and let OO at be the 
a-point occupied by O; and let OO ax , OO ay , OO az be 
any triad of mutually rectangular a-rects in the moment 
O a , each containing O. In this notation O at , O ax , etc., 
do not denote any particular entities, but the symbols 
such as OO at and OO ax are each to be taken as one 
whole. Let O axt denote the matrix containing OO at 
and OO ax , with analogous meanings for O ayt and O azt ', 
and let O ayz , O azx and O axy denote respectively the 
levels containing OO ay and OO az , OO az and OO ax , 



10 2 



148 III. METHOD OF EXTENSIVE ABSTRACTION 

OO aX and OO ay . Let P be any other event-particle 
occupying the point OO at , and let PP M , PP ay , PP az 
be the a-rects through P respectively parallel to OO ax> 



oo ay , oo c 




In the diagram the third dimension of the moments 
O a and P a , namely the #- dimension, is suppressed, so 
that these moments are diagrammatically represented 
as two-dimensional. Point-tracks (in this case a-points) 
are represented by dotted lines. The diagram has the 
defect of representing matrices, such as O axt , by levels, 
and is thus liable to lead to unfounded assumptions. 

49-3 Lengths on all rects, whether or no they be 
a-rects, are measurable in terms of one unit length. 
But time-lapses between a-moments or, what is the 
same thing, time-lapses along a-points must be 
measured in a time-unit peculiar to the time-system a, 
since as yet no means of obtaining congruent time-units 
in different time-systems has been disclosed. We will 



MOTION 



149 



suppose at present that in each time-system there is 
a given arbitrarily chosen unit for time-measurement. 

49-4 Let the momentary space of O a be referred to 
the three rectangular a-rects OO ax , OO ay , OO az as 
axes of coordinates; and let the momentary space 
of P a be referred to the three rectangular a-rects PP ax , 
PP ay , PP az as axes of coordinates; and let the time-less 
space of a [the a-space] be referred to the three rect- 
angular a-lines respectively included in the matrices 
O axt , O ayt , O azt as axes of coordinates; and let the 
four-dimensional space of all particles be referred to 
the four axes consisting of the three a-rects OO ax , 
OO ay , OO az , and of the a-point OO at as axes of co- 
ordinates. 

49-5 Let K be any event-particle in the moment O a , 
and let K occupy the a-point KK at which intersects 
the moment P a in the event-particle Q. Let the lapse 
of time between the moments O a and P a be t a , where 
t a is positive when P a is subsequent to O a ; and let the 
coordinates of the a-point KK at in the a-space be 
( x a> J a > #a) Then the coordinates of K in the momen- 
tary space of O a and of Q in the momentary space of 
P a are also (x a , y a , z a ): Also the ' a-coordinates ' of Q 
in the four- dimensional space of particles are (x aj y a , 
z a , t a ); this fact for Q can also be expressed by saying 
that Q occupies the a-point (x a , y a , z a ) at the a-time t a . 

A moment, viewed as a locus of event-particles, is 
represented by a linear equation in the four coordinates 
(# a y a , #a> O- ^ ut tne converse is not true ; namely, not 
every linear equation represents a moment. A pair of 
linear equations represent a level or a matrix, and three 
independent linear equations represent a rect or a 
point-track or a null-track. 



i 5 o III. METHOD OF EXTENSIVE ABSTRACTION 

49-6 If a and fi be any two time-systems, two sets 
of mutually normal axes, OO ax , OO ay , OO az , OO a/ , 
and OOp x , OOp y , OO^, OO^, can be found as in the 
previous subarticle. But these two sets can evidently 
be so adjusted that OO ay is identical with OOp y and 
OO az is identical with OO^, where the two rects 
(OO ay and OO az ) must both lie in the level O a/3 . Then 




Fig. 17. 

the matrix normal to this level at O will be denoted by 
O a p f ; it contains through O one a-point OO atJ one -point 
OO0,, one a-rect OO ax , and one -rect OO. Then 
any event-particle is referred to the axes OO 
OO a2 , OO at for the system a, and to the axes OO^, 
OOp z , OOp t for the system p. Let its a-coordinates 
be (# a , y a , z a , t a ) and its ^-coordinates be (xp,y ft , Zp, fy), 
where y a = yp, and ^ a = . 



axi ^J^'ay) 



MOTION 151 

In the diagram, for the sake of simplicity, the particle 
Q is in the matrix O a ^; and its coordinates [as in the 
diagram] in the two systems are (x a , 0,0, t a ) and (xp, 
> > tp), where PQ (with its proper sign) is x a , HQ 
(with its proper sign) is t a , P'Q (with its proper sign) 
is Xp, and KQ (with its proper sign) is tp. 

A pair of sets of four axes for a and j8 allied as de- 
scribed in this subarticle are called * mutual axes' for 
the two systems. 

49-7 The formulae for transformation from the 
a-coordinates to the ^-coordinates, referred to mutual 
axes, are obviously of the form 

Xp = l a px a + ti a pt a ,yp=y a , # = *, tp~tf#t a +QpX m (i), 

where Q a/3 , l' a p, Q^, &p are constants dependent on 
the two systems a and j8 and on the two arbitrarily 
chosen units of time-lapse in a and j8, but evidently 
not dependent on the arbitrarily chosen set of rect- 
angular rects OO ay and OO az in the level O a/3 . 

The corresponding (x, ) -equations, interchanging 
a and j8, are 

x a = QpaXp + dpatp, t a = Qfrtp + QfaXp (ii). 

The two pairs of (#, ^-equations, (i) and (ii), must 
be equivalent. The conditions are 



! /3a 

-n' n:'...(iii). 



f~ r^-~ j p^ 

Only four out of these five conditions are independent. 

50. The Principle of Kinematic Symmetry. 50-1 
Consider any other time-system TT. The ?r-point (/>.) 
occupied by (# a , j a , ^ a , Z a ) and the a-point occupied by 



152 III. METHOD OF EXTENSIVE ABSTRACTION 

the same event-particle lie on a matrix m which includes 
an a-line (m a ) of which every a-point is intersected by 
p w . Thus/v correlates the a-point (# a , y a , z a ) with the 
a-time t ay and the neighbouring a-point on m a , namely 
(x a + x a dt a> y a + y a dt a , z a + z a dt a ), with the neighbour- 
ing a-time t a -f- dt a . In this way IT makes every set of 
a-coordinates of a variable a-point to be a function of 
Z a ; namely it correlates an a-point (x a , y a , z a ) with the 
velocity (x a , y a , z a ), which can also be written 
f dx d* d 



Analogously the same time-system -n correlates a 
-point (xp, y^ Zp) with the velocity (xp, fa, Zp), 
which can be written 



Now the time-system ?r indicates a definite trans- 
ference from an event-particle (x^ y^, z^ y t^) to another 
event-particle (#., y v , z^ t v + dt v ) occupying the same 
7r-point (XK, jv> %), where any mutually normal 7r-coor- 
dinates are employed. The former event-particle is that 
indicated by (x a ,y a , z a , t a ) and by (x^y^, Zp, t ft ), and the 
latter event-particle by (# a + x a dt a9 y a + y a dt a9 z a + z a dt a , 
t a + dt a ) and by (xp+ x^dt^y^+y^dt^ zp+ z^dtp, tp+ dtp). 

Hence from equations (i) of 49-7 



Now 77- is any time-system. First identify it with a. 
Then x a = o, y a = o, z a = o. Hence yp= o, Zp= o, 
and xp is the velocity of the time-system a in the space 



MOTION 153 

of p [or, more briefly, the ' velocity of a in ']. Let this 
velocity be Vp a ; it is evidently along the #-axis in the 
space of ft and ^ = ^^ (ii) _ 

Again identify the system TT with j8. Then x$ = o, 
y/s = o, * = o ; and hence >> a = o, ar a = o, and x a is the 
velocity of ft in a. Let this velocity be F a/3 ; it is along 
the tf-axis in the space of a, and 

V^-ti^to^ (iii). 

50-2 We will now introduce what we will term the 
'Principle of Kinematic Symmetry.' 

Before enunciating this principle it is necessary to 
determine a standard method of choosing the positive 
directions of the axes OO ax and OOp x in the matrix O ttj8 /, 
and of the axes OO at and OOp t . By reference to the 
figure of subarticle 45-2 it will be seen that, of the four 
angular regions into which the rects OO ax and OOp x 
divide the matrix O tt/3/ , two vertically opposite regions 
include no point-tracks passing through O and the 
remaining two such regions include point-tracks as 
well as rects through O. The standard choice of positive 
directions forOO ax andOO^ is such that the two regions 
bounded one by both positive directions of these axes, 
and the other by both negative directions, should in- 
clude only rects passing through O. 

The positive directions for OO at and OOp t are settled 
by the rule that a positive measure of lapse of time 
should indicate subsequence in the time-order to the 
moment O a . This rule is definite because of the ultimate 
distinction between antecedence and subsequence in 
time, which has not otherwise been made use of. This 
standard choice of positive directions along mutual axes 
for two time-systems will always be adopted. 



i 5 4 HI. METHOD OF EXTENSIVE ABSTRACTION 

50-3 The principle of kinematic symmetry has two 
parts, enunciating consequences which flow from the 
fact that the time-units in two time-systems a and ft 
are congruent. The first part may be taken as the 
definition, or necessary and sufficient test, of such 
congruence. 

The first part of the principle can be enunciated as 
the statement that the measures of relative velocities 
[i.e. the velocity of ft in a and of a in j8] are equal and 
opposite; namely ^ +F ^ =O ............ (i)< 

The second part is the principle of the symmetry of 
two time-systems in respect to transverse velocities; 
namely, if a velocity U in a, normally transverse to 
the direction of ft in a, is represented by the velocity 
(Vpa> U') in ft, where Vp a is along the direction of a in 
ft and U' is normally transverse to it, then the same 
magnitude of velocity U in /?, normally transverse to 
the direction of a in j8, is represented by the velocity 
(Fa/s> U') in a, where F a/3 is along the direction of a in 
ft, and U' is normally transverse to it. 

From the first part of the principle, by (ii) and (iii) 

of 50-1, we deduce . 

Oo^A* ............... (ii). 

In order to apply the second part of the principle we 
first identify n with (x a = o,y a = U, z a = o), then from 
(i) and (ii) of 50-1 



Again we identify -n with (x^ = o y y^= U, z$ = o), and 
by interchanging a and ft in the above formulae we find 



MOTION 155 

Hence by the second part of the principle 



51. Transitivity of Congruence. 51-1 It follows, from 
(iii) of 49-7, and from (ii) and (iii) of 50-1, and from 
(i), (ii), (iii) of 50-3, that equations (i) of 50-1 can be 
written 



where V afS + V^ = o, & a p = Q^, Q^ + Oj a = o, 

0^(Q^-F^Q^>-i ........ (ii). 

We can now express & ajS and H^ in terms of F a/3 
and an absolute constant by considering deductions 
from the transitivity of congruence. 

51-2 Let y be a time-system such that the level O ay 
contains OO ax and OO az , and let these rects be the 
axes OO yx and OO yz . Then the matrix O ayt contains 
OO ay , OO yy , OO at and OO yt . Thus we have obtained 
a set of mutual axes for a and y ; namely, (OO ax , OO ay , 
00 az , 00 at ) and (OO yx , OO yy , OO yz , OO 7/ ), where 
OO ay and OO yy now play the part that OO ax and OOp x 
sustain for a and . Thus the velocities of the time- 
system TT in a and y are, by (i) of 51-1, connected by 



: 



We have here assumed the congruence of the time 
units in a and y. 

Now identify ?r with y. Then 

x y = o, y y = o, ^ 7 = o, x a = o, y a = F a7 , ^ a = o. 



156 III. METHOD OF EXTENSIVE ABSTRACTION 
Hence from (i) of 51-1 



But 

Hence V^ = V^ + V^ti^. .. ....... (ii). 

Again identify TT with ]8. Then 

xp = o, y$ = o, = o, # a = F a/3 , y a = o, a = o. 
Hence from (i) of this subarticle 

x y = V af3 /a ayy y y =- V ay , z y = o. 
But *!J +^ + ^=F 7 V 

Hence V^ = Vl, + V^tf ay ....... . (iii). 

From (ii) and (iii) and (i) of 50-3 

F a V(i - Q# - F a 2 7 /(i - ^) .... (iv). 

51-3 Evidently if 8 be any other member of the 
collinear set of time-systems (a, 0), then 

F.V(i - Qi?) = F a 2 7 /(i - O a -, 2 ) ..... .(v). 

Hence if s be a collinear set of time-systems, and 
a, j8, S, e be any four of its members, 

F/(I - Q;/) = Fi/(i - n; 5 2 ) ; | 

and hence, since H a5 = Q 5a , we obtain 

F^/(i - Q$ = Fi/(i - Q 5 - 2 ) = A s . . . (vi), 

where ^ s is a constant for the collinear set. 

Furthermore, if y be a time-system not belonging 
to s but related to a and 5 as explained in 51-2, 



51-4 Now let a, j8, 7] be any three non-collinear time- 
systems, and construct a diagram to represent elements 
in the time-less space of a according to the familiar 
method of geometricians. 



MOTION 157 

The points of the diagram symbolise a-points, and 
the straight lines of the diagram symbolise a-lines. Let 
O be any a-point and let OX be the direction in a-space 
of the velocity V a p. Then OX is the direction in a-space 
of the velocity (positive or negative) of any member of 




m Fig. 18. 

the collinear set (a, ). Let OL be the direction in 
a-space of the velocity V ar} ; by hypothesis OL is distinct 
from OX. Let OM be the a-line perpendicular to the 
a-plane LOX, and let y be a time-system whose velocity 
in a, namely F a7 , is along OM. Let s denote the collinear 
set (a, ), s' the collinear set (a, y), and s" the collinear 
set (a, 77). Hence from (vi) of 51-3 



Hence from (vii) of 51-3 

R s ' = K sy K s ' = K s ". 

Thus k s = k s . ....... ......... (i). 

Hence, since V^= Vp a and Q a/s = Q^, it is easy to 
prove that k s is the same for any pair of time-systems ; 
in other words, that k s is an absolute constant. 

52. The Three Types of Kinematics. 52-1 There are 
thus three types of kinematics possible, according as 



158 III. METHOD OF EXTENSIVE ABSTRACTION 



k s is positive, negative, or infinite. The formally 
possible type where k s is zero requires that either & a/3 
or V a p should be zero ; by reference to (i) of 49-7 and 
to (i) of 51-1 this supposition is seen to lead to results 
in such obvious contradiction to experience as to 
preclude the necessity for further examination. Let 
us name the types retained (according to the familiar 
habit) the * hyperbolic/ the 'elliptic' and the 'para- 
bolic' types of kinematics. 

52-2 First consider the hyperbolic type and put c 2 
for k s . The equations of articles 49 and 51 then become 

Vaft + Vf* = o, o^ - <y- (i - F> 2 ) -i. . (i), 



^a *a 



^ + 



6 a> 

^*. 




V^x. 



to- VM I+Z ? 

* * /a (r . ***' 

#/3 - *,/ "a/S I H T 



.("), 



....(iii). 



The equations of transformation, namely (ii), can be 
expressed symmetrically as between a and p by means 
of the scheme [where i 2 = i] 

V 1 J <V 4 S*-f 

* VaJ -ai ZC-t,, 



, o, o, 

, i, o, 

> o, i, 

^ o, o, 



c 
o 
o 



MOTION 159 

52*3 We notice that 



The integral ttHdx a dy a dz a dt a 
taken throughout the four-dimensional region of the 
set of event-particles which analyse [cf . 37*3] an event e 
will be called the ' absolute extent ' of e. It follows from 
(i) that the absolute extent of an event is independent 
of the time-system in which its measure is expressed. 

Furthermore if K be any function of (x ay y a , # a , t a ), 
it can by (ii) of 52-2 be also expressed as a function of 

and then b y (0 

dy a dz a dt a - MSKdx ft dy ft d* ft dt ft . . . .(ii), 
or, in more familiar form, 

fdt a . MKdx a dy a dz a = fdt ft . JJJ Kdx ft <fy ft d* ft . .(iii), 
where the limits are taken to include some event. 

We may expect important physical properties to be 
expressible in terms of such integrals, in particular 
where K is an invariant form for the equations of trans- 
formation of 52-2, and when the conditions, which the 
quantity represented by the integral satisfies, are also 
invariant in their expression in different time-systems. 

The formulae of this subarticle hold of each type of 
kinematics. 

52-4 The hyperbolic type of kinematics has issued 
in the formulae of the Larmor-Lorentz-Einstein theory 
of electromagnetic relativity, namely, the theory by 
which with a certain amount of interpretation the 
electromagnetic equations are invariant for these 
transformations . 

The physical meaning of c is also well known; 
namely, any velocity which in any time-system is of 



160 III. METHOD OF EXTENSIVE ABSTRACTION 

magnitude c is of the same magnitude in every other 
time-system. No assumption of the existence of a 
velocity with this property or of the electromagnetic 
invariance has entered into the deduction of the kine- 
matic equations of the hyperbolic type. A velocity 
greater than c cannot represent any time-system, and 
accordingly its physical significance must be entirely 
different from that of a velocity less than c. 
52-5 It is easily proved from (ii) of 52-2 that 

xl +yl + *a ~ c*tl = *J + yl + zl- c*tl . . . .(i). 
If the origin O and the event-particle P, i.e. (x a , y a , 
z a > O> be co-momental and TT be the time-system 
whose moment O^ contains P, then by (i) 

xl+yl + zl- c 2 tl = *J +> + 4 .(ii). 
If O and P be sequent and on a point-track, and TT be 
the time-system whose point OO^ is occupied by P, 
then by (i) ^-^-tf-^.W* (iii ). 

Thus there are three ways in which the ' separation ' 
between two event-particles (O and P) can be estimated ; 
namely, (i) in any assumed time-system a the a-distance 
between the a-points occupied by the event-particles 
measures a-space separation: (2) the lapse of a-time 
between the a-moments occupied by the event-particles 
measures a-time separation: and (3) if the event-par- 
ticles be co-momental, J(xl + yl+z* a - c 2 t 2 a ) measures 
the 'proper' space separation and there is no 'proper' 
time separatipn; and if the particles be sequent, 



; } 



measures the 'proper' time separation and there is no 
'proper' space separation. 



MOTION 161 

In the framing of physical laws it is essential to con- 
sider what measure of separation is relevant. It is to 
be noted that there may be time-systems a (other than 77) 
of special relevance to the phenomena in question. It 
is not at all obvious that invariance of form in respect 
to all time-systems is a requisite in the complete ex- 
pression of such laws; namely, the demand for rela- 
tivistic equations is only of limited applicability. 

If O and P be on a null-track 

. xl+yl + sl-c>tl = o (iv). 

Event-particles on the same null-track may be ex- 
pected to have special physical relations to each other. 
Call such event-particles 'co-null/ 

52-6 We may conceive a special time-system 77 
associated (by some means) with each event-particle 
(*a> J>a> * a > *a)- Thus 77 is a function of these four co- 
ordinates of a particle ; or in other words, (x a , y a , z a ) 
are functions of (x a , y aj z a , t a ). 

A correlation of time-systems to event-particles which 
is one-many, so that there is one and only one time- 
system corresponding to each event-particle, is called 
a * complete kinematic correlation.' The portion of 
that correlation which only concerns event-particles at 
the time t a is called a * kinematic ^-correlation.' Other 
portions can be selected by confining the event-particles 
to certain regions in the a-space. 

If in a certain kinematic correlation the time-system 
77 be correlated to (x a , y a , z ay t a ), then 77 is called the 
time-system of (x a , y a , z a , t a ) ' proper ' to that correlation. 
The ' proper' time-system of an event-particle always 
refers to a certain kinematic correlation implicitly 
understood. Furthermore (x a , y a> z a ) is the velocity 

W. II 



i6 2 III. METHOD OF EXTENSIVE ABSTRACTION 

at (x ay y a , z a ) due to the implicitly understood kinematic 
correlation at the a-time t a . 

Then, TT being the proper time-system at (x a , y a , z ay t a ), 



(i). 



Then equations (iii) of 52-2 can be written 



The kinematic symmetry as between a and p is now 
apparent in the formulae. The first of equations (ii) can 
be replaced by 

ir + i^ + ^ =I (iii) - 

v a p ' fia *" 

52-7 In considering the elliptic type of kinematics 
put h 2 for k s . The equations of article 51 are now 
embodied in the scheme 





x y z ht 


., 


v*P+ 


*V 0> 0> h 


y 


, I, 0, 


*e 


, 0, I, 


hf 


O O O 


ft 


h ' ' "?* 


Also V^ + V^ = o, n a/3 = % = (i + Vlplh* 





I 



. .(i), 



(ii). 



MOTION 163 

Also x l+yl + + h*t\ = jcj +y* ft + 4 + tftl . .(iii). 

The fundamental distinction between space and time, 
i.e. between rects and point-tracks, has failed to find 
any expression in the formulae for measurement rela- 
tions. Accordingly with this type of kinematics, it 
would be natural to suppose that the distinction does 
not exist and that every rect was a point-track and every 
point-track a rect. This conception is logically possible 
but does not appear to correspond to the properties of 
the external world of events as we know it. Furthermore 
the electromagnetic equations lose their invariant 
property. 

Altogether there appear to be good reasons for putting 
aside the elliptic type of kinematics as inapplicable to 
nature. 

52-8 In the parabolic type of kinematics we put 
A s =co. Hence Q ^ =i ................ (i) 

Then from (ii) of 51-1 and (ii) of 50-3 and (iii) of 
5 ' 1 D-= , Q^=i, ti a p=-V a p ....(ii). 

Thus equations (i) of 49-7 give 

Xp = x a - V a pt a , yp =y a9 Zp = z a , tp=t a . .(iii). 

These are the formulae for the ordinary Newtonian 
relativity. 

These formulae are well in accordance with common 
sense and are in fact the formulae naturally suggested 
by ordinary experience. To some extent the hyper- 
bolic formulae lead to unexpected results, though, if 
c be a velocity not less than that of light, the divergences 
from the deliverances of common sense take place, in 
respect to phenomena which are not manifest in ordi- 
nary experience. But when by refined methods of 



II 2 



164 HI. METHOD OF EXTENSIVE ABSTRACTION 

observation the divergences between the two types of 
kinematics should be apparent to the senses, experi- 
ment has, so far, pronounced in favour of the hyperbolic 
type. Accordingly it is this type which we consider in 
the sequel. 

52-9 There is however one objection to the hyper- 
bolic type, as compared to the parabolic type, which is 
worth considering. In the hyperbolic kinematics there 
is an absolute velocity c with special properties in 
nature. The difficulty which is thus occasioned is 
rather an offence to philosophic instincts than a logical 
puzzle. But certainly our familiar experience, in some 
way which it is difficult to formulate in words, leads 
us to shun the introduction of such absolute physical 
quantities. This particular difficulty is largely di- 
minished by noting that the existence of c with its 
peculiar properties really means that the space-units 
and time-units are comparable; namely, there is a 
natural relation between them to be expressed by 
taking c to be unity. Either the time-unit would then 
be inconveniently small or the space-unit inconven- 
iently large; but this inconvenience does not alter the 
fact that congruence between time and space is de- 
finable. Always when a possible definition of con- 
gruence is omitted, such absolute physical quantities 
occur. The fact that, so far as time and space are 
concerned, the existence of a congruence theory seems 
paradoxical, is due to absence of any phenomena 
depending on that theory except in very exceptional 
circumstances produced by refined observations. 



PART IV 
THE THEORY OF OBJECTS 

CHAPTER XIV 
THE LOCATION OF OBJECTS 

53. Location. 53-1 We conceive objects as located 
in space. This conception of location in space is dis- 
tinct from that of being situated in an event, though 
the two concepts are closely allied by a determinate 
connection. The notion of the situation of an object 
is logically indefinable being one of the ultimate data of 
science; the notion of the location of an object is 
definable in terms of the notion of its situation. 

An object is said to be * located' in an abstractive 
element if there is a simple abstractive class * converg- 
ing ' to the element and such that each of its members 
is a situation of the object. 

In general when an object is located in an abstractive 
element there will be many simple abstractive classes 
converging to the element and such that each of their 
members is a situation of the object. In any specific 
case of location usually all abstractive classes of a 
certain type will possess the required property. 

It follows from this definition that, in the primary 
signification of location, an object is located in an 
element of instantaneous space. The notion of location 
in an element of time-less space follows derivatively 
by correlating the elements of instantaneous space to 
the elements of time-less space in the way already 



1 66 IV. THE THEORY OF OBJECTS 

described. In our immediate thoughts which follow 
perception we make a jump from the situation of an 
object within the short specious present to its location 
in instantaneous space, and thence by further reflexion 
to its location in time-less space. Thus location in 
space is always an ideal of thought and never a fact of 
perception. An object may be located in a volume, an 
area, a route, or an event-particle of instantaneous 
space, and thence derivatively it will be located in a 
volume, or an area, or a segment, or a point of time- 
less space. 

53-2 In considering the scientific object it is the 
occupied event which corresponds to the situation of 
the physical object. The occupied event is the situation 
of the charge, in so far as the single scientific object is 
conceived as an (ideal) physical object. 

53-3 There are evidently many different kinds of 
location which satisfy the general definition of location 
in an abstractive element, even when the kind of ab- 
stractive element is assigned. These differences mainly 
arise from differences in the relations of objects to parts 
of their situations. An object is an atomic entity and 
as such is related to its situations. But a situation is an 
event with parts of various kinds, and we have to con- 
sider the various kinds of relationships which objects 
may have to various kinds of parts of their situations. 

For example, if the sense-object * redness, of a definite 
shade' be Ipcated in an area, it will be located in any 
portion of that area ; and this arises from the fact that 
if it be situated in an event, it is also situated in any 
portion of that event. But it is not true that if a chair 
be situated in an event, that the chair as one atomic 
object is situated in any part of the event though it 



THE LOCATION OF OBJECTS 167 

is so situated in some parts. Again a tune cannot be 
situated in any event comprised in a duration too short 
for the successive notes to be sounded. Thus for a tune 
a minimum quantum of time is necessary. 

54. Uniform Objects. 54-1 It will be convenient to 
classify objects according as they do or do not satisfy 
certain impprtant conditions respecting their relations 
to their situations. 

' Uniform ' objects are objects with a certain smooth- 
ness in their temporal relations, so that they require 
no minimum quantum of time-lapse in the events which 
are their situations. These are objects which can be 
said to exist 'at a given moment.' For example, a tune 
is not an uniform object; but a chair, as ordinarily 
recognised, is such an object. The example of the chair, 
and the dissolution of its continuous materials with 
specific physical constants into assemblages of electrons, 
warn us that a problem remains over for discussion 
after we shall have defined the meaning to be assigned 
to * uniformity.' 

54-2 In order to explain more precisely the theory 
of uniform objects, it is convenient to make a few 
definitions : 

A ' slice ' of an event e in a time-system a is that part 
of e lying between two moments of a, where both 
moments intersect e. The two moments are called the 
terminal moments of the slice, and the volumes in 
which the terminal moments intersect e are called the 
terminal volumes. For brevity a slice of e in the time- 
system a is called an ' a-slice of e.' 

It follows from the continuity of events that any 
a-moment lying between the terminal moments of an 
a-slice of e intersects e. in a volume. Such a volume is 



i68 IV. THE THEORY OF OBJECTS 

called an a-section of the slice. A slice is itself an event 
which stretches throughout the duration bounded by 
its terminal moments. Thus if the duration be the 
specious present for some percipient, the slice of e is 
the part of the event e which falls within that specious 
present. 

54-3 The properties of uniform objects will be 
enunciated as a set of laws regulating their character. 

Law I. If a be any time-system and e be a situation 
of an uniform object O, then an a-slice of e exists which 
is a situation of O. 

Law II. If a be any time-system and e be a situation 
of an uniform object O and e' be an a-slice of e which 
is a situation of O, then every a-slice of e' is a situation 
ofO. 

Law I can roughly be construed as meaning that if 
an uniform object O has been situated in any event, then 
there is some period of time (in any time-system) during 
which it has existed ; and in the same way Law II means 
that if an uniform object has existed during any period 
of time, then it has existed during any shorter period 
within that period. These laws are obvious as applied 
to uniform objects, but not so obvious for objects in 
general, as * object' is here defined. For example a 
musical note cannot exist in a period of time shorter 
than its period of vibration, and a percipient whose 
specious present was too short could not hear it. It 
follows from law II that if an uniform object O is 
situated in an event e and e' be an a-slice of e which is 
a situation of O, then an abstractive class of a-slices 
converging to any a-section of e' can be found such 
that O is situated in each member of the class. Hence 
evidently O is located in every a-section of e' . This is 



THE LOCATION OF OBJECTS 169 

the conception of an uniform object being located in a 
spatial volume at a durationless moment of time. 

With certain explanations and limitations laws I and 
II apply to many types of objects. In fact it requires 
an effort to realise that there are cases to which they 
do not apply. They have been stated above in the most 
formal manner to exhibit the fact that, when they do 
apply, they are empirical laws of nature and not priori 
logical truths. 

55. Components of Objects. 55-1 The concept of a 
'component' of a main object is difficult to make 
precise. A component of an object O is another dis- 
tinct object O' such that (i) whenever O is situated in 
an event e y there is an event e' > which is either e itself 
or a part of e, in which O' is situated, and (ii) O' may 
also be situated in an event e" which is not a situation 
of O or any part of a situation of O. 

Thus a component is necessary to the main object, 
but the main object is not necessary to the component. 
For example, a certain note may be necessary for a 
certain tune, but the note can be sounded without the 
tune. The main object requires its component, but the 
component does not require the main object. 

But this general idea of a component is not of great 
importance apart from further specialisation. There 
are many such specialisations; but in science there are 
three which are of peculiar importance, namely, ' con- 
current components,' 'extensive components' and 
'causal components.' 

55-2 An object O' is a 'concurrent' component of 
an object O when it is a component of O, and if e be any 
situation of O, there is an event e' which is part of e 
and is such that (i) it is a situation of O' and (ii) it is 



iyo IV. THE THEORY OF OBJECTS 

cut in a slice which is a situation of O' by any duration 
which cuts e in a slice which is a situation of O. 

Thus a concurrent component lasts concurrently 
with the main object in any time-system. 



CHAPTER XV 
MATERIAL OBJECTS 

56. Material Objects. 56-1 A material object is 
essentially a material object of a certain definite sort; 
namely, we define sorts of material objects, which are 
sets of objects with certain definite peculiarities, and 
a material object is such because it is a member of one 
of these sorts. For example a piece of wood is a material 
object because it belongs to the class of wooden objects 
and because this class possesses the requisite peculiar- 
ities. Similarly a charge of electricity is a material 
object for an analogous reason. 

The objects which compose a set (^) form a sort of 
' material ' objects when (i) the objects of the set //, are 
all uniform, (ii) not more than one member of ju, can 
be located in any volume, (iii) no member of /* can be 
located in two volumes of the same moment, (iv) if 
O l and O 2 be two members of fi respectively located 
in non-overlapping volumes in the same moment, then 
any pair of situations of O l and O 2 respectively are 
separated events, (v) if O be a member of //. situated in 
an event e, and located in the volume V which is a 
section of e, and V be any volume which is a portion 
of V, then there is a member of /z which is located in 
V l and is a concurrent component of O. 

56-2 If O be a material object of a certain sort and 
V be a volume in which O is located and V 1 be a portion 
of Vj then the material object of the same sort as O 
which is located in V l is called an * extensive component ' 
of O. 



172 IV. THE THEORY OF OBJECTS 

56-3 It is by means of the properties of material 
objects that the atomic properties of objects are com- 
bined in mathematical calculations with the extensive 
continuity of events. Apart from material objects 
mathematical physics as at present developed would be 
impossible. For example where the physicist sees the 
electron as an atomic whole, the mathematician sees 
a distribution of electricity continuous in time and in 
space and capable of division into component objects 
which are also analogous distributions. 

57. Stationary Events. 57-1 In order to understand 
the theory of the motion of material objects, it is first 
necessary to define the concept of a l stationary* event. 
Consider some given time-system ?r, and let V denote 
a volume lying in a certain moment M of this time- 
system. Let d be a duration of TT bounded by moments 
M 1 and M 2 , and inhered in by M; so that M lf M 2 , M 
are three parallel moments of the time-system TT, and 
M lies between M x and M 2 . The volume V is the locus 
of a set of event-particles and each of these event- 
particles lies in one and only one station of the duration 
d. Also each station of d either does not intersect V or 
intersects it in one event-particle only. The assemblage 
of event-particles lying on stations of d which intersect 
V [namely, each event-particle lying on one of these 
stations] is the complete set of event-particles analysing* 
an event. Such an event is called stationary in the time- 
system TT and stretches throughout the duration d. It 
can also be called ' stationary in rf,' since d defines the 
time-system TT. Every event-particle within the event 
lies on a station of d; and a station of d either has all 
its event-particles lying within the event or none of 
* Cf. subarticle 37-3, Chapter X, Part HI. 



MATERIAL OBJECTS 173 

them. The volume V is the section of the event by the 
moment M. Furthermore if M r be any other moment 
of the time-system TT lying between M t and M 2 , it 
intersects the event in a volume V which is a geo- 
metrical replica of the volume V. The moments M 
and M 2 which bound the duration d are the terminal 
moments of any event which is stationary in d. The 
stations of d lying in the event intersect M x and M 2 in 
terminal volumes V and V 2 which are geometrical 
replicas of V and V . A volume, such as V, in which 
a moment of n intersects an event stationary in TT is 
called a ' normal cross-section ' of the event. A moment 
of another time-system a which intersects the stationary 
event in a volume J7, but does not intersect either of the 
terminal volumes, is said to intersect it in an 'oblique 
cross-section.' All the oblique cross-sections of a 
stationary event which are made by moments of the 
same time-system are geometrical replicas of each 
other. 

57-2 Consider an event e stationary in the time- 
system TT, and let a be another time-system. Let v v 
be the measure of the normal cross-sections of e and 
let v a be the measure of the oblique cross-sections made 
by moments of a. We require the ratio of v a to v v . 
Take (as usual) mutual axes for TT and a, and let the 
event-particle which is the origin lie in M 1 which is the 
antecedent terminal moment of e. Then M is at the 
7r-time zero, and let M 2 (the subsequent terminal 
moment) be at the 7r-time t v . Then if (#., y^z^ o) 
be the ^-coordinates of the event-particle in which a 
station s (of the set composing the event e) intersects 
MJ, the ^-coordinates of the other end (the subsequent 
end) of s in Af 2 are (x w , y^ * T , t r ). 



i 7 4 IV - THE THEORY OF OBJECTS 

Furthermore let (x a , y a , #, t a ) be the a-coordinates 
of the antecedent end of s, and let (x' a , y' a , z' a , t' a ) be 
the a-coordinates of the subsequent end of s. Then 
by the usual formulae [cf. subarticle 52-2] 

1 ' A-\ / T7- j. \ ' ' 

and x a = & air fa - K Ta * T ), y a = y in z a = z^ 

i V < 

i I ' air" 

' /.-O^-^ 

Hence t' a t a = H a7r ^ . 

But, by analogous reasoning to that for the elementary 
case of geometrical parallelograms, the absolute extent 
of the event e can be expressed as v* t v and as v a (t' a t a ). 
Hence v a (t' a t a ) = v v t w . 

Thus v a = a~*v r (i). 

57-3 The stations of a duration d of a time-system 
TT are portions of points of the time-less space of TT 
[the 77-space]. 

Thus by prolonging the stations which constitute 
the stationary event e we obtain the assemblage of 
7r-points which is the complete assemblage of ?r-points 
intersecting the cross-sections of , each event-particle 
in each cross-section lying on one and only one such 
7r-point and each of these 7r-points intersecting each 
cross-section in one event-particle. The assemblage of 
these 7r-points is a volume of the 7r-space, and the 
successive instantaneous volumes which are the normal 
cross-sections of e [stationary in TT] each occupy this 
same volume in the 7r-space. Thus the stationary 
event e during the lapse of 7r-time throughout which it 
endures is happening at the same place in the 7r-space. 

But the successive oblique cross-sections of e formed 
by moments of another time-system a are instantaneous 



MATERIAL OBJECTS 



175 



volumes which successively occupy different volumes 
in the a-space. These instantaneous volumes travel in 
the a-space, sweeping over it with the uniform velocity 
V av , namely the velocity due to the time-system -n in 
the a-space. 

57*4 A * normal slice' of a stationary event is the 
slice of it cut off between any two normal cross-sections. 
An ' oblique slice ' of a stationary event is the slice of it 
cut off between any two parallel oblique cross-sections. 
A normal slice of a stationary event is itself a stationary 
event in the same time-system. 

58. Motion of Objects. 58-1 A material object is 
'motionless' within a duration when throughout that 
duration the material object and its extensive com- 
ponents are all situated in stationary events. 

In the case of a motionless material object, Law I for 
uniform objects can be made more precise, as follows: 

If O be a material object motionless in the duration 
d and e be the stationary event extending throughout 
d in which it is situated, then O is situated in any 
oblique slice of e. 

The accompanying figures illustrate (i) the kind of 
slice which is included in this law and (ii) the kind of 
slice which is excluded. 



duration d 



event e 
slice 



/ slicing 
duration 



duration d 



(i) 




Fig. 19. 



ii) 



iy6 IV. THE THEORY OF OBJECTS 

It immediately follows that with the nomenclature 
of the enunciation of the law O is located in every 
oblique cross-section of e. 

If TT be the time-system of the duration in which O 
is motionless and, in some other time-system a, d' be 
the duration of maximum extent which intersects e 
in an oblique slice, then throughout d' in the time-less 
space of a the material object O has a uniform motion 
of translation with the velocity of ?r in a. 

58-2 This property, possessed by a material object 
which is motionless in a time-system TT, of being situated 
in every oblique slice of its stationary situation is a 
fundamental physical law of nature. Namely, percipients 
cogredient with different time-systems can * recog- 
nise' the same material objects. In other words, the 
character of a material object is not altered by its 
motion. 

58*3 The motion of a material object O is ' regular' 
when if V be any volume in which it is located and P 
be any event-particle in V, and V be any variable 
volume which contains P and is a portion of V, and 
O' be the extensive component of O which is located 
in V ', then, as V is progressively diminished without 
limit, a time-system TT can be found such that the errors 
of calculations, respecting magnitudes exhibited by O' 
which assume that O' is motionless in TT, tend to the 
limit zero, provided that the time-lapse of the durations 
in 77 within which O' is motionless is also correspond- 
ingly diminished without limit. 

The above definition of regular motion is a descrip- 
tion of the assumptions in the ordinary mathematical 
treatment of the motion of a material object (not 
necessarily rigid) which is not moving with a uniform 



MATERIAL OBJECTS 177 

motion of translation. If a be the standard time-system 
to which motions are referred, then the velocity of TT 
in a is the velocity at the event-particle P [i.e. at the 
a-space point p a at the a-time t a ] of the material object. 

59. Extensive Magnitude. 59-1 A theory of extensive 
magnitude is required to complete the theory of material 
objects. 

Let O and O' be two objects (material or otherwise), 
then the statement that O and O' possess quantities of 
a certain kind and that the ratio of the quantity O to 
the quantity O f has a certain definite numerical value 
is a reference to some determinate method of com- 
parison of O to O' which is the defining characteristic 
of that kind of quantity*. 

The quantity of a certain kind possessed by a material 
object O is called ' extensive' when it is a determinate 
function of the quantities of the same kind possessed 
by any two of its extensive components which (i) are 
exhaustive of O and (ii) are non-overlapping [i.e. have 
no extensive component in common]. 

If the determinate function be that of simple addi- 
tion [so that, q, q ly q 2 being the quantities possessed 
respectively by O and its two extensive components, 

? = ?i+ ? 2 ]> 

then the kind of quantity will be called ' absolutely' 
extensive. When an extensive quantity is not absolutely 
extensive, it will be called * semi-extensive.' 

59-2 It is usual in philosophical discussions to con- 
fine the term * extensive quantity ' to what is here defined 
as * absolutely extensive quantity,' and to ignore entirely 
the occurrence of semi-extensive quantities. But in 
physical science semi-extensive quantities are well 

* Cf. Principia Mathematica. 
w. 12 



178 IV. THE THEORY OF OBJECTS 

known. For example, consider a sphere of radius a 
uniformly charged with electricity throughout its 
volume. Divide the sphere into two parts, namely a 
concentric nucleus of radius c and a shell of thickness 
a c. Then the electromagnetic mass of the whole 
sphere is not the sum of the electromagnetic masses 
of these two parts, but is to be calculated by a quadratic 
law from the charges. 

A material object expresses the spatial distribution of 
a quantity of ' material/ when the quantity is absolutely 
extensive. 

59-3 The volume-density, at a time t a in the a-space 
of a time-system a, of the distribution of any absolutely 
extensive quantity possessed by a material object O 
is calculated by the ordinary mathematical formula. 
Consider any event-particle P occupying the a-point p a 
at the a-time t a . Let dv a be the measure of a volume 
in the a-space which contains p a \ and let O' be the 
extensive component of O located in dv ay if there be 
such an extensive component. Let q be the measure 
of the quantity possessed by O' '. Then the limit of the 
ratio of q to dv a , as dv a is indefinitely diminished, is the 
density at p a at the time t a of the material [i.e. of the 
absolutely extensive quantity]. 

59-4 The above definitions contemplate quantities 
immediately possessed by the extensive objects as such, 
for example, charges of electricity and intensities of 
sense-objects. But there are also quantities which are 
only mediately possessed by the objects, but are im- 
mediately possessed by the events which are their 
situations. Such quantities may vary with the variation 
in the situation of the object mediately possessing them. 

A mediately possessed quantity may for a certain 



MATERIAL OBJECTS 179 

type of material objects satisfy the characteristic con- 
dition for an extensive quantity. In that case it is an 
extensive quantity mediately possessed by that type of 
material objects. All variable extensive quantities are 
of this mediate character. A quantity mediately pos- 
sessed by a material object O at a moment M a [i.e. at 
a time t a ] of a time-system a is the limit of the quantity 
possessed by the successive converging situations of O 
in the successive durations of an abstractive class (of 
durations in the time-system a) which converges to M a . 

The volume-density, at a time t a in the a-space of a 
time-system a, ,of the distribution of any absolutely 
extensive quantity mediately possessed by a material 
object O is calculated according to the preceding 
definition for the case of immediately possessed quan- 
tities, except that the * quantity mediately possessed 
by O (or by an extensive component of O) at the time t a ' 
must be substituted everywhere for the 'quantity 
possessed by O (or by an extensive component of O).' 

59*5 We can compare the volume-densities p a and 
Pp of an absolutely extensive quantity for two time- 
systems a and ft respectively at a given event-particle 
P, assuming, as we may assume, that the motion of the 
material object possessing (mediately or immediately) 
the quantity is regular. 

Let TT be the time-system in which the object O is 
stationary at P, and let p w be the volume-density at P 
for the time-system TT. Let M a9 Mp, M^ be the moments 
in a, , and TT respectively which contain P. Let dv v 
be the measure of a small volume in M v which contains 
P [and therefore the measure of the volume in the time- 
less 7r-space which this instantaneous volume occupies] . 
Consider the event (e^) stationary in TT of which this 



12 2 



i8o IV. THE THEORY OF OBJECTS 

small volume dv w is a normal cross-section, and bounded 
by terminal moments M' v and M'l on either side of 
M^ and both near M v . Then, by the theory of regular 
motion, we can take this stationary event (e v ) as the 
situation of an extensive component of O, when dv v is 
small enough and the duration bounded by M' T and 
M'l is short enough. Let dv a and dvp be the measures 
of the volumes which are the oblique cross-sections of 
e v made by M a and Mp. Then ultimately p v dv v9 p a dv a , 
and ppdvp are expressions for the measure of the quantity 
possessed by O. 

Hence P*dv* = Ppdvp = p r dv r . 

But by equation (i) of 57-2 of this chapter, 

ThuS PaQaw = PfS&fr = PIT (2). 

Now take the mutual axes for a and /?, and let (x a9 y ay 
z aj t a ) and (xp 9 yp, Zp 9 tp) be the coordinates of P in a and 
p respectively, and let (x a , y a , z a ) and (x^ y ft , Zp) be the 
velocities due to TT in a and j8 respectively. Then by 
equation (i) of 52-6, 

~T2 I (S)- 



59-6 Now let denote differentiation following the 

d 

motion (* a , y a , z a ) at (x a9 y ay z a , t a ), and let denote 

t a 

differentiation at the point (x a , y a , z a ). 
Then it is* easily proved that 



MATERIAL OBJECTS 181 

& air -jr = Qfir-jr- 
dt a dtp 

Hence from equation (2) of 59-5 above 



Pa dt a pp dtp 

Again by using the formulae of article 52, we can 
prove that 






From these results we immediately deduce 



Pa 



Now the condition that the total extensive quantity 
which is the 'charge' of any extensive component 
never varies when conceived as distributed through 
the a-space is 

i dp 
+ div a (# a , y ay z a ) = o. 

Pa*a 

This is the well-known equation of continuity. Now 
equation (4) shows that if this equation holds for the 
space of any time-system, it holds for the spaces of all 
time-systems. 

When the equation of continuity holds, the 'charge' 
of any extensive component of the material object 
under consideration never varies. Hence it is a mere 
matter of words and definition whether the charge is 
said to be mediately possessed by the object or im- 
mediately possessed. 



CHAPTER XVI 
CAUSAL COMPONENTS 

60. Apparent and Causal Characters. 60- 1 Are there 
any material objects in nature? That there are such 
bodies is certainly an assumption habitually made in 
the applications of mathematics. But the assumption 
does not supersede the necessity for enquiry. 

We may roughly summarise the properties of material 
objects, as here defined, by saying that they should be 
continuous both in time and in space. But this is just 
what ordinary perceptual objects appear to be. Now 
perceptual objects are what they appear to be; for a 
perceptual object is nothing else than the permanent 
property of its situations, that they all shall exhibit 
those appearances. Accordingly if a perceptual object 
appears to be a material object, it is a material object. 

Now here a difficulty arises; for we all know that, 
according to Dalton's atomic theory of chemistry, any 
apparently continuous substance is a discrete collection 
of molecules, and that furthermore, according to the 
more recent theories, a molecule is a discrete collection 
of electric charges. Accordingly, as we are told, if we 
could take the minutest drop of water and magnify it, 
the phenomena would be analogous to those of a swarm 
of flies in a room. 

It would appear therefore that we are mistaken in 
classifying a drop of water as being a material object. 

60*2 The position that we seem to have arrived at 
is that on the one hand a drop of water is a material 
object, because it appears to be one and it is whatever 



CAUSAL COMPONENTS 183 

it appears to be, and that on the other hand it is really 
something quite different. 

Such paradoxes mean that vital distinctions have 
been overlooked. We must distinguish between the 
drop of water as it appears, the event which is its 
situation, and the character of the event which causes 
the event to present that appearance. Namely, there 
is the appearance of the drop of water. This is character 
No. i of the event, the apparent character, and is a 
material object. Again there is the character of the 
event which is the cause of character No. i. This is 
character No. 2 of the event and is its causal character. 
According to the doctrine of science, character No. 2 
is not a material object. 

60-3 But why trouble about causal characters ? What 
has pushed science into their consideration? The im- 
pelling reason is the complex bewildering relationships 
of the apparent characters. Apparent characters essen- 
tially involve reference to percipient events, and may 
be very trivial qualities of the events which they charac- 
terise. For example, all delusive perceptual objects are 
apparent characters of events. 

In the case of a delusive perceptual object character 
No. 2 of its situation has no existence, except so far as 
the event is necessarily still a 'passive condition' 
according to the nomenclature of Chapter VII of 
Part II. The active conditioning events for a delusive 
perceptual object must be sought elsewhere than in its 
situation. Let us confine ourselves to the consideration 
of non-delusive perceptual objects, that is, to physical 
objects. 

60*4 But the line of separation between delusive and 
non-delusive perceptual objects is not quite so clear 



1 84 IV. THE THEORY OF OBJECTS 

as we might wish. The definition of delusiveness and 
non-delusiveness is sufficiently obvious, namely, a 
perceptual object is non-delusive when it is the ap- 
parent character of an event which is itself an active 
condition for the appearance of that character as per- 
ceptible from all percipient events. In the nomen- 
clature of Chapter VII of Part II the situation of a 
physical object is its * generating event/ 

Now if this definition is to be taken to the foot of the 
letter, all perceptual objects are delusive; for all per- 
ception is belated. The sun which we see is the apparent 
character of an event simultaneous with our percipient 
event, and this event is about eight seconds subsequent 
to the generating event corresponding to that appearance 
of the sun. In the case of other astronomical phenomena 
the discrepancy is more glaring. In the case of terres- 
trial perceptual objects the discrepancy is less glaring 
in many cases, though for sounds it is very insistent 
and is the reason of their very indeterminate situations. 
But, speaking generally and admitting exceptions, for 
the greater part of ordinary domestic perceptions the 
belatedness of the apparently characterised event behind 
the causally characterised event is a small fraction of 
the percipient's specious present. 

Accordingly our knowledge of causal characters is 
a theory built up by ignoring this element of delusive- 
ness in all perceptual objects, and then by introducing 
it as an additional correction in the exceptional cases. 

67. Transition from Appearance to Cause. 61-1 But 
how can we pass from appearance to cause, seeing that 
our knowledge of nature is confined to awareness of ap- 
pearance? For example, all measurement is a measure- 
ment of appearance. 



CAUSAL COMPONENTS 185 

Evidently therefore causal characters can only be 
directly known to us as functions of apparent characters. 
They are characters of characters. For example, a 
quantity which we assign to a physical object as the 
result of some measurement is a character of its apparent 
character. 

61-2 It is necessary however to avoid a misunder- 
standing ; the causal character of an event is not merely 
a function of the apparent character of that event. It 
is in truth a function of the apparent characters of all 
events, though in general the apparent character of 
that event or of an associated event of somewhat later 
date is the dominant element in the formation of 
the function. For example, a quantity determined by 
measurement is a relation of the apparent character of 
the event to the apparent characters of other events. 
But it is the dominance of the apparent character which 
in practice makes the discovery of the causal character 
generally possible; for it assigns the situation of the 
causal character. This dominance is merely a practical 
aid to the discovery of causal characters and has in it 
no element of necessity. Indeed as causal characters 
are progressively discovered, scientific theory assigns 
causal characters to events which are destitute of ap- 
parent character namely the events forming the ether 
in empty space and time. 

61-3 So far the explanation of causal characters has 
exhibited them as the outcome and issue from apparent 
characters, whereas the causal idea, which is that of 
science, requires the causal characters should be the 
origin of the apparent characters. We have to seek the 
reason for this inversion of ideas. 

Causal characters are much simpler than apparent 



1 86 IV. THE THEORY OF OBJECTS 

characters ; are more permanent than apparent charac- 
ters; and depend almost entirely on the event itself, 
involving other events only (in general) as passive con- 
ditions providing the necessary background of a whole 
continuum of nature. The climb from the sense-object 
to the perceptual object, and from the perceptual object 
to the scientific object, and from the complex scientific 
object (such as the molecule) to the (temporally, in a 
stage of science) ultimate scientific object (such as the 
electron) is a steady pursuit of simplicity, permanence, 
and self-sufficiency, combined with the essential attri- 
bute of adequacy for the purpose of defining the 
apparent characters. 

61-4 The relations of sense-objects to their situations 
are complex in the extreme, requiring reference to 
percipient events and transmitting events. Apart from 
some discovery of laws of nature regulating the asso- 
ciations of sense-objects, it is impossible by unintelligent 
unsorted perception to form any concept of the charac- 
ter of an event from the sense-objects which might be 
situated there for percipients suffering from any normal 
or abnormal perceptions. 

The first stage is the discovery of perceptual objects. 
Those objects are first known by the instinctive 'con- 
veyance ' of abnormal perceptions of sense-objects asso- 
ciated with normally perceived sense-objects. The test 
of alternative possibilities of normal perception and the 
discovery of a permanent character in the association 
which can be expressed independently of any particular 
percipient event decides between delusive perceptual 
objects and physical objects. 

61*5 The introduction of physical objects enables 
us in considering the characters of events to sweep 



CAUSAL COMPONENTS f 187 

aside the boundless eccentricities of abnormal per- 
ceptions. We are still at the stage of apparent characters, 
but rules have been attained, either by instinctive 
practice or by the exercise of intelligence or by the 
interplay between the two, by which we know what to 
attend to and what to discard in judging the character 
of an event from the situations of sense-objects. A 
physical object is the apparent character of its situation. 
Physical objects are found to be 'material' objects. 

6 1 -6 Science now intervenes with the express purpose 
of exhibiting our perceptions as our awareness of the 
characters of events and of relations between characters 
of events. All perceptions are included in the scope 
of this aim of science, namely, including abnormally 
perceived sense-objects and delusive perceptual objects. 

61-7 The origin of the concept of causation (in this 
application of the term) is now manifest. It is that 
of the part explaining the whole or, avoiding this un- 
technical use of 'part' and 'whole/ it is that of some 
explaining all. For the physical objects were obtained by 
discarding abnormalities, and physical objects express 
the characters of events, and all our perceptions (in- 
cluding abnormalities) arise from awareness of these 
characters. 

6l-8 But physical objects fail to satisfy the require- 
ments of science. They lack definiteness and per- 
manence, and are not adequate for the purposes of 
explanation. Now the characters of their mutual rela- 
tions disclose further permanences recognisable in 
events and among these are the scientific objects. The 
gradual recognition of these permanences was at first 
the slow product of civilised thought without conscious 
direction. As regards their conscious discovery various 



1 88 IV. THE THEORY OF OBJECTS 

stages may be discerned in scientific history, which 
sum up the previous growth of ideas and initiate new 
epochs. One stage is marked by Archimedes' discovery 
of specific gravity, and another by Newton's discovery 
of mass. The simplicity of what, in its relation to 
appearance, is so abstract was then beginning to be 
discovered, and also its permanence and self-sufficiency 
as a quality of events. A third stage is the introduction 
of the concept of molecules and atoms by Dalton's 
atomic theory. Finally there arose the concepts re- 
specting the ether, which we here construe as meaning 
the concept of events in space empty of appearances. 

61-9 These causal characters, which are the charac- 
ters of apparent characters, are found to be expressible 
as certain scientific objects, molecules and electrons, 
and as certain characters of events which do not 
necessarily themselves exhibit any apparent characters. 
If we follow the route of the derivation of knowledge 
from the intellectual analysis of sensible experience, 
molecules and electrons are the last stage in a series of 
abstractions. But a fact in nature has nothing to do 
with the logical derivation of concepts. The concepts 
represent our abstract intellectual apprehension of 
certain permanent characters of events, just as our 
perception of sense-objects is our awareness of qualities 
of nature resulting from the shifting relations of these 
characters. Thus scientific objects are the concrete 
causal characters, though w T e arrive "at them by a route 
of apprehension which is a process of abstraction. In 
the same way, what, in the form of a sense-object, is 
concrete for our awareness, is abstract in its character 
of a complex of relations between scientific objects. 
Thus what is concrete as causal is abstract in its deriva- 



CAUSAL COMPONENTS 189 

tion from the apparent, and what is concrete as apparent 
is abstract in its derivation from the causal. 

The ultimate scientific objects (at present, electrons 
and positive electric charges) are ' uniform' objects; 
and, in the limited sense of charges in the 'occupied' 
events, they are also 'material' objects. There does 
not appear to be any reason, other than the very natural 
desire for simplicity, for the assumption that ultimate 
scientific objects are uniform. Some of the atomic 
and 'quantum' properties of nature may find their ex- 
planation in the assumption of non-uniform ultimate 
scientific objects which would introduce the necessary 
discontinuities. 

61-91 The causal character of the situation of a 
physical object is the fact that this situation contains 
a certain assemblage of ultimate scientific objects; 
namely, the fact that among the parts of this situation 
are various parts which are the occupied events of these 
scientific objects. The 'causal components' of a phys- 
ical object are the scientific objects which occupy parts 
of the situation of the physical object, and whose total 
assemblage is what constitutes the qualities which are 
the apparent character which is the physical object 
apparent in the situation. 

61-92 An adjustment, ordinarily negligible but often 
important, has to be made to allow for the belatedness of 
perception. Two situations are thus involved (even 
although in ordinary cases they are practically identical), 
namely the situation of the physical object from an 
assigned percipient event, and the situation of the 
assemblage of causal components which is the situation 
of the ' real ' object. 



CHAPTER XVII 
FIGURES 

62. Sense-Figures. 62-1 There are two types of 
objects which can be included under the general name 
of ' figures ' ; objects of one type will be termed ' sense- 
figures/ and of the other type ' geometrical figures.' 

Figures of either type arise from the perception of 
the relation of sense-objects to the properties which 
their situations have in respect to their relations of 
extension with other events. The primary type of 
figure is the sense-figure and the geometrical figure is 
derivative from it. 

62-2 Every sort of sense-object will have its own 
peculiar sort of sense-figure. The sense-figures associ- 
ated with some sorts of sense-objects (e.g. smells and 
tastes) are barely perceptible, whereas the sense-figures 
associated with other sorts of sense-objects (e.g. sights 
and touches) are of insistent obviousness. The condition 
that a sense-object should have a figure within a given 
duration can be precisely stated : A sense-object O, as 
perceived in a situation o which extends throughout a 
duration d of a time-system a, possesses a figure in </, 
if every volume of o-, lying in a moment of a inherent in 
d, is congruent with every other such volume. 

Owing to the inexactitude of perception small quan- 
titative defects from the rigorous fulfilment of this 
condition do not in practice hinder the perception of 
figure. Namely, the possession of sense-figure follows 
from the sufficiently approximate fulfilment of this 
condition. The durations which are important from 



FIGURES i 9I 

the point of view of sense-figures are those which form 
present durations of perceptions in general, those 
durations which are cogredient with a percipient event 
and are each short enough to form one immediate 
present. Thus in the numerous instances in which 
there is no large change within such an immediate 
present, there is a perceived figure. Accordingly we 
can define a sense-figure precisely as follows: 

The figure, for a time-system a, of sense-object O in 
situation or is the relation holding, and only holding, 
between O and any a-volume congruent to a member 
of the set of a- volumes of a. 

This definition is only important when the a-volumes 
of o- are all nearly congruent to each other ; because only 
in that case is this relation recognisable in perception. 

623 Thus, each sense-object is primarily capable of 
its own sort of sense-figure and of that sort only. There 
are the sense-figures of blue of one shade, and the sense- 
figures of blue of another shade, and the separate sets 
of figures belonging to all the shades of reds and greens 
and yellows. There is the set of figures of the touch 
of velvet, and the set of figures of the touch of marble 
at particular temperatures of hand and surface and with 
a particular polish of surface. 

62-4 But there is an analogy of sense-objects and this 
begets an analogy of figures. For example, there is an 
analogy between blues of all shades, and a corresponding 
analogy between their sets of figures. Each such analogy 
amid sense-objects issues in an object of a type not 
hitherto named. Call it the type of * generalised sense- 
objects.' For example, we can recognise blue and 
ignore its particular shade. Correspondingly we can 
recognise a blue sense-figure, and ignore the differences 



i 9 2 IV. THE THEORY OF OBJECTS 

between a light-blue sense-figure and a dark-blue 
sense-figure. We can go further, and recognise colour 
and ignore the particular colour; and correspondingly 
there are recognisable sight-figures underlying figures 
of particular shades of particular colours. 

62-5 But it would be a mistake to insist on the deriva- 
tion of the generalised sense-figures from the recognition 
of generalised sense-objects. In general the converse 
process would seem to be nearer the truth. Namely, 
the analogy amid sense-figures is more insistently per- 
ceptible than the analogy amid sense-objects; and the 
derivation is as much from the generalised sense-figure 
to the generalised sense-object as in the converse order. 

We must go further than this. Perceptive insistency 
is not ranged in the order of simplicity as determined 
by a reflective analysis of the elements of our awareness 
of nature. Sense-figures possess a higher perceptive 
insistency than the corresponding sense-objects. We 
first notice a dark-blue figure and pass to the dark- 
blueness. 

62-6 Indeed the high perceptive power of figures is at 
once the foundation of our natural knowledge and the 
origin of our philosophical errors. It has led the theory 
of space to be annexed to objects and not to events, and 
thus created the fatal divorce between space and time. 
A figure, being an object, is not in space or time, except 
in a derivative sense. 

This perceptive power of figures carries us to the 
direct recognition of sorts of objects which otherwise 
would remain in the region of abstract logical concepts. 
For example, our perception of sight-figures leads to 
the recognition of colour as being what is common to 
all particular colours. 



FIGURES 



193 



63. Geometrical Figures. 63-1 The generalisation 
which introduces geometrical figures is an extreme in- 
stance of the sort of generalisation already considered. 
Namely, instead of generalising from a dark-blue figure 
to a sight-figure, we pass to the concept of the relation 
of any sense-object to the volumes of its situation. 
This concept of a figure, in which any particular sense 
has been lost sight of, would be entirely without any 
counterpart in perception, if it were not for the fact of 
perceptual objects. A perceptual object is the association 
in one situation of a set of sense-objects, in general 
'conveyed' by the normal perception of one of them. 
The high perceptive capacity of sense-figures leads to 
their association in a generalised figure, which is the 
geometrical figure of the object. Indeed, the insistent 
obviousness of the geometrical figure is one reason for 
the perception of perceptual objects. The object is not 
the figure, but our awareness of it is derived from our 
awareness of the figure. The reason for discriminating 
the perceptual object from its figure in that situation 
is that the physical object persists while its figure 
changes. For example, a sock can be twisted into all 
sorts of figures. 

63-2 The current doctrine of different kinds of space 
tactual space, visual space, and so on arises entirely 
from the error of deducing space from the relations 
between figures. With such a procedure, since there 
are different types of figures for different types of sense, 
evidently there must be different types of space for 
different types of sense. And the demand created the 
supply. 

63-3 If however the modern assimilation of space 
and time is to hold, we must then go further and admit 
w. 13 



i 9 4 IV. THE THEORY OF OBJECTS 

different kinds of time for different kinds of sense, 
namely a tactual time, a visual time, and so on. If this 
be allowed, it is difficult to understand how the disjecta 
membra of our perceptual experience manage to collect 
themselves into a common world. 

For example, it would require a pre-established 
harmony to secure that the visual newspaper was deli- 
vered at the visual time of the visual breakfast in the 
visual room and also the tactual newspaper was delivered 
at the tactual time of the tactual breakfast in the tactual 
room. It is difficult enough for the plain man such as 
the present author to accept the miracle of getting the 
two newspapers into the two rooms daily with such 
admirable exactitude at the same time. But the ad- 
ditional miracle introduced by the two times is really 
incredible. 

The procedure of this enquiry admits the different 
types of figures, but rejects the different types of space, 



CHAPTER XVIII 
RHYTHMS 

64. Rhythms. 64*1 The theory of percipient objects 
is beyond the scope of this work of which the aim is to 
illustrate the principles of natural knowledge by an 
examination of the data and experiential laws funda- 
mental for physical science. A percipient object is in 
some sense beyond nature. 

But nature includes life; and the way of conceiving 
nature developed in the preceding chapter has its 
bearing on biological conceptions as to the sense in 
which life can be said to be thus included. 

64-2 An object is a characteristic of an event. Such 
an object may be in fact a multiple relation between 
objects situated in various parts of the whole event. In 
this case the quality of the whole is the relationship 
between its parts, and the relation between the parts is 
the quality of the whole. The whole event being what 
it is, its parts have thereby certain defined relations; 
and the parts having all the relations which they do 
have, it follows that the whole event is what it is. The 
whole is explained by a full knowledge of the parts 
as situations of objects, and the parts by a full know- 
ledge of the whole. Such an object is a pattern, 

64.3 The discussion of life in nature has become 
canalised along certain conventional lines based upon 
the traditional concepts of science. We are aware of 
living objects. But the phrase * living objects' is mis- 
leading; we should more accurately say, 'objects ex- 
pressing life,' or 'life-bearing objects.' Namely, the 



i 9 6 IV. THE THEORY OF OBJECTS 

individual life w, beyond the mere object. There is not 
an object which, after being known as an object, is 
then in itself judged to be alive. The specific recognis- 
able liveliness is the recognised character of the relation 
of the object to the event which is its situation. Thus 
to say that the object is alive suppresses the necessary 
reference to the event ; and to say that an event is alive 
suppresses the necessary reference to the object. 

64-4 We have therefore to ask, what sort of events 
have life in their relations to objects situated in them, 
and what sort of objects have life in their relations to 
their situations ? A life-bearing object is not an 'uniform' 
object. Life (as known to us) involves the completion 
of rhythmic parts within the life-bearing event which 
exhibits that object. We can diminish the time-parts, 
and, if the rhythms be unbroken, still discover the same 
object of life in the curtailed event. But if the diminu- 
tion of the duration be carried to the extent of breaking 
the rhythm, the life-bearing object is no longer to be 
found as a quality of the slice of the original event cut 
off within that duration. This is no special peculiarity of 
life. It is equally true of a 'molecule of iron or of a 
musical phrase. Thus there is no such thing as life 
'at one instant'; life is too obstinately concrete to be 
located in an extensive element of an instantaneous 
space. 

64-5 The events which are associated by us with life 
are also the situations of physical objects. But the 
physical object though essential is not an adequate 
condition for its occurrence. A change in the object 
almost imperceptible from the physical point of view 
destroys the life in the succeeding situations of the 
object. The physical object, as apparent, is a material 



RHYTHMS 197 

object and as such is uniform; but when we turn 
to the causal components of such an object, the 
apparent character of the whole situation is thereby 
superseded by the rhythmic quasi-periodic characters 
of a multitude of parts which are the situations of 
molecules. 

In an analogous way we seek for a causal character 
of the event which in some way or another is apparent 
to us as alive, and we seek for an expression of this 
causal character in terms of the causal components of 
the physical object. It would seem therefore (if the 
analogy is to be pursued) that apparent life in any 
situation has, as its counterpart in that situation, more 
complex, subtler rhythms than those whose aggregate 
is essential for the physical object. 

64-6 Furthermore in the physical object we have in 
a sense lost the rhythms in the macroscopic aggregate 
which is the final causal character. But life preserves 
its expression of rhythm and its sensitiveness to 
rhythm. Life is the rhythm as such, whereas a phys- 
ical object is an average of rhythms which build no 
rhythm in their aggregation; and thus matter is in 
itself lifeless. 

Life is complex in its expression, involving more 
than percipience, namely desire, emotion, will, and 
feeling. It exhibits variations of grade, higher and lower, 
such that the higher grade presupposes the lower for 
its very existence. This suggests a closer identification 
of rhythm as the causal counterpart of life; namely, 
that wherever there is some rhythm, there is some life, 
only perceptible to us when the analogies are sufficiently 
close. The rhythm is then the life, in the sense in which 
it can be said to be included within nature. 



i 9 8 IV. THE THEORY OF OBJECTS 

64-7 Now a rhythm is recognisable and is so far an 
object. But it is more than an object; for it is an object 
formed of other objects interwoven upon the back- 
ground of essential change. A rhythm involves a 
pattern and to that extent is always self-identical. But 
no rhythm can be a mere pattern; for the rhythmic 
quality depends equally upon the differences involved 
in each exhibition of the pattern. The essence of rhythm 
is the fusion of sameness and novelty ; so that the whole 
never loses the essential unity of the pattern, while the 
parts exhibit the contrast arising from the novelty of 
their detail. A mere recurrence kills rhythm as surely 
as does a mere confusion of differences. A crystal lacks 
rhythm from excess of pattern, while a fog is unrhythmic 
in that it exhibits a patternless confusion of detail. 
Again there are gradations of rhythm. The more 
perfect rhythm is built upon component rhythms. A 
subordinate part with crystalline excess of pattern or 
with foggy confusion weakens the rhythm. Thus every 
great rhythm presupposes lesser rhythms without 
which it could not be. No rhythm can be founded upon 
mere confusion or mere sameness. 

64-8 An event, considered as gaining its unity from 
the continuity of extension and its unique novelty from 
its inherent character of 'passage,' contributes one 
factor to life ; and the pattern exhibited within the event, 
which as self-identical should be a rigid recurrence, 
contributes the other factor to life. A rhythm is too 
concrete to be truly an object. It refuses to be disen- 
gaged from the event in the form of a true object which 
would be mere pattern. What the pattern does do is 
to impress its atomic character on a certain whole event 
which, as one whole bearing its atomic pattern, is 



RHYTHMS 199 

a unique type of natural element, neither a mere event 
nor a mere object as object is here defined. This atomic 
character does not imply a discontinuous existence for 
a rhythm ; thus a wave-length as marked out in various 
positions along a train of waves exhibits the whole 
rhythm of the train at each position of its continuous 
travel. 

64-9 The very fact of a non-uniform object in- 
volves some rhythm. Such objects appear to our 
apprehension in events at certain stages of extensive 
size, provided that we confine attention to those 
organisms with stability of existence, each in close 
association with one physical object or with one set of 
causal material objects. Molecules are non-uniform 
objects and as such exhibit a rhythm; although, as 
known to us, it is a rhythm of excessive simplicity. 
Living bodies exhibit rhythm of the greatest subtlety 
within our apprehension. Solar systems and star clusters 
exhibit rhythm of a simplicity analogous to that of 
molecules. It is impossible not to suspect that the gain 
in apparent complexity at the stage of our own rhythm- 
bearing events is due rather to our angle of vision than 
to any inherent fact of nature. 

There are also stray rhythms which pass over the face 
of nature utilising physical objects as mere transient 
vehicles for their expression. To some extent this is 
the case in living bodies, which exhibit a continual 
assimilation and rejection of material. But the subtlety 
of rhythm appears to require a certain stability of 
material. 

64-91 Thus the permanence of the individual 
rhythm within nature is not absolutely associated with 
one definite set of material objects. But the connection 



200 IV. THE THEORY OF OBJECTS 

for subtler rhythms is very close. So far as direct 
observation is concerned all that we know of the essen- 
tial relations of life in nature is stated in two short 
poetic phrases. The obvious aspect by Tennyson, 

"Blow, bugle, blow, set the wild echoes flying, 
And answer, echoes, answer, dying, dying, dying." 

Namely, Bergson's elan vital and its relapse into 
matter. 

And Wordsworth with more depth, 

" The music in my heart I bore, 
Long after it was heard no more." 



CAMBRIDGE: PRINTED BY j. B. PEACE, M.A., AT THE UNIVERSITY PRESS. 



14 DAY USE 

RETURN TO DESK FROM WHICB.BORROWED 

ACTROftOWlY, MAThfci>Aiiv.i- 
vSSsTICS UBRARY 

This book is dtre*oVtne last date stamped below, or 

on the date to which renewed. 
Renewed books are subject to immediate recall. 







MATH.-STAT: 
LIBRARY 



U.C. BERKELEY UBRARIE! 



CD37SDDbSt 



781551 



QI15 

M, 



UNIVERSITY OF CALIFORNIA LIBRARY 



